SACRED AND TERRIBLE AIR 


Robert Kurvitz 


2013 


Contents 


FOREWORD 


Co A NO UCU FF WO NH 


ee = ee ee ee =F = = = 
Oo fe N OF UO fF WO NON = OS 


20. 


. CHARLOTTESJAL 

. CLASS REUNION 

. NON-ENTITY 

. VIDKUN HIRD 

. ZA/UM 

. FRANTICEK THE BRAVE 

. THE WORLD IS GOING WRONG, TIME IS DISJOINTED 
. LINOLEUM SALESMAN 

. SACRED AND TERRIBLE SMELL 

. GOOD NIGHT, ANNI 

. SELF-CHILLER 

. ZIGI 

. CHEMICAL MARRIAGE 

. LIST OF ABSENTEES 

. MOULD 

. ENTROPONAUT 

. HARNANKUR 

. THREE MEAT PIES IN OIL BATTER 


. TAM NOT A JOKE 


EPILOGUE - LIGHT SHINES THROUGH EVERYTHING 


BONUS - DELETED SCENE - KHAN’S MOTHER 


GLOSSARY 


102 
114 
117 
127 
129 
142 
153 
157 
159 


“My heart will not rest until it rests in you.” 


St. Augustine 


FOREWORD 


This translation is the result of a deep love for the Elysium world, first brought to life for 
English-speaking audiences through the memorable Disco Elysium game. 


We are a couple of fans who (like many others) wanted to devour everything else set in the 
same universe after we finished our tearful and emotional playthrough. We were greatly 
animated when we found out about the existence of a book, yet quickly saddened when 
it became clear that it was not available in English - even worse, the Estonian original 
was also out-of-print by the time we discovered it. 


Further investigation turned out that an English translation had been planned, even in 
the works at one point, but fell into uncertainty and seemingly indefinite postponement 
due to the complexities regarding the fight over ZA/UM’s IP rights and legal troubles. 


Thus, we decided to go ahead and arrange the translation ourselves. We were able (with 
some effort) to acquire a copy of the Estonian “Puha ja Oudne lohn”, then used our own 
funds to pay for a professional translator and an English editor to complete the work. 


What you have in front of you is the outcome of several months of painstaking work to 
not only bring the original writing into English, but also deal with the complex turns 
of phrase and novel concepts involved in the book, in a way that is faithful both to the 
original author and to the existing translations from the Disco Elysium game. There 
were many instances where we had to think and work closely with the whole team in 
order to best bring forth the meaning of a certain word, sentence or concept. Of course, 
we didn’t have access to the author himself (though would’ve loved to!), so in some 
situations we had to go with our own interpretation and adaptation - if we got it wrong, 
we apologise in advance and hope you'll forgive us. As bonus content that wasn’t in the 
book but completes it nicely, we have two blog posts from the “www.zaum.ee” blog run 
by the ZA/UM collective in the 2000s, unfortunately now defunct; we translated them 
directly from the blog archives. We’ve also added a glossary for your reference with 
some of the less familiar terms and place names, with descriptions taken from Disco 
Elysium. 


Needless to say, if at any point a “real” translation created with the author’s blessing 
does appear, we will be first in line to get a copy, and hope you will too! 


If you find this work useful and would like to support us for the effort, any amount in 
BTC is welcome here (but only if your heart says so): 


bclqg1m0Opaegamuk0s39ej2h7xtdugyxy4apq1206e 


Enjoy and remember: No Truce With The Furies! 


Truri and The Translation Team, 2023 


1. CHARLOTTESJAL 


This summer resort near Vaasa swallowed up four Lund girls. Along with their small 
bones and sunbathed skins, an entire era vanished. Six kilometres of winding coastline, 
a popular swimming spot in the ’50s; rows of changing cabins, high reeds rustling in 
the wind. There you can find the era conservatives mourn. Back when parents could 
send their kids to the beach unsupervised with two real for ice cream and bus fare in 
their summer shorts pockets. Worriedly shaking their heads and hiding the news from 
Messina, Graad, and Gottwald, where - so it seemed to them - every week tiny skeletons 
were found cast into someone’s furnace'. Every week, someone’s daughter, who had 
been kept in the basement for thirty years, escaped into the street and cried out for 
help. 


But not here. 


Here, there is social democracy. And the soft peach blossoms of social democracy, its 
gentle social programs, from these progressive things the broken soul of man starts to 
feel good. This strange technical urge to construct a secret underground room will never 
reach these outskirts; here we have a ventilation system, whose openings on the garden 
lawn are disguised as miniature clay windmills. 


Those dark feverish fits of the mind, they cool down in the chilly mist of the outskirts; 
the breath of distant blue glaciers, it freezes those sick thoughts in a man’s head. Vaasa. 
You’d rather live there. 


And then, one Tuesday morning when there are white clouds in the blue sky, four sisters 
- Maj (5), Anni-Elin (12), Malin (13), and Charlotte Lund (14) - go to the beach to swim 
together. They take two real in cash, four pairs of swimming clothes, food and drinks, 
and two large towels in two beach bags. At 9:30 a.m. they board the horse-drawn tram 
from Lovisa, a suburb of Vaasa. The tram driver remembers them well. Today, twenty 
years later, it is the highlight of the day for Roland, who lives in a nursing home, when 
he can talk about it: “The eldest bought tickets for everyone. To Charlottesjal. Forty 
cents. Ten cents per ticket. If they had gone even one stop further, it would have been 
twenty cents per ticket. I remember it very well. That’s where the country lines start 
and the tariff is twice as high. But my goodness, what a beautiful girl! So polite, too! 
That oldest one, Char-lot-te!” the old man rattles rhythmically. “I didn’t know it yet, 
I read it in the newspaper later. And then I went straight to the police, without delay, 
every second counted.” 


At 10:25 a.m. the girls get off at Charlottesjal beach. They thank the tram driver one by 
one, as they are good children. It’s hot on the beach that morning, and there are only a 
few people. 


The girls then meet Agnetha the ice cream shop saleswoman. Agnetha is still a student 
twenty years ago and works in an ice cream shop for her summer job. Malin and Anni- 
Elin buy four ice creams: two vanilla, one lime and one chocolate. The rest of the girls 
can’t be seen. The blinds are drawn to block out the sun, and the only uncovered win- 
dow is next to the counter, presenting a commercial display. On a weekday morning, 
the clientele is sparse, young Agnetha knows the girls and their well-established taste 
preferences. Peppermint, Malin’s favourite, is not available on that day and thus a lit- 
tle confusion arises. Unexpectedly, in addition to ice cream, the girls also buy three 


‘Masonry heater 


meat pies in oil batter. This brings the bill to one real and fifty cents. The girls exit the 
store and Agnetha notices a Man in their company from the uncovered window next to 
the counter. There’s nothing more Agnetha can remember about the Man. Age, height, 
clothing, whether there was more than one Man - or, as Agnetha would later wonder - 
if there even was a Man? 


This is the last time the girls are ever seen again. 


The four daughters of Ann-Margret, who had been sworn in as Minister of Education two 
days ago and paper manufacturer Karl Lund, disappear. The press starts a years-long 
love affair with the case, every little detail is brought out in newspaper columns, and 
thus the Lund girls are brought deep into the memory of the nation. The disappearance 
story itself became one of the most prestigious unsolved cases across the Real Belt. 


At about 12:40, five hours and twenty minutes before six o’clock, when the girls are 
expected home, and about thirty minutes before the ice cream shop, three boys are 
sitting in the living room. The sun is shining through the strip curtains making the room 
look golden, the boys are classmates for two of the sisters. The tall freckled boy is 
holding a phone to his ear. 


“Come on, call already, do it!” urges the blonde boy from behind. 
“Well, it doesn’t make a great impression if I call like three hours before we agreed...” 


The fat lilmara immigrant pulls on the sleeve of the tall boy: “Really, Tereesz, call. Some- 
thing’s wrong!” 

“IT know, I know,” says Tereesz, and the steel dial rings under his finger. 

The terrible noise of time approaches, the most violent sound in the world. There is no 


longer a golden light that falls on the room, but a very deep Pale. All the distances there 
are insurmountable, there is a horror vacui between every object and the next. 


2. CLASS REUNION 


Inayat Khan pours himself a glass of mors”. A drop of pink liquid drips from his chin 
onto his tie. The suit fits poorly and the buttons tear. It gives off the impression that 
he’s an idiot. 


“A fat idiot with a bright blue tie,” he thinks. “I shouldn’t have come.” 


“Go on, see your friends! Who were they again? That von Fersen, he was a nice guy 
and...” 


“He wasn’t my friend, he was a psycho-terrorist. I despised him, that arrogant little 
upstart.” 


“... he’s grown up to be an esteemed man now...” 


“He’s grown up to be a ruthless careerist, a vile guy, a racist too. I remember what he 
called me. Do you want me to tell you what he called me, mother?” 


“...and Tereesz and Jesper! Jesper is also well known now...” 
“Camel shit. Mum, he called me camel shit.” 


Khan watches the magnetic tape slide across the reader. The plastic discs rotate in 
the machine in a mesmerising way, the magnet becomes music, a slow song, and for a 
moment it seems as if those dots of light are creeping across the walls and floor of the 
auditorium again. Like stars in the sky, or a swarm of jellyfish deep underwater. The 
dots of light dance on Malin Lund’s white dress, and his hand starts to feel sweaty on 
the girl’s waist. What do you say? Time stands still, the music fades and Malin Lund’s 
dark green eyes are reflected in Khan’s thick-framed dialectical materialist glasses. 


Halla mig har... 


“Uh...” A woman, probably from a parallel class, stops next to the man. She starts to say 
something but then pretends to reach for a snack. Neither of them came. Khan is alone, 
and the woman in a pantsuit is in a pantsuit. Can’t just stand around, either, have to 
manage somehow. 


He pulls a magic pen out of his pocket. There, beneath the glass, Sapurmat Knezinski, 
Chairman of the Presidium of the People’s Republic of Samara, smiles his hearty histor- 
ical black and white smile straight into the camera. To his left, a man with a rat’s face 
is leaning on the railing of the boat, wearing a black leather coat from the secret police 
force. “Behold, the elusive commissar!” Khan says and flips the pen. The man with the 
rat’s face disappears under the glass. Only the chairman of the Presidium, Sapurmat 
Knezhinsky himself, together with Uhotomsky, a groveller, who is exceptionally adept 
at giving embarrassing criticisms, remains. Where there used to be a commissar, there 
is now an empty reeling. You can now see the part of the bridge that was behind the 
commissar before. 


“Very interesting,” says the woman in a pantsuit and looks searchingly over her shoulder. 
Khan wipes away a piece of hair stuck to his forehead. In his other hand, he still holds 


2 fruit drink popular in Russia and other Slavic countries, made from berries, particularly lingonberry and 
cranberry, or sometimes bilberries, strawberries, raspberries, etc. It is non-carbonated and made by mixing 
the berries with sugar and lemon juice then boiling the mixture; it can also be made by combining pure juice 
with sweetened water. 


a pen, which he now looks at with an oblivious smile, muttering to himself, “There is a 
commissar, there is no commissar.” 


The smile flickers for a moment and then disappears from the man’s double-chinned 
face. Khan’s big, sad eyes watch the hustle and bustle of grown-ups in the lobby. The 
promotion of ’56 is calling out for each other. Handshakes are exchanged, and children’s 
pictures in wallets are shown. 


There is a commissar, there is no commissar. 


A man in his thirties sits on the parquet floor in a spacious room. The parquet is freshly 
varnished, the interior designer’s blonde hair falling over his brow. He sits with his legs 
crossed, and his fine white hands clasped. When the man looks up, the room’s interior 
is reflected back at him from the floor-to-ceiling windows. Behind him, in the dim light 
- the skeletal minimalism of the designer furniture, the stone countertop kitchenette, 
and two analogue speakers stood out like dark obelisks. A solitary spirit looms over the 
room. A beige Perseus Black overcoat hangs on its stand and a shoe rack holds white 
suede shoes worth three thousand real. 


His hand is on the dimmer switch, and the light fades. The room’s reflection disappears 
and outside the floor-to-ceiling window, a sea of ferns begins. The dark green glow 
fades into the darkness beneath the fir trees. Usually, he sits here listening to music, 
but tonight it’s so quiet you can hear the rain pattering on the ferns. 


Jesper de la Guardie also did a lot of nose candy in his twenties, when he and his fel- 
low thinkers developed the world-famous IIldad minimal design language. Then they 
scurried together between the cafe of the Union of Architects and the restrooms of a 
prestigious interior design office, congratulated each other on inventing the future and 
sipped on bottled water: “This project we are making, it rules, through its language of 
images we will define human visual cognition for the next century” and “One day I will 
write a book about it!. Tasteless people are wicked people, evil is tasteless. Is it really 
so inconceivable, then, that simple, clean interior design will make the world a better 
place?” 


Then nose candy went out of fashion, but bottled water stayed. Jesper takes a sip and 
stands up, adjusts the tie of his V-neck sweater, lifts the phone from the hook and calls 
a taxi. 


The lights of the concrete cube beneath the fir trees go out as the machine takes off with 
Jesper into the dark woods, leaving behind a cloud of burnt fuel. In the empty house, a 
telephone rings between the glass walls - a white device on a wooden cube table with 
an exceptionally beautiful appearance. 


It’s dark. 


International Collaboration Police agent Tereesz Machejek steps off a train in Magne- 
sium Hall. The steadily intensifying rain makes the steel monoliths of the carriages shine. 
There they tower, suspended by a rope railing in the sky above the platform. Steam rises 
from underneath the wagons, from hot magnets and drifts in billowing clouds on the as- 
phalt of the platform. Machejek takes his suitcases from the conductor and moves with 
the crowd into the train station building. 


Figure 1: Magnet Train (by Aleksander Rostov) 


A coin drops into the metal slot of the pay phone. The ringback tone calls and the Inter- 
national Collaboration Police agent practises saying “hello” normally and relaxed while 
holding the phone. The freckles on his cheeks and the bridge of his nose have faded 
completely with time, his face a permanent frown. No one answers, the man takes the 
address from his briefcase along with directions and decides on the tram. 


The dark shape of the Magnesium Hall towers over the city. Luminous elevator cabins 
descend from its belly to Vaasa like dandelion umbrellas. In one of them, Agent Machejek 
watches as the only metropolis of the Nordic countries glows beneath his feet. The 
elevator window is dripping with rain, and in the distance, the low, flat city in the North 
Sea dissolves into an archipelago of light. Telefunken’s slender mast alone rises from 
the saturnine green mass of buildings. Motorcycles meander there, glowing golden, and 
traffic on cycles is as smooth as a dream. There is Konigsmalm - a commercial centre 
- and directly below lies Saalem, where the colourful lights of the immigrant district 
flow on the asphalt. Horse-drawn trams emerge from under the canopy of the manége, 
climb the slopes, and disappear with a clatter under shiny green chestnuts. The tracks 
scatter among Lovisa’s tens and hundreds of parks, leading to university islands and 
social housing estates where the city quietly gives way to coniferous forests. Far away 
in the suburbs, the lights go out, and Machejek feels the summer resorts, empty beaches, 
and pine forests shivering in the rain. From there, the real Katla begins, and over its 
dark ridges, clear-cuts, and valleys, the frozen winds approach from behind winter’s 
orbit® already by the end of September. 


3“Winter’s orbit” is a reference to a cut-off similar to the Arctic Circle in our world. 


Chestnut leaves swirl under the canopy of the manége building into the waiting pavilion, 
where a girl with a baby voice announces route numbers and delays through a loud- 
speaker. The structure’s framework echoes back at her, leaves are sticking to the glass 
of the pavilion and the windows of the horse-drawn trams, and the air is filled with the 
smell of their manure. A Collaboration Police agent steps into the crowded carriage with 
a briefcase in hand. On top of the briefcase, the contours of the isolas, the emblem of 
the Collaboration Police, take flight like a soaring bird of prey. 


“Private detective,” lies Khan. He is not a private detective. A private detective is a fan- 
tastic fusion. It borrows the obesity and oily hair from his own career as a collector of 
disappearance memorabilia in his parents’ basement and mixes in his more successful 
classmate, Tereesz Machejek, an agent in the Missing Persons Division of the Interna- 
tional Collaboration Police. The fantastic fusion has served Khan faithfully on several 
occasions. This is not one of those times. 


“I’m sorry, I didn’t hear you.” A woman in a pantsuit is distracted. 


“Private detective. More specifically - I’m looking for missing people. Then, when the 
police and law enforcement have given up, friends or families, mostly families, come 
to me. And then I... I do my best.” In the background, Sven von Fersen presents a 
former class teacher with a collection of his witty management articles, looking very 
cosmopolitan. You wouldn’t think that people with yellow skin and exotic names would 
be referred to as camel shit in his vocabulary. 


“Oh...” he turns to Khan. “So you’re looking for them. Still.” 


“Yeah, okay, that was it, at first. True. But I’ve learned that too and... one thing led to 
another.” The man in the bright blue tie is sweating. He’s losing patience. “And besides 
- so what, listen! Half the conversations around here are on that subject. Now tell me 
you're not interested.” 


“First of all, half the conversations here aren’t on that subject. You think they are, but 
they’re not. And secondly, of course, I do, but I think the whole thing is, well, sad.” 


“What’s sad?” 


“This subject. The people who still talk about it. They still write in the newspaper that 
they saw some woman somewhere and it looked like Malin or what Anni would look like 
now and so on.” 


“Go fuck yourself!” 


The people around the snack table fall silent and look in the direction of Khan and von 
Fersen. The woman in the pantsuit is getting uncomfortable. She looks away. The sweaty 
man with the dialectical materialist glasses shoves the remaining half of the pretzel in 
his mouth and makes his way into the dressing room. 


Chestnut trees in front of the gymnasium sway in the wind. Leaves fly onto the stairs, 
sidewalks and mud puddles. The surface of the water shimmers, as the car comes to a 
screeching halt. The taxi door closes and then a pair of white suede shoes worth three 
thousand real step into the puddle. The interior designer curses as he takes three long 
steps away from the puddle. Angrily accepting the splashes of mud on his shoes, he puts 
the briefcase under his arm and walks up the stairs to the lobby. 


10 


It’s warm inside, it smells like glue. Jesper walks through the lobby, the worn parquet 
floor creaking under his shoes. He takes the name tag from the smiling volunteer and 
puts it in the back pocket of his trousers. 


“You should put it on your chest, they are there for everyone to recognise each other.” 
“Yes,” says Jesper. And leaves the label in his pocket. 


Portraits from the yearbook and class photos are lined up on the stand. VIII B. A short 
blonde boy with a head too big for his shoulders and a lock of hair combed behind his 
ear. To the left is an overweight lilmaraa immigrant child wearing an ill-fitting tie. Little 
Khan stares blurrily past the camera. The tall freckled kojko in the back row of “lanklets” 
suggested he take off his glasses. So as to look less lame. 


Slowly, the man’s gaze moves along the VIII B rows, anxiety growing in his heart. His 
imagination precedes him. Somewhere in the middle of the girls’ row, a massive cluster 
of hydrogen fusion reactions, a distant constellation of matter, shines. 


It was eight years ago when Jesper’s sharp sketch first appeared on the glossy paper 
cover of a design booklet. Admittedly, the spotlight still had to be shared with two other 
coked-up visionaries. There they were, the three of them on a photoshoot, sitting on 
their flagship sofa. The Softbox was diffusing, Fakkengaff was playing, and underneath 
it all was written “pioneers”, “the future”, “sophisticated” and much more, all of which he 
remembers very well. Two hours later, Jesper sat alone in his glowing cube, scrunchie in 
hand, on a morbidly large stack of classroom photos and newspaper cuttings. One glance 
at the spruce trees swaying in the wind and the temptation to take another look to see 
if the smell had worn off was overcome. The scrunchie was sorted into the “household 
waste” box and the girls’ folder into “packaging”. Jesper stood in the middle of the room 
and exhaled deeply. Enough. It’s over now. 


But where are they? Why aren’t they here? Why are neither of them here? Disappointed, 
Jesper is already taking a step back to look over all the pictures properly when suddenly 
a thirty-four-year-old man stops in the middle of the lobby. 


This man still lives with his mother. 


Early spring, twenty years ago. 


Little Inayat Khan falls headfirst into a mud puddle covered with a thin layer of ice. His 
woollen reindeer sweater is muddy, and dark red blood drips from his nose. Despite the 
many warnings and worried suggestions to stay on the ground, the boy manages to get 
up, slowly and unsteadily, falling down once again. Finally, he stands face to face with 
Sven von Fersen, just a few metres away. The mud dries on little Khan’s face, his hands 
rise in an awkward battle stance. His fists shake with anger and humiliation. 


“Hey, do you know what he said?” von Fersen starts again. 


The despicable little lackey knows what Khan said, but still asks, “Tell me, what did he 
say, Sven?” 


Sven is not stingy with his answer: “He walked Malin home and kissed her. Can you 
believe it, Khan the Leech took her home, Leechy Khan kissed her!” 


Laughter echoes, and the lackey quickly chimes in: “Why do you have to talk such hurtful 
nonsense? It’s your own fault! If you talk such hurtful nonsense, it’s your own fault. Do 
you think it’s nice for Malin to hear such hurtful nonsense? Huh? Is it?” 


11 


Tears of anger draw lines on the cheeks of the boy with a reindeer sweater. Yesterday 
after school, Khan let his imagination run wild. It was a terrible mistake. The sun comes 
out from behind a cloud, and he already sees, from the spectators’ circle some tens of 
meters away, how Malin Lund’s blonde hair shines like a halo. The girl blushes with 
shame. Charlotte, the oldest of the sisters, puts her hand on Malin’s shoulder, and they 
turn their spring jacketed backs. 


“Don’t you think your sweater should have some, I don’t know, camels on it?” a shout 
rings out like a curved sword through the schoolyard as Khan lunges desperately towards 
von Fersen. Though he slips a bit, in his mind he still sees how the sharp spear of 
Amistad’s epic hero, Ramout Karzai, pierces the enemy’s chest. 


The distance shrinks, and an animalistic collision seems inevitable. But suddenly, from 
the corner of his eye, he sees an unknown factor that stops him, the other hand held up 
like a stop sign against von Fersen’s stiff chest. 


With outstretched arms, Jesper, a blonde lock on his forehead, spits out his gum and 
unleashes a barrage of “Who cares, Sven, don’t start fucking around” arguments. Khan 
tries to break free from his deskmate’s grip, his scratched cheek and bloody nose smear- 
ing Jesper’s shoulder. 


So they stand. The bell rings, and the lunch break is over. The courtyard empties of 
children, and Jesper wipes his shoulder with a napkin. “So did you kiss Malin?” he asks. 


“No. But I did walk her home. And it went well. Very well.” 
“Except that it didn’t go that well.” 
“Yeah.” 


“That’s the same shirt! Tell me, Khan, that it’s not the same shirt!” 
“Jesper!” 


Two adults stand in a cloakroom and shake hands for the first time in years. Jesper’s 
flickering smile carries a hint of warmth. He begins: “I think I behaved a little rudely 
the last time we saw each other. I understand now - it was a mistake.” 


Khan simply laughs in response. His two-day-old stubble wobbles along with his friendly 
double chin. 


“T left an ignorant impression on you.” Having said that, Jesper pauses for a moment to 
think about what he has planned next. “I have news. Something new.” He points to his 
folder and looks at Khan questioningly. “Or have you, I don’t know, become a chef in the 
meantime?” 


“You know, I’m always hardcore.” 


Without even a hint of a class reunion, Khan takes his jacket from the dressing room and 
they head towards the door. 


“Look, a disappearing commissioner!” 
“Tt’s not so bad.” 


“T made one for Tereesz too. It’s a special version. The same picture, but guess what 
happens if you turn it a little further?” 


“What happens?” 


12 


“Uhotomski disappears too! One pigeon too. It’s partly behind Uhotomski.” 
“Otherwise, half a pigeon would be left hanging in the air.” 
“Exactly.” 


Drops of rain fall from Agent Machejek’s umbrella, and a puff of smoke floats in the 
shadow of the umbrella and then disappears into the wind. With his “Astra” in mouth, 
the man folds the map and puts it in his briefcase. In front of him is the high school 
lawn, where two men run through a silver rain curtain towards him. The kojko takes a 
step back in his grey fishbone-patterned coat. He makes room under the umbrella, it’s 
enormous. It’s standard issue for the Collaboration Police. 


“Did he apologise?” 
“He apologised,” Khan replies for Jesper. 
“Ts it... nice there?” Machejek points towards the school building. 


Khan shakes his head and Jesper elaborates: “Let’s go to the city instead. There’s one 
place. One new place.” 


The three men under the large umbrella walk until they can’t be seen anymore. The 
distant chiming of bells draws closer as the silver curtains are pulled together behind 
the friends’ backs... 


Eight years ago. 


... until the Stereo 8 format tape clicks against the magnetic reader, needles under lit- 
tle lamps hitting twelve decibels. The beat is unbearably smooth, even more modern 
than nose candy. Or who knows, it’s hard to say. The beat comes from here, from the 
world-famous Vaasa recording studios. The beat was made by someone semi-mythical, 
Fakkengaff, who may be an Oranjese immigrant, a DJ, and a music producer, but is rather 
a group of people or a machine in the sky. The nose candy, however, came from a pirate 
ship through the uncharted Pale. The nose candy was made by a slave dreaming of a 
revolution and an overseer guarding the fields with a rifle. Fakkengaff made the beat so 
that the girls would start dancing and the boys would have a good view. The slave with 
machetes made the nose candy so that La Puta Madre wouldn’t send his family to the fir- 
ing squad. For six months, the nose candy matured on the Irmala high mountain plateau, 
in the golden rays of the sun. The world eagle, with its thousand-kilometre wings, kept 
the sun from falling from the turquoise blue sky. The place where the beat seems to go 
underwater for half a minute and then comes back - even more amazing than it sounds! 
- Fakkengaff whispered to the spirit of debauchery. He had angelic white wings, but his 
breath next to the ear of the DJ crouched behind the mixing console was hot, smelling 
of cinnamon and primal malice. 


My God, what a lovely numbness in the nose. My God, how good is that place where the 
beat comes out of the water. So sad. Even fiercer than before. How cool am I?!! I’m on 
the cover there, I’m so cool on the cover there. I’m a pillar of light, vertical, and there’s 
a dark room around me. And that’s it, that’s all there is, you see? 


The guests on Jesper’s white cube sofa and behind the multifunctional table exchange 
impressions of the world exhibition. Champagne-socialist goblets are also clinked. Jes- 
per alone, dancing like a rare albino rooster. From the water bottle in his right hand, 
pearly drops fly to the windows. 


13 


Like times that have already been and gone, the streets of Vaasa drift by the taxi window. 
A large black horse clenches its teeth, its breath rising from its nostrils. Something sweet 
seeps into the shattered heart of the Collaboration Police agent. The rain subsides, and 
young people slowly fold their umbrellas in the darkness. Metro entrances, familiar 
place names. A girl on a bicycle turns towards a side street where the yellow streetlights 
are steaming. Traffic reflects from the windows of buildings and closed shops until a 
motorway rises above the sidewalks. The passing city flashes through the cracks of the 
stone edges, and a little boy waves to Machejek from the window of a passing car. 


On Konigsmalm Bridge, the passing streetlights become a dotted line. The grey silhou- 
ette of the prestigious residential area towers over the water, where Tereesz’s home was 
when he lived in Vaasa as a child. Ahead, behind the windshield of the carriage, begins 
the island district that had a dubious reputation twenty years ago. As Jesper explains 
now, careful development work and some groundbreaking galleries have made it the 
next “trend area” after Ostermalm. 


“Bourgeois-bohemian, you mean?” 


The taximeter ticks, it’s warm and dark inside. Jesper doesn’t even acknowledge 
Tereesz’s witty comment. 


“Hey, talk then,” Khan changes the mixed topic of urban development and class reunion 
suddenly. 


“T need a projector. There’s also a tape, I’ll talk when we arrive at café ‘Cinema’.” 
“But show us the scrunchie,” Tereesz joins in with the begging. 


“Come on, don’t start. I don’t carry it with me, I threw it away. It was a very weird time 
altogether...” 


A cunning smile appears on Khan’s face: “Jesper, don’t be a spoil-sport!” 
“Yeah, don’t be a spoil-sport, show it to the class.” 
Jesper looks out the window: “No.” 


A silent moment passes. The hum of wheels on the road, the clicking of a turn signal. 
Khan and Tereesz look at each other, chuckling, and Jesper pretends to be indifferent, 
looking out the window. Only a little later does he feel the obligation to pick up the 
conversation again. 


“What did you tell Fersen? The detective story?” 
“Scrunchie! Jesper, the scrunchie! Show it!” 


In a resigned manner, the interior designer reaches into his Perseus Black overcoat and 
takes out a ring box. 


Everything was so good and now it’s so sad. Talking about funk! aesthetics and futurism 
with a young real estate developer’s photographer wife under the window, there was 
a feeling that everything was going to be like this from now on, that normalcy would 
never return. But now, the woman singing through the monolith loudspeakers says ten 
thousand times in a row that she’s in love, in love, in love... Outside the window, the 
morning grey sinks through the ferns, cold and damp. It doesn’t feel like that anymore. 
That the song is about Jesper. Now it’s just some singer in a studio. Maybe I should do 
it again. I just did it, and it didn’t feel any better. I don’t know, maybe I should still do it. 


14 


A minute later, in the milky grey light in the centre of the room, stands a newly twenty- 
six-year-old version of Jesper de la Guardie who has just stepped up to a higher league. 
His coffee-coloured shirt is unbuttoned, his nostrils are red, and his mouth is set in an 
angry sneer. 


“So. The party’s over. Go home.” 


No one hears him, Fakkengaff is too loud. With the stop button of the stereo 8-format 
tape player under his finger, the pillar suddenly falls silent in the middle of the light. 
Heads turn. 


“Party’s over. Back home, you filth.” 


Jesper’s glassy eyes and monstrously disdainful mouth droop as clothes and handbags 
are awkwardly searched for. A pat on the shoulder from a fellow visionary earns him a 
look that can forever ruin human relationships. 


The real estate developer’s photographer wife falls slightly behind the group in front 
of the house and then returns to the concrete cube. “Anklet!” she lies. Long legs in 
strapped sandals, a silver chain around her ankle frame the next sad sight. Jesper sits 
amidst the scattered garbage sorting bags in the kitchen corner. He looks up at the 
kind face of the real estate developer’s wife amidst the apple cores, empty water bottles, 
and handmade paper bags of pasta. The foggy September beach reflected in his eyes 
indicates that Jesper is not interested. Your condolences - no thank you. The high reeds 
rustle in the wind, and the silhouettes of changing cabins stand in line under the grey- 
white sky. Four girls run across the sand and disappear into thin air. 


In his right hand, the interior designer holds a light pink scrunchie. Khan looks up at 
Jesper, a ring box in his hand under his nose. His eyebrows are furrowed, he is worried. 
The car jolts when it stops. The taxi driver sticks his head into the cabin but quickly 
turns away after seeing the expressions on the faces of the men. 


“The smell is gone,” Khan says. 
“T know.” 
“There’s something very wrong with it.” 


“T know.” 


15 


3. NON-ENTITY 


The Romangorod Conference distinguishes between ten different types of missing peo- 
ple. The ninth of them, non-entity, is a flagrant violation of the International Bill of Hu- 
man Rights. Such a person has not only been eliminated by a state’s organ of violence 
but the documentation of his or her former existence has also been lost. This particular 
case of political fading, the cursing of memory, has been inflicted on a number of histor- 
ical figures with varying degrees of success. In the case of Mesque, for example, a loss 
of as much as ten per cent of the historical scale of the entire culture can be statistically 
established. We can’t dwell on the successful examples - it would be impossible to talk 
about a day that did not happen. But small signs are left behind of all of us, and the 
censor is also human. 


Thus, it may happen that the citizen erased is, thanks to their non-entity, a consider- 
ably more recognised historical figure than their colleague who was simply shot in the 
head behind a dumpster. What other prominent narrative could have saved the Samara 
Communist Party’s cut-throat Julius Kuznitsky from the obscurity of history if not for 
this funny photo? As the recording techniques develop, even more complicated pro- 
cesses have been added to the former craft of filing the emperor’s head off coins. For a 
well-oiled degenerate-bureaucratic country of workers, a little spring-cleaning of their 
punched cards is not much of a challenge. But in the photographic age, and in some 
particularly curious examples in the film age, cleaning takes on a certain technical sub- 
tlety. One that we can already admire in the case of the aforementioned disappearing 
commissar Julius Kuznitsky who was made to disappear by the photo retoucher’s magic 
wand on board the steamboat ”Mazov” on that gloomy Sunday morning. 


Julius was a disgusting man, an uneducated hick. His young eyes did not see the world 
revolution - the commissar’s stellar flight began later, in Samara. Without having the 
slightest imagination of Mazov’s idea, however, he did not think much of giving the 
victims titles with politically incriminating connotations. This was his undoing in the 
end. Apparently, one day, the Chairman of the Bureau, Mr. Knezinski, simply could 
not bear the embarrassment any longer. “Tell me, Kusnja, how can it be that comrade 
Zdorov is a counter-revolutionary when the revolution was fifty years ago? And why are 
comrade Bronski’s Landzovlik-Knezhinskyist beliefs ‘irreversibly narrow-minded’? I am 
Knezinsky, Sapurmat Knezinsky, that is my name!” 


In some circles, the two images - the original and the retouching - have become a popular 
cultural phenomenon. The rat’s smile that Kuznitsky wore on his face that day adds 
spiritual value to the curiosity. Just look at him! Who wouldn’t want to wipe this foul 
weasel from the existence of history? 


Much sadder is the story of the third figure in that same fateful photo. Aram Uhotomski, 
Mazov’s loyal revolutionary friend from the Eleven-Day Government, an outstandingly 
talented agronomist, geneticist, and one of the three breeders of the Ulan yellow potato. 


An extraordinarily apolitical figure, whose unpretentious behaviour and indispensable 
contribution to the diet of the world’s working classes saved him from a total of three dis- 
missals. That is until Uhotomski’s scientific impartiality at the XXI Geneticists’ Plenum 
offended someone’s feelings. It turns out that modern genetics is simply not compatible 
with the tabula rasa philosophy of Kneshinskyism, in which, in a revolutionary state of 
mind, even the seeds of gooseberry can be converted into figs. 


With horror, Uhotomski discovered he was titling himself a small clay worm when speak- 


16 


ing in front of the presidium. Never having written criticisms about himself before, the 
poor scholar overstrained so blatantly, that even in the then-lush atmosphere of self- 
deprecation, it was difficult for those present to listen to his words. Since this mem- 
orable performance, Uhotomski’s name has been associated specifically with the epi- 
thet of grovelling. Completely compromised as a historical figure, the merciful chair- 
man Knezinski decided to spare the memory of an older and once much more dignified 
comrade and sent him behind a dumpster during the Nine Process, then later had all 
notes of Uhotomski’s existence removed. However, the historical forgery failed, as the 
retoucher absent-mindedly left one remarkable photo unprocessed, where Uhotomski 
was still present. The same one where commissar Julius Kuznitski had previously disap- 
peared into obscurity. 


Technically the most impressive, however, is the story of the fall from grace of Ignus 
Nielsen - a prophet and Mazov’s schoolteacher. Despite being a noteworthy figure in 
the history of the communist movement, he became a disembodied spirit in the hands of 
the Vaasa censors. Mazov’s apocalyptic bloodthirsty character suddenly became some- 
how burdensome for the image of the social democratic Nordic countries. So they con- 
cocted Nielsen’s disappearance with Graad, following the newly defeated revolution. To 
the dismay of the censors, dozens of hours of film material were shot of Mazov during 
the technically advanced Eleven-Day Government, where the revolutionary icon was al- 
most always accompanied by his best friend and comrade-in-arms, Nielsen. Destroying 
all the material would have raised suspicions. And so it was that an elliptical grey cy- 
toplasm hovers permanently to Mazov’s right. It took historians decades to solve this 
eerie mystery. 


Even today, many believe that the cytoplasm is Communism itself. 


17 


4. VIDKUN HIRD 


A 12-millimeter film is running in the projector. Khan is sitting on a sofa with Machejek, 
looking suspiciously at his square coffee cup on a square plate. He takes a spoon to stir 
the sugar, approaching the cup cautiously. The café named “Cinema” is all glass and 
white. Jesper, who is sitting on a white chair and adjusting the projector, is surrounded 
by glass soundproof walls. The white canvas falls onto the glass plaque, and the sofa 
where Khan and Machejek are sitting is also white. In the middle of the café’s glass 
vitrine is a statue of an albino tiger. Just be careful not to break anything - it’ll cost you 
dearly. 


“Let me guess,” the agent twirls his “Astra” in his fingers, making it as soft as he likes. 
“Your design?” 


“One of my students’. This place is like a cinema screen, a blank white sheet, and we 
are projected here, you know? How is it? It’s not comfortable, the screen, you know?” 


“It’s a bit uncomfortable.” 


“Well, he’s a bit nervous, yes, but the boy is talented. He needed a high-visibility project, 
and this is the only place where he can get behind the projector quickly. So let’s try to 
keep an open mind, you know,” Jesper and the tiger look at Khan. The glass eyes of the 
tiger are brighter than the interior designer’s. 


“Hey, man, I am!” 
Machejek takes a pencil and a notebook out of his jacket pocket. 


“So,” Jesper starts, “One of my colleagues’ relatives works as an operator. Makes docu- 
mentaries. Last fall, he told me about his new project. With Gessle. Do you know Konrad 
Gessle?” 


“He mainly does crime stuff, right?” 


“Not just that. Gosta, that’s my operator’s name, tells me how scared he is to do it and 
asks me if he should do it. He has a child now, and so on. The thing is, the film is about 
- and then I became interested - Vidkun Hird.” 


“Oh my God!” 
“T don’t want Vidkun Hird!” 


“Wait, wait! Same here, that’s been done, he was in Arda, couldn’t be in Vaasa and so 
on. But I still decided to keep an eye on him, you know? And then, two weeks ago, Gosta 
came to talk to me. They’re on the verge of a breakthrough. Vidkun Hird has been in 
Kronstadt with them for six months...” 


“No way!” 


“... and they have a strategy there: to impress Hird. Gessle likes Hird, Gessle is Nordic, 
white as snow, well-read, and a good debater. So, Hird wants to impress the interviewer, 
starts to chat, to brag. Gessle gives the impression that there have been plenty of those 
wildly imaginative rapists, and what can’t Vidkun Hird do?” 


“Uh-huh...” 


“The first three months, Vidkun just hints, piques curiosity, drops suspicious dates, talks 
about going to the beach. Gessle doesn’t notice, discusses philosophy with Vidkun, over- 


18 


coming good and evil, I have it all written down here,” Jesper pats the folder on the glass 
cube table. “Then one day, Hird has had enough.” 


The man flicks a switch and a small bulb in the projector’s heart lights up. “I must warn 
you now,” he looks towards Khan. “Those of us whose profession doesn’t involve ditches 
and missing children may take some of what Vidkun says to heart.” 


Tereesz puts a sixth spoonful of sugar into his black coffee and pauses for a moment. 
After a very obvious pause, he plunges his needle-sharp pencil into the pencil sharpener 
and pretends to busy himself, a bitter grin on his face. 


“Dude, when are you going to get it? Ditches and missing children - that’s your subject 
too.” 


“Okay, Khan,” sighs Jesper, “ditches and missing children. That’s my subject.” 


“Ditches and missing children?” Tereesz abruptly and gleefully raises his sugar- 
stretched coffee cup in the air and waits. 


“Skal!” exclaims Khan. 


“Skal,” says Jesper and scoops a slice of lime out of the water glass. His eyebrow fur- 
rowed thoughtfully at the sour taste, he chews on it. 


“The tape, Jesper?” 
“Obh...” 


A superhuman, rapist, child molester and former member of the NFD fascist party 
“Hjelmdall”, Vidkun Hird appears on the white screen. With one hand cuffed to a chair, 
the other placed gentlemanly on his cheek, the futuristic philosopher is aware of the 
camera’s presence. With this in mind, he raises his Nordic bulldog chin to a certain 
noble angle; there he glances up and down from his eye sockets. His hair carefully 
combed to one side in a thirty-year-old manner, and his leg over his knee. You can say 
that Vidkun is a vain man. Refusing to go down in history in his code-coloured prison 
jumpsuit, he now talks to Konrad Gessle wearing a blackshirts uniform. This was just 
one of his many conditions. 


“Some people are born posthumously,” he brags in the ancient Arda dialect. The archaic 
verbiage injects plenty of rural charm into his modernly subtle sentiment. The six-digit 
clock on the table indicates that the third hour of the interview on the 12" of August is 
underway. 


“Did you know, Vidkun, that I’ve done a master’s thesis on the old Ardic languages? I 
can smuggle in some literature for you.” 


“Oh, that would be most kind of you, Konrad, you know how I feel about the selection in 
this library.” They both murmur as if in understanding. 


“Arda is the inherent language of our tribe,” continues Vidkun in a declarative tone, “Its 
vocabulary was adapted and developed by the ancient mammoth hunters who settled 
Katla plains thousands of years ago. Arda has certain semantic advantages in basic mat- 
ters of wisdom, advantages that continental peoples lack. Arda is our nature, modern- 
day Vaasa - a metropolitan bastard. Regressed to continental, infiltrated by Graad. This 
watered-down language is incapable of expressing the truth. All the sentences in this 
dysgenic compote end up expressing the same thing: international stigma. The next 
century will see our tribe return to its original language. It will be the birth of a new era 
in terms of wisdom!” 


19 


“You've talked about it quite a lot. I also read your notes on the subject. It’s all very 
interesting, but don’t you think that your own historical character is sabotaging the 
finer points of your doctrine?” 


“What?” Hird’s eyes suddenly light up. The deep grooves in his cheeks lengthen and his 
mouth hardens contemptuously. 


Konrad pretends not to notice Vidkun’s moodiness and continues: “While I see the logic 
in your observations, don’t you think it’s hard for people to see the scientific validity of 
it coming from the mouth of a convicted child molester?” 


“Mating is an entirely different tradition for our tribe than what modern-day social-porn 
propaganda serves us with its romanticism and I don’t know what else. You know this, 
Konrad. One day, when their impotent morals have led continental peoples to extinction, 
then you will still see what I’m telling you.” 


“Well, let’s look at it from an ordinary citizen’s perspective...” 


“An ordinary citizen lets his daughter go to school with blacks and gypsies, from child- 
hood, in the racial melting pot. An ordinary citizen lets his child be raped there. You 
understand that this is what happens when four girls are put in such a school.” 


Konrad notices what the philosopher muttered under his breath, but he ignores it. “The 
ordinary citizen is the one you will consider your reader in the future. The ordinary 
citizen chooses whether your vision will be put into practice or not. You’re talking about 
the nation! And do you really think he won’t notice? The author is a fascist...” 


“Nationalist.” 


“A fascist and methodical rapist, with a life sentence in Kronstadt for at least four mur- 
ders, and a book that is a mixture of philosophy of history, eugenics and rape!” 


“History. History, Konrad. You’re a clever man, but your gay education is showing. You 
still think that history is made with master’s theses and I don’t know with what...” 


“Well, what is it made with?” the well-seasoned interviewer doesn’t lose his nerve. “By 
raping?” 


Vidkun grabs a sheet of paper from Gessle’s notebook from under his nose. A navy- 
blue uniformed soldier jumps into the frame after the sudden movement and strikes 
the tribesman’s wrist with a rubber truncheon. Hird winces in pain, and the sheet flies 
into the air. The world-famous documentarian Konrad Gessle, a three-time Oskar Zorn 
nominee, raises his hand toward the soldier. Although he lowers his truncheon, the 
soldier stays vigilant beside the man, stroking his wrist. 


“A pen,” Vidkun glares angrily at Gessle. 


With a clenched fist around his writing pen, the detainee throws triumphant glances at 
the soldier, “You! Please give me back my sheet now.” The rubber truncheon has already 
risen menacingly into the air when Gessle quickly tears a new sheet and places it on the 
steel table in front of Hird. 


“Do you see now? The crusade,” Vidkun’s carefully combed hair is in disarray, and a 
single light-brown lock dangles in front of his eyes. With his elbow holding the sheet in 
place, Hird tries to put the pen on paper, it seems sharp and dangerous in his hand. The 
man suddenly gets angry: “Please release my other hand. I can’t do it like this.” 


Upon Gessle’s pleading gaze, the soldier takes a keychain from his belt. Now, Hird 
addresses the viewer directly: “Thousands of years ago, our ancestors came here, to the 


20 


edge of the world, to this land. They came here with dog sleds, through the tremendous 
Pale. Only the strictest-willed creatures maintained their mental integrity during this 
heroic transition. The weak-minded continental creatures were left there, in the gray 
void. Our disciplined ancestors simply separated them from the herd. Those who lost 
their minds. And so, only the purified, unwaveringly determined Haakons, Gudruns, and 
other primogenitors stepped onto the Katla soil from the gray crater. Within fifty years, 
these primogenitors hunted down all the mammoths in Katla. They flourished.” Vidkun 
Hird stretches his liberated hand victoriously and begins drawing small dots on the sheet 
of paper. 


“This is a fundamental eugenic law, Konrad, fundamental. The more challenging the 
environment, the further the human being evolves beyond the steppe wall. Here, in this 
dark, snowy expanse... Man was not meant to live here. Just to survive, a superhuman 
tendency must emerge.” 


Gessle shrugs with anticipation, not interrupting and nodding understandingly. “A su- 
perhuman tendency is not limited by moral constraints. A superhuman tendency is a 
deliberate desire. Everything is possible for it, nothing is forbidden. Through blood, in 
the darkness of night, from one winter to another, it is passed down from generation to 
generation. Even in you, Konrad, there is a superhuman tendency.” 


Konrad nods. Vidkun Hird’s face turns an unhealthy red. The redness is somewhere 
between fever and an allergic rash. “All of us, including you, are obligated to amplify 
this primordial entity within ourselves. Like the jaws of a predator grow tougher from 
eating meat. Obligation... obligation to your pack. So that they too may have big jaws, 
the kind that can hold a lot of meat.” 


Vidkun admires the artwork with a proud smile that doesn’t seem to fit his face. The 
camera hasn’t yet shown exactly what’s happening on the page, but Gessle leans in 
closer to the picture. 


“A rare creature. The middle one. A unique treasure.” 


The projector hums, Jesper takes a laminated copy of Vidkun’s paper from the folder and 
places it on the table. The page carefully maps out an unfamiliar constellation, an elegant 
constellation of dozens of dots. Khan’s mouth drops open in horror. Collaboration Police 
agent Tereesz Machejek calmly makes a note in his notebook. 


“You have no idea, Konrad, how hard I fucked her. You can’t imagine...’ Hird is still 
speaking when Jesper hurriedly switches off the projector. 


June, twenty years ago. 


It’s dusky and chilly on a cliff in the pine forest by the shore. The scorching sun hangs 
over the tops of the pine trees, but only a few patches of light make it through the 
interlaced sand and root tangle to reach the forest floor, like golden spots on the ocean 
floor. For a moment, there is complete silence beneath the trees. From a hundred 
meters away, you can hear the heather crunching under the approaching boys’ sneakers 
until the sea breeze makes the pine needles rustle again. The trunks of the trees sway 
gently, a tangle of dark orange pillars with golden stripes on the sides from the sun. 
The sweet smell of resin floats in the forest. The dusty taste of chamomile, a sweet and 
bitter bouquet, lingers in Tereesz’s nostrils. A match is struck, and thick puffs from the 
stolen “Astra” cigarette sweep all the smells away, a trail of smoke clearly outlined in 
a single beam of light. Tereesz relaxes, his windbreaker over his head. He practices 
making smoke rings in the light. Just a few kilometres away in the town is his father’s 


21 


diplomatic villa. The house, so close to the popular summer beach, made Tereesz a 
popular boy three weeks ago at the beginning of summer vacation. Just as footsteps 
from the others can be clearly heard from behind the hill, Tereesz blows a small ring 
through the larger smoke ring. 


“Oh! I did it...” he exclaims, ruining his masterpiece. 


“What?” Jesper, in shorts and a sailor’s shirt, asks as he reaches the hill. “What did you 
do?” 


“The smoke ring went through the other one.” 
“You're smoking now?!” asks Jesper, startled. 
“Want some? ‘Astra’. It’s the strongest.” 


“Give me, Tereesz, I’ll have one.” Khan, who is panting, comes up beside Jesper. A 
binocular with a leather strap hangs around Khan’s neck. 


“Here,” Tereesz throws the packet towards Khan, who spills some as he fumbles with 
his hands. In his exhaustion, the boy still manages not to drop it and lifts it under his 
glasses. 


“Cool,” Khan gives the carton a professional assessment. The white stars run there on 
the blue cardboard. 


“Pointless,” Jesper says out of the corner of his mouth, and steps walks away from 
Tereesz, to the top of another hill to survey the land. 


“That shirt of yours, well that’s pointless,” Tereesz lazily stands up and offers Khan a 
match out of the matchbox. 


Jesper squints his eyes and raises his hand like a captain, surveying the forest floor 
before him. 


“Pointless, yes? Anni didn’t think so. You know, she complimented me on it. Last day.” 
“Did she now?” 

Jesper turns to Khan. The boy takes a tentative puff of smoke. 

“Hey, Khan, remember in the dressing room, Anni said that was a nice shirt?” 

“She did. Tereesz, she did say that.” 


“Fersen jumped in like a fool and told Anni she had a beautiful dress before I could. And 
something about her hair too. It was very funny.” 


“An opportunity to be polite is never missed,” Khan announces with a smile, coughing 
up some smoke. 


“Let’s go.” 


Three boys move through the patches of light sliding under the trees towards the top 
of the slope. Khan throws away his cigarette with a failed flick and starts twirling his 
binoculars on a string. His backpack shakes as he accelerates downhill. Running down 
the slopes, the other boys jump over the heather bushes, only Jesper worries about his 
white pants and strolls dignifiedly with his hands in his pockets, like on an evening walk. 
The sound of the ocean in the trees grows louder as they approach their usual spot on 
the cliff. 


22 


The wooden fence has signs of danger of collapse, where a small piece of the slope is 
falling down. Crossing the pedestrian road and climbing into the bushes from under 
the sign, Khan explains to Tereesz: “Look, they call it the North Sea, but it’s actually 
an ocean. Theoretically, it extends into your Igressi Sea through the Pale. It reaches 
Graad. This makes the North Sea inter-isolar. So it’s actually an ocean. A question of 
classification.” 


Together for the third week, the three of them try to keep their conversation as academic 
as possible. To impress everyone with their intellectual character when they return in 
the fall. Jesper, slipping carefully through the bushes behind, continues: “We didn’t have 


an 


a word for the ocean in Katla, everything was just ‘sea’. 


A huge aquamarine body of water expands in front of the boys from the high cliff edge. 
The clouds tear apart in the pale blue sky, and the bright white sun reflects as a stripe on 
the water below. The ocean waves lazily and majestically wash along the long sandy strip. 
Charlottesjal. The wind disappears for a moment, and a blast of heat hits the boys’ faces. 
Insects emerge from the foliage of flowering wild primroses. The shore curves towards 
the sea under a rocky cliff, all the way to the tip of the peninsula where Havsanglari hotel 
is located. There are small human dots on the sand with red and white striped beach 
umbrellas. The boys sit on a patch of grass among thorns, where the steep sandy cliff 
disappears quickly from view. Tereesz has theorised several times about how one could 
theoretically jump down this soft rocky slope - he would land on a gently sloping sand 
dune from a height of three meters and then slide on his heels. Jesper worries about 
his clothes in such a case, and Khan is simply a coward. Even now, Tereesz sits closest 
to the edge, while Jesper begs Khan for the binoculars. The sun spots reflect on the 
curved insect eyes of the binoculars. In the dark, cool heart of the glasses, the picture 
of people down on the beach, northern summer tourists with their towels and umbrellas, 
is magnified. The image is even clearer for Khan, who adjusts his left: +7, right: +4 
prescription lenses. Khan bought the binoculars with his own money from Vaasa, in a 
shop for hunters. 


When Jesper has scanned the beach, it’s Tereesz’s turn. With rubber cushions pressed 
into his eye sockets and his cheeks increasingly freckled from the sun, he admits: “Not 
yet, it’s only ten o’clock. They’ll come.” 


While Khan and Tereesz compare cigarette brands - Vaasa crap is said to be mild, while 
the decent stuff from Graad is more potent - Khan nods eagerly at everything. Mean- 
while, Jesper aims his sniper scope at the beach, refusing to give up. A small cross stops 
at a white beach umbrella, but does not find the red flowers it is looking for. Vertical 
lines move across young families, collapsing sandcastles, and brown-skinned sunbathers, 
stopping on two blonde girls for a moment before continuing - it’s not them. Jesper ad- 
justs his focus. From about two hundred meters away, a faint familiar feeling stirs in his 
heart, a distant constellation, a material communion. He waves his hand to signal to the 
boys that something is happening. Khan and Tereesz shield their eyes from the sun and 
look down at the beach.” 


Refining the focus of his Zeul-brand lenses, the pale pink veil sharpens into a stomach in 
Jesper’s eyes. Breathing shakes the eyepieces from the girl’s navel up to the solar plexus, 
where the curves of her chest gather in a ring holding her tanning top. White ribbons 
cut into her shoulders, and her breasts rise and fall under the fabric as she breathes. 
The wheel in the center of the binoculars clicks twice, and the expanded field of view 
settles on the beige beach towel as the girl turns onto her stomach. A flash of ash-blond 
hair and familiar round cheeks beneath sunglasses. Anni-Elin Lund lazily props herself 
up on her elbows and buries her head in a girl’s magazine. Above her small backside, an 


23 


oddly delicate constellation of birthmarks runs down her spine, extending to the wings 
of her shoulder blades. 


Cool horror seeps through the seals of the windows into the café “Cinema”, where three 
minds try to maintain their surface tension of coping for the twentieth year. Khan shrugs 
his shoulders: “Who knows this? Who knows? I haven’t read a single line about it all 
this time. It’s said nowhere!” 


Tereesz puts his pencil on the table. 


“This is called a control fact. It is deliberately left out of personal descriptions. Even 
from official documentation. I have those thirty folders in my head and there isn’t a 
single line about it. He knows it. Look at him!” 


Jesper’s face remains unchanged. He’s already been through this. “That’s why Gosta 
came to me. The officials just shrugged their shoulders. Maybe he heard at work that I 
knew the girls. They were all confused there. Hird didn’t explain anything more either. 
And by the way, I don’t believe that crap. Some boys were there for principle, but Hird 
actually likes big-breasted Gudruns.” 


“It doesn’t fit the profile, it’s not chronologically possible,” Khan livens up, “He was six 
hundred kilometres away five hours earlier, buying crankshafts and gaskets for his damn 
rape machine... I don’t know, some kind of gasket plugs.” 


Because of the noise of the infamous rape machine’s construction, Vidkun Hird’s neigh- 
bour finally called the police on him and that was the beginning of his end. Inayat Khan, 
however, looks seriously into the eyes of the Collaboration Police agent. 


“Tereesz. You have to re-open the case now. Continue the investigation. Somehow he 
has to know and it’s the only credible lead since the stuff with the letters. You have to 
do it.” 


“You can’t imagine how bad things are right now. It’s the worst time to dig old things up. 
There’s no more support from the military, everything is in a semi-state of war. No one 
knows if Oranjenrijk still exists. They’ll fire me if I start this mess again...” 


“No, Tereesz, you still have to do something about it.” Jesper, now slightly annoyed, isn’t 
interested in a looming world war. “You’re the one who does this, it’s your job. Do it!” 


“Wait now, wait! Of course, I’ll take it on. I had a feeling about this from the beginning 
when you invited me to the class reunion. Did you think I thought you were nostalgic or 
something? My own case is always open, you know, that folder doesn’t close. You just 
have to hope the locals will go along quietly. They all hate cooperating. Very rarely does 
anyone bother to check if any of the interrogation papers have been signed.” 


Khan smiles cunningly. “Interrogation papers? So you're still going to Kronstadt?” 
“Tomorrow.” 
“Good to know you’re still cool, Tereesz.” 


Jesper also smiles, a little uncomfortably due to his reddening cheeks and pressing tone. 
“But cool indeed! That’s good then.” 


Tereesz agrees. “It’s a very good thing. Twenty years. There shouldn’t be any hope left 
by then.” 


“But there is hope?” Jesper intelligently tilts his still too large head for his shoulders. 


24 


“Yes. Very good, Jesper. You’ve been very good.” 


“Check, please!” The interior designer, who has been out of the active business for the 
last two years, snaps his fingers at the waiter and points his index finger to the table. 
The evenings haven’t been easy for him. But today is different. Tonight Jesper can afford 
himself little treats. Little foolish treats. The night arrives outside the cube’s windows, 
in the dark, where anything is possible. It’s possible to find them somewhere inside a 
hidden corner of this world, from the eternal ice of Lake Vostok or from the Erg Desert, 
where Ramout Karzai disappeared without a trace, deep in the lungs of Graad... You 
can still find them. As they were then. Small. And through that, become small yourself. 
Above the clouds, at the foot of Corpus Mundi, you just have to lift the veil of raindrops a 
little and you can touch them... “You were so brave not to give up! Everyone else forgot 
about us, the night sky was dotted with cold stars, the dark blue dome of the sky spun 
above our heads, but we knew you were still looking for us.” 


25 


5. ZA/UM 


Anni-Elin Lund takes off her sunglasses and is blinded by a sudden flash of light. A 
crimson-blue swirl of colour in the girl’s irises splashes onto her pupils and the smoky 
eye makeup glints in the light. Anni’s little head turns swiftly like a kitten’s. Asun bunny 
hops from a girl’s magazine to sand, from sand to sunshade, as the girl’s eyes follow it. 


“What’s going on?” Tereesz asks, dangling his legs on the edge of the cliff. 
“T don’t know, Malin’s there now too. She’s standing...” 
“That’s what I can see from here, that she’s standing,” interrupts Khan impatiently. 


“She stands there, and I have to admit, that red-dotted swimsuit doesn’t look too bad 
on her. It’s a two-piece, as it’s a trend now, and oh! She’s just... damn!” Malin’s smile 
through the binoculars turns into a smirk, and there’s a glint of malicious glee in her 
eyes. Her hand rises to wave demonstratively above her head. The picture disappears 
as Jesper hides the treacherous lenses under his belly. 


“Down, everyone on the ground!” 


Khan hears blood rushing in his ears and feels a throb in his arm, his body halfway inside 
a thorny rosehip bush. Tereesz, who simply threw himself quickly on his back, now looks 
up at the pale June sky. A solitary sea eagle glides high above. It seems as if the bird is 
just hanging in the air. 


“Khan, look, an eagle!” 
“What fucking eagle, ow!” The rosehip bush reminds Khan of its presence sharply. 


“Don’t wiggle, you’re rustling the bush,” Jesper grumbles from the middle, lying on his 
stomach with binoculars in hand. 


“Well, if they’ve already seen us, then it doesn’t make much difference whether I rustle 
the bush or not. Hey, look what they are doing!” 


“Look for yourself,” Jesper slides the binoculars to Khan. 


The bush rustles again as Khan, wearing a loose summer shirt, crawls out of it with his 
binoculars in hand. He raises his head and tries to stay invisible behind the tall grass. 
Hurriedly, he moves the binoculars down the beach to the parasol with red flowers and 
stops on the beach towel. To his surprise, he only sees little Maj sitting and looking 
ahead. Sweat drops onto Khan’s glasses as he starts to worry. Forebodingly, he moves 
his gaze closer to the rock at the bottom until the little opera glasses are only about a 
hundred meters away, staring straight into his lenses. Standing there with one hand on 
her hip is the slender Charlotte, eldest of the sisters with her auburn hair flowing in the 
wind. This beautiful and terrifying creature from the ninth grade is about as far away 
from Khan’s immigrant grasp as a seat in the parliament. And now she’s so close that 
even without Malin’s opera glasses her gaze pierces Khan’s miserable eyes. Eyes that 
he now hides rather than amplify with his binoculars. 


“Good Lord, they’ve got some little binoculars with them,” Khan informs the emergency 
meeting. 


“That’s what they were pointing at yesterday, I know, I should have told you...” 


“What, Tereesz?” Jesper suddenly gets angry, “So they know, you let us walk straight 
into a trap just now!” 


26 


“T forgot, sorry. I thought they may be watching that eagle. You know, its nest is right 
here near the cliff too...” 


“You can stick that eagle up your ass.” Khan laughs hard at this and Jesper continues: 
“Now all we have to do is stand up and wave at them and that’s it. I don’t know what 
we’re going to say about this shitshow with binoculars. I really don’t know.” 


“T have an idea,” Tereesz stands up determinedly, while Khan grabs him by the trousers. 
Soon, however, the three slender girls, huddled up on the beach below, see a scrawny 
blonde-haired boy and then, a moment later, the slightly overweight boy from Iilmaraa, 
awkwardly step up beside Tereesz. 


“Hello, girls!” Tereesz exclaims. Malin gasps and covers her mouth as the tall, straight 
figure leaps down from the bank as high as a four-storey building. 


Next morning, twenty years later. 


The tired lines from the man’s eyes curve around his cheekbones. Under his eyes are two 
sharp peaks like those of a bird of prey. Grooves on either side of his cheeks - wait, worry. 
The blinds in the Collaboration Police offices have long been drawn on his arbitrarily 
coloured eyes; no one can look into them and see what is happening behind the curtains. 
The Collaboration Police agent also has a freshly trimmed beard that extends slightly 
forward, a long grey neck, tired skin from smoking resting against a white dress shirt. 
A thin black tie hangs from the collar of his shirt. The overnight rain has stopped, but it 
is still cold and windy. With his left hand, he pulls his coat collar closer and smokes with 
his right. 


Standing like this in the bow of a small border patrol ship, a young Vaasa officer next to 
Tereesz, steaming cup of coffee in hand, asks, “What’s in Kronstadt?”. 


“Unfortunately, I cannot answer that question,” mutters Tereesz mechanically, his eyes 
fixed on the autumn horizon. A flock of seagulls rises from the reeds of the harbour and 
screams over the cold water as the boat engine starts with a clatter. A whiff of fuel and 
a chemical rainbow in the water. 


“Coffee?” the young man tries to pick up the conversation again. 
“No, thank you.” 


Tereesz feels droplets of water on his face. Refreshing. The low grey sky has no sun to 
be seen this morning, only airship lights circling above the city, and the steel silhouette 
of the large Graad cruiser hangs in the bay like a ghost. Jarnspoken, they call them, 
iron ghosts. Nobody likes those ominous ships here. Encounters with ghosts. On guard, 
yes, but against whom? Who has declared war on whom? Nobody. And Graad, with its 
steel umbrella, won’t win any hearts here, and even Tereesz, who looks like an ordinary 
northerner but speaks and smokes like a Graad man, can’t get far with his talk of moth- 
erland Zsiemsk, the hundred-year occupation, and the Yugo-Graad massacre. Yes... and 
also Franticek the Brave. 


Of course, he wanted to be like Franticek the Brave. Still does. All the kojkos want to 
be like Franti¢ek the Brave. Occupy positions, rise up, hoist the flags of Sigismund the 
Great again. Boldness, joie de vivre like the thundering troika! 


What happened? 


A solitary border patrol boat is making its way across the North Sea. The waves rock the 
boat heavily, and soon Tereesz has to throw away his cigarette so as not to slip on the 


27 


deck. The poor smoking conditions make shivering outside pointless, so he goes to sit on 
a cabin bench. He tries not to look towards the city, down the winding coastline where 
Charlottesjal is located. Oh, how he longs to go there! One time he came here, four 
thousand kilometres from Graad on the Pale magnet train, didn’t even call Khan or Jesper, 
went straight to Charlottesjal and just sat there like an idiot. Then he went back home. 
Another week through the Pale. He and Jesper were still fighting over the restaurant 
thing, and just hanging out with Khan seemed pointless too. That was his winter solstice 
holiday two years ago. That was his vacation. The department psychiatrist banned him 
from travelling for a year. It was deemed dangerous to go through the Pale so often. 


With a tourniquet in his mouth, Machejek pierces the clearly visible vein on his wrist 
with a glass and metal syringe. 


But he still wants to see how the reeds bend in the wind. It’s so beautiful to watch the 
ocean gently and calmly washing up on the beach. Somewhere in the distant haze, there 
is the silhouette of a rocky cliff. And the water, cold water. Raindrops. It’s beautiful to 
watch. 


Tereesz’s veiny hands lovingly stroke the black suitcase in his lap. 


“Haadramutkarsai!” shouts little Inayat Khan from the edge of the cliff and jumps. The 
sun shines. His belly tingles as if he has a hundred metres to go, but the fall lasts only 
a moment. Suddenly, his feet hit the sand. For a few seconds, he kicks his heels into 
the sand and the slide slows. Little Khan feels the roots poke his buttocks and the rocks 
scrape his back, his shirt coming out of his trousers. His glasses bounce off his face and 
a cheering freckled Tereesz rushes to catch them underneath. The girls run towards his 
battered body. 


“You're crazy!” exclaims Anni. There’s a reason to cheer. 


But not little Jesper. He’s now alone up there and staring at the cliff, his white trousers, 
his sailor’s shirt and then the cliff again. 


“No,” he purses his lips, packs the backpack left behind by Khan and takes the long 
way through the forest. He strides at the quickest pace possible, which is not yet an 
undignified trot. From the pine-clad footpath, the boy turns onto the suspension bridge 
between the two rises and then descends the steps to the boardwalk on the other side. 
The journey to the beach seems to go on forever. Already he thinks with horror of the 
nonsense that stupid Khan must be spouting. How is he supposed to play along with it 
uncoordinated now? 


It’s only half an hour before Jesper reaches the beach below and stands helplessly beside 
the girls’ empty beach towels. 


“Excuse me, didn’t you happen to see where the boys who jumped down from there 
went?” he points to the cliff in the background. The old man was asked to watch the 
girls’ things. Jesper decides that wherever they are, they can’t take long. After a moment 
of basking in the hot sun, he sits down on the beach towel with flowers. After debating 
whether he should take his shirt off - it’s getting hot - he decides to be tasteful and lays 
down on the towel as cool as possible. The coolness of it lies in the indifferent position 
in which his arms are crossed under his head. Jesper is more interested in the clouds 
now. He is deep in thought now. He’s thinking. 


And then his nose is hit with a minuscule, atomic unit of perfume. Lilies of the Valley, 
breath and human skin dissolve before his eyes. Jesper turns his head, and across the 


28 


beige plain of the beach, he sees it: a world of fragrant, alien, girly things. There are 
white and pale summer dresses with ties folded so terribly neatly, little belts and useless 
knickknacks, Anni’s exquisite bracelet; and in the weaved baskets there is just the kind 
of food girls like. Jesper can’t seem to remember any of it, but there certainly isn’t much 
of it. Girls don’t like to eat. That much Jesper knows. 


In a foolish fascination, he raises his hand for the little bottle protruding from the small 
bag. The perfume bottle is shaped like a pomegranate. The golden liquid behind the 
raspberry-coloured glass flows and Jesper watches in fascination. The world disappears. 
Still holding the bottle, he doesn’t even understand why, but his hand surreptitiously 
puts the little hair tie into the breast pocket of his sailor’s shirt. He throws himself 
on his back again and looks at the sun through the glass of the bottle. For a brief mo- 
ment, he is in the raspberry-red world of the pomegranate, when suddenly, as if out of 
nowhere, Charlotte’s long legs loom over him. Little Maj looks him straight in the eye 
from Tereesz’s shoulders: “What’s he doing with your bottle, Anni?” 


The fiery synapses in Jesper’s head begin to make connections as soon as the spell is 
broken, and he doesn’t let a casual surprise appear on his face. 


“Revacholiere,” he pronounces succulently, and then finishes like an old pro himself, 
“Granate, number three, very good choice, strong notes, natural, juniper gives a kind of 
airy go... No, very good choice, what can I say. Yours, Anni?” 


Jesper sits up quietly and undisturbed. Khan and Tereesz look excitedly in the direction 
of the girls, especially Anni, who licks a lime ice cream with a smile. 


“Mine, yes,” she says, a little snippy at first, then becoming more polite: “Your mother’s 
a perfumer, isn’t she?” 


“It’s more like importing than producing. Lately. But she’s got papers and stuff. You 
know, I’ve been to the Revachol perfume factory to see how Granate is distilled.” 


“You've been to Revachol?!” Even Charlotte is impressed. She’s something of a goddess 
at school, a grade above with her expensive clothes and high school boys. And now the 
goddess’s eyes go wide with surprise. Jesper’s ears turn flaming red. 


“Once, yes, my mother’s colleagues invited her on a tour.” 


Tereesz, who had been holding the flag oh-so-high, thinks that now that the greater 
danger is over, Jesper should be brought back down to earth: “That’s why you smell like 
a flower!” 


Little Maj on Tereesz’s shoulders laughs uproariously at everything the boy says. He 
was lucky. Tereesz would never have guessed he was some kind of child magnet, but 
that adventurous leap has already kept him afloat for three-quarters of an hour. Khan 
is completely useless. He manages to catch every third of Tereesz’s bait but then he 
doesn’t know what to do with it and just mumbles. 


Anni sits next to flushed Jesper. “I think Jesper smells good. Not at all like socks or that 
dressing room.” 


“It’s quite horrible,” says Malin mildly. 


“Honestly, it’s all von Fersen,” Khan now scores his first point, “F... Fersen has these PE 
socks. It’s not normal the way they smell.” 


Tereesz breathes a sigh of relief. The queue for ice cream was already quite long. Neither 
Khan nor Tereesz are the best wordsmiths in an emergency and Tereesz’s plan was to 


29 


avoid the topic at any cost until Jesper arrives. Luckily, Maj came to the rescue and 
demanded to be on Tereesz’s shoulders and her constant chatter made everybody laugh. 


Tereesz now feels that it’s time to finally address the issue. He lifts Maj off his shoulders 
and glances suggestively towards Jesper, mentioning casually, “You took the things with 
you, right? Cigarettes? Binoculars?” 


Anni-Elin doesn’t fall for the “cigarettes”: “What was that binoculars thing you had 
there? We already saw something flashing all the time yesterday. Like a little mirror. It 
was exciting!” 


“Ah, just birdwatching, you know, there’s a pair of sea eagles nesting there...”, Tereesz 
barely manages to start, when even Malin grins maliciously: “Birdwatching.” 


Anni giggles next to Jesper, and Charlotte, the wicked goddess, is even sharper: “Yes, 
birdwatching is indeed popular with gentlemen these days.” 


Jesper is bright red, but in a deep crevice of Machejek’s freckled face, Franticek the 
Brave lifts his gallant head. It’s about time! He rushes towards Tereesz, throwing cau- 
tion into the wind, towards the brightest and most unlikely prize. As is customary for us, 
the filthy kojkos: all or nothing. 


“Golabeczko moja,” Tereesz Machejek says with a charming smile, “well, maybe we saw 
even rarer birds.” 


So often, all or nothing means nothing for us filthy kojkos. But not on that day. On that 
hot sunny day, twenty years ago. Char-lot-te! Her rounded shoulders move forward, her 
clavicles stand out. Under the arches of her eyebrows, cold green eyes light up with a 
smile, like the light of a distant star. For Tereesz. 


It says: “Chance!” 


Tereesz is so happy! Everything is going so well! Shadows grow, hours pass, and white 
sand turns yellow, then orange and striped with shadows. The girls take the beach towels 
on their shoulders, and little Maj yawns and falls asleep under a blanket. The wind dies 
down, it becomes quiet. A kingdom. Horse-drawn trams roll in the distance. Their tracks 
screech, distant music from someone’s yard. The beach empties and the sky turns into 
a blue-violet gradient. Tereesz tells the girls about his father’s diplomatic villa, plans for 
the summer, and about the next day. Dressing cabins stand upright and cast shadows on 
the beach like clock hands. Strips of clouds rise above the smooth water, their curdled 
lilac bellies, the cyan, magenta, and cooled deep orange of the horizon. Malin tries on 
Khan’s glasses, Khan can’t see anything behind MAlin’s large black sunglasses. Only the 
girls’ shapes flicker like upside-down candle flames. 


“Bring some apple cider!” Anni-Elin shouts as the tram door closes. Four pale horses 
jerk from their place, the cabin shines yellow in the evening twilight, and little Maj, with 
angel wings in a white dress, sleeps on Malin’s lap. A fairy godmother’s magic wand 
falls from her hand onto the cabin’s sandy floor. 


Three boys stand at the tram stop, making gasping faces at each other as the tram turns 
around the corner and disappears from sight. 


The warm, sour breath makes the white hotel linen flutter against the linoleum sales- 
man’s mouth. 


Linoleum salesman. Linoleum salesman. Linoleum salesman. With his left hand on his 
nape, he pulls the double loop of linen around his neck into a knot. The knot is intricate 


30 


and extremely well-tied. The eighth-floor balcony door is still cracked and cool air is 
seeping, into the Havsanglar room. From the balcony, there is a magnificent view down 
to the late evening beach. On the reed floor of the balcony, a telescope with a reflector 
box, mounted in protective paint, is dismantled from its base. Scout model. Behind the 
telescope is a modified camera. On the balcony, and only on this balcony, not in the 
adjoining room or the hallway, because that’s not the way the linoleum salesman likes 
these things... So it’s only on this balcony here that he hears the intense breathing of 
evil. 


Twenty years later, in the evening. 


Vidkun Hird stares at a distressed Collaboration Police agent in front of the barred win- 
dow of the interrogation room. Despicable. Hird wears his grey prison jumpsuit. On the 
reflective strip is written “Vidkun Hird” and his number with an alphabetical abbrevia- 
tion. The agent peels off his jacket and carelessly throws it down in front of the window. 
The shirt has sweat stains under the armpits. The agent’s movements are uncoordinated. 
On the chest of the shirt is a freshly printed badge with the visitor’s identification code. 
The fan hums. 


“Hey, you’re drunk!” Vidkun glances over his shoulder at the sergeant on guard at the 
door, “The smell of booze is getting to my head... Please get me out of here, I’m not in 
the mood.” 


Vidkun smirks as he listens to snippets of Machejek’s conversation with the correctional 
officer. 


“Five minutes... ten minutes... a child’s life is at stake...” 


The door closes behind the guard, and a key of dubious construction flashes briefly in 
Tereesz’s hand. 


“Ma-chee-jekk,” Vidkun pronounces, “You’re a kojko! You’re like a Graadian mutt, some 
kind of two-tiered low-life form.” Both Hird’s arms and legs are cuffed this time, the 
massive irons bending his arms uncomfortably behind his back. But despite this, he 
somehow sits like a nobleman. 


“You lied. Who did you get the drawing from?” Tereesz’s eyes are bleary, the man blinks 
angrily. 


“Listen, have you heard about that study on eugenics that praises the humble mind of 
the kojkos?” 


“Who did you get the drawing from, p i g?” 
“A scholar, you know, recommends mating your kind with blacks. Superworkers.” 


“Shut up!” Tereesz pulls down the steel curtains on the interrogation room windows. 
Abruptly. The blind falls with a rattle, and immediately there’s the sound of the correc- 
tional officer’s nervous jingling of keys in the lock. 


“Idiot, do you want to go to jail or something? We’re following the Declaration here. We 
do not have some kind of Graad anarchy.” 


In the windowless room, in the clean iron light of the hall, Tereesz Machejek is standing 
next to a desk, unpacking his briefcase. The lining inside of it fits exactly one iron box 
and on the box in white letters is written “ZA/UM”. 


Hird’s eyes widen in fear. There is pounding from behind the door. 


31 


“You don’t have a permit for this! You must have a permit! Show me your permit!” 


“What did you say? I can’t hear you, some pig is squealing all the time.” Tereesz hits 
Hird in the face with the iron box. Blood pours on the grey prison jumpsuit. 


Hird whines and a small speck of white bone is visible on his nose. The man faints. 
Muffled threats can be heard behind the door, but Tereesz’s diamond key rattles in the 
lock. 


“T am International Collaboration Police agent Tereesz Machejek, Mirova, Graad, I have 
the legal right to interrogate, and if you mess with that door again...” The knocking stops 
for a moment and ZA/UM clicks open. Everything happens quickly and skillfully, one 
could say. Tereesz pulls out the yellowed tubing with hanging cannulas from the foam 
cushion of the box, fastens the grotesque bellows-like device around his wrist with a belt, 
and pulls the rubber hose taut around Vidkun Hird’s ironclad arm. Slightly swaying, he 
screws the hose onto the device and then sticks the needle into Vidkun’s vein. A small 
red drop of Hird’s superhuman tendency flows directly into the cannula. 


Running steps can be heard from behind the steel curtain window, and heavy boots on 
the prison floor. Reinforcements. The lid of the device clicks open on Machejek’s wrist. 
A row of vials appears, filled with yellow liquid, like dentures with cigarette smoke under 
the upper lip, a smile stretched without expression. A quiet hiss and the first vial clicks 
into place. The bellows on top of the lid tremble for a moment, and then the device on 
Machejek’s wrist starts to breathe quietly like a pet. The yellow urine-coloured liquid 
pumps into Vidkun Hird’s wrist. He opens his eyes and starts wheezing in panic. 


“Do you know, what this is? Fucking hog!” Tereesz hisses between his teeth, right in 
front of Vidkun’s swollen face. 


A little blood and saliva splash from the man’s mouth onto Machejek’s face, as he rolls his 
eyes in fear and cries: “I lied. You are right. I... I have never seen them, my cellmate...” 


“T don’t care what you think.” 
“T don’t think anything, I’m telling you, I had a cellmate, several years ago, Deerek...” 


“T don’t care what you think, I want your truth.” Tereesz’s eyes are bulging terribly. He 
snatches the gag from Vidkun’s arm and the vein, swollen with mescaline and lysergic 
acid, visibly shrinks. 


Suddenly, Vidkun clenches his teeth so tightly that they seem as if they will break at any 
moment. “You can’t have anything from me. Now you can’t get anything from me,” he 
splutters madly, “I’m so strong!” 


The battering ram can be heard from behind the door. 


“T love that you think so. It’s best if you think so,” Tereesz pants, screwing another 
cannula onto the apparatus. It’s for him. Eyes fixed on his wrist, he jabs the needle into 
his vein. 


The first vial is empty, the next Tereesz shares with Vidkun, excitedly spluttering against 
his mouth: “It’s a mincing machine. You can’t imagine how hard I’m going to fuck you 
with it now.” The piss-yellow liquid breaks through Vidkun’s blood-brain barrier, and on 
his head, under his skull, a huge pressure builds like a bubble of air. The man’s face 
clenched between his hands, Tereesz begins to scream. His voice reaches Hird’s head 
like white noise, pure bellowing violence. 


“T’'ll make a cretin of you, do you feel?” 


32 


Vidkun’s scalp gives in to the pressure of the agent’s hands and cracks open like a flower 
bloom. It feels like something is being born from it. Vidkun’s handcuffs rattle helplessly, 
the man tries to hold the substance that is bursting out of his head with his hands. Pieces 
of his brain still fall from his fingers to the floor. He can’t, it’s too slippery, there’s too 
much of it. 


“T can see your cunt, you’re open in front of me, I’m going to open you up,” Tereesz pants, 
watching the whole of Vidkun Hird open up in front of him. 


The man trembles under the sharp fingers of the agent and tries with all his might to say, 
to tell him what he is looking for, to say it in human language, but his mouth no longer 
works. And all this time, as Tereesz wades through his head like a tiger in water, Vidkun 
sees only one picture reflected back at him from Tereesz’s mirror. On that cool surface, 
where Vidkun escapes from the devastating slaughter in his own head, Charlotte Lund’s 
dark green eyes look at him. Deep inside the pupils, the chance given to Tereesz shim- 
mers. It is so beautiful and infinitely sad that when Tereesz collapses from exhaustion 
behind the interrogation table, Vidkun begins to cry. 


The Vaasa coastline sparkles before him, and the nightly waves break against the hull of 
the border guard ship at his feet. A yellowish dome of light shines above the city in the 
distance. It seems indescribably joyful, all those white and yellow lights in the city fit in 
Tereesz’s hand. And even though it is cold outside, he is not wearing a coat. His jacket 
flaps open, and Vidkun Hird’s blood splatters are still on his white dress shirt. The hands 
of the Collaboration Police agent are comfortably handcuffed, and a young officer helps 
him stand on the deck. 


“What mischief did you do there?” asks the officer. 

“Tf I wrote you a symphony,” sounds a crackling voice from the transistor radio. 
“Hey, thanks for letting me out, it was a beautiful evening!” 

“Okay...” the officer begins to laugh quietly. 

“Could you turn up the volume on that song?” 

“What?” 

“T promise I won’t jump overboard, turn it up!” 


“I’m more worried you'll fall overboard, but okay then.” The officer steps into the ship’s 
cabin and onto the deck. Over the noise of the waves and the engine, a massive beat and 
the man’s falsetto say, “If I wrote you a symphony, to show how much you mean to me...” 
Tereesz’s foot starts tapping. With the same relief he only feels after using “ZA/UM,” he 
sighs to the officer, “You know, I just solved the disappearance of the Lund children.” 


“What?” 
“You don’t know? It’s very famous!” 
“When was that?” 


“Oh, along time ago, you weren’t even born yet. But it doesn’t matter, I feel so good right 
now. I think I solved it!” Tereesz laughs. It’s a dark laugh, but genuine, very genuine, 
and the night over the North Sea laughs back at him. 


33 


6. FRANTICEK THE BRAVE 


Sometimes, the saddest disappearance is the one that remains unresolved. Before it 
became a hydroelectric power station, the Peremennaya Veera was just the Veera River, 
into which the operetta star Nadja Harnankur threw herself at the height of her popu- 
larity. It could have stayed that way: Nadja simply vanished one autumn evening after 
a thrilling performance, her heavenly soprano still echoing in the opera house. Was the 
old man right, who claimed to have seen her walking across the bridge in her evening 
gown? Or was it the fanatical admirer who insisted he’d met her a year later in Reva- 
chol? Perhaps there is some truth in the paranoid pulp novelist’s tale, in which Nadja is 
actually a Mesque spy, nihilist, and doomsday prophet. Who can say for certain? 


But one thing is certain. No one needed to see Nadja’s remains emerging from the mud 
of the reservoir in her evening gown. No one needed to see the colony of river mussels 
in her eye sockets, the dead grin of her golden teeth, or the shocked expressions of the 
hydroelectric power station construction crew. 


Futility. Futility shapes the world. History is a story of futilities, progress is a sequence 
of futilities. “Development!” says the futurist. “Loss,” says the rebel. “Hangover!” 
shouts the moralist from the back row. “Failure,” says the angry rebel. “Time is grey,” 
he says. The Creator’s failure is an introduction to the era. Kras Mazov shoots himself 
in the head and Abadanaiz takes poison with Dobrev on the Ozonne islands. The wind 
blows sand over their bones under the palm trees. Who was supposed to know? Good 
people from all over the world came together. Teachers, writers, and migrant workers 
huddle in trenches... young soldiers desert their units. What beautiful songs they sing! 
Brave children are history’s favourites, so it seems to them, and they wave white flags 
with silver horned crowns. 


And they lose. 


Coups are crushed. Anarchists are piled into mass graves on the Great Blue. Commu- 
nists, beaten back from the isola of Graad, retreat to Samara and become a degenerate 
worker’s state ruled by bureaucrats. The disappearance of revolutionary lovers is re- 
solved thirty-five years later when the hugging skeletons of Abadanaiz and Dobrev are 
found on the shore of an unnamed Ozonne island by Riche LePomme’s eight-year-old 
son Eugene during a Saturday evening outing. Wearing shorts and a butterfly net, he 
stands and looks perplexedly at the bones of his past as they cling together. Faded and 
smooth. Where does one begin and the other end? Time has mixed them up like a deck 
of cards. Afterwards, Riche erects a hotel there along with a now world-famous health 
centre. 


But the greatest failure is not how Mazov’s global revolution ended in bloodshed and 
then defeat, nor is it how the bones of revolutionary lovers are now displayed in an 
aromatherapy waiting room. With internal unrest suppressed, Graad becomes a world 
power, a giant nation, its cities thriving and the light of this growth shining like a 
sparkling network from orbit. Whole nations disappear from the map of the world. Na- 
tions where Mazov once had many supporters. Nations like Zsiemsk. Nations whose 
peoples are derogatorily referred to as “kojkos”. And this goes on for so long that even- 
tually they even begin to call themselves that. 


Tereesz Machejek is seven years old. His father is a model kojko, a diplomat, and a 
usurper bootlicker who has not yet taken him to school in Vaasa. The city is a zone of 
ecological catastrophe, a post-megapolis and pre-necropolis human settlement, in the 


34 


penultimate stage of development. Polyfabricate spreads out at the border of Zsiemsk 
and Yugo. The monster engulfs Zsiemsk’s historic centres - Ferdydurke’s royal old town, 
and Lenka’s pine parks. Summer begins, and in the dimness of the cellars, a name is 
whispered. Children shout it in the courtyards of the houses. The leaves of the trees 
rustle on the quiet street, and only the echo of that name resounds in the ear of the 
Graad militiaman. 


“Franticek the Brave...” 


The bravest of the kojkos. A movie star, a revolutionary. It was just recently that the 
riots were brutally suppressed in the spring, and now nothing has been heard of him 
for two months. It is said that he lurks far away in the taiga, in the Yakut reserve, and 
acquires special abilities from the indigenous priests. Fantastic things! His steppe eagle 
cheekbones and yearning gaze, gentle smile, as if the sun were rising above the taiga. 
A smile he saves only for those rare occasions when his serious eyebrows are furrowed 
with worry... His daring face appears in forbidden films in the jersey factory, where 
women are brave, sewn onto white cloth from tank tops and panties. No, Franticek the 
Brave is in Samara! Negotiating. He is coming with the forces of the People’s Republic! 
Don’t be naive, Franti¢ek is far away in the Kola, in winter orbit, in Ignus Nilsen’s hut. 
They’ll never find him! Quiet! Franti¢ek the Brave wouldn’t hide! Just yesterday, he 
was seen in line to buy meat, he now has a false beard and a butcher’s apron, he called 
himself Vozam Sark, read it backwards! 


But the months pass and no news comes, and soon it’s autumn. Industrial dust falls like 
a mourning veil on the golden and red leaves. In October, a completely different story 
begins to circulate in Zsiemsk. Quiet and timid. Franticek the Brave was shot behind a 
dumpster. 


35 


7. THE WORLD IS GOING WRONG, TIME IS DIS- 
JOINTED 


Inayat Khan turns restlessly in his bed, located below ground level, under a cellar win- 
dow. Outside, it was getting dark and the pale light of street lamps seeped into the room. 
The cellar was filled with old junk, as if frozen in place, with dust particles sparkling in 
the greyish light coming through the window. Underneath draperies on the tables, there 
were dark shapes of evaporated memorabilia. The frames of pictures on the walls formed 
dark squares, with their shadows falling on the floor and fading away. In the centre of 
the cellar, there was a delicately shining glass case, calling out for attention. Tiny ob- 
jects were waiting on many shelves. “Wake up, dear collector! How long will you sleep? 
We know you’re not sleeping.” Khan’s fingers fumble around the headboard. Without 
any serious effort, he overturns things and looks for the button on the tape recorder. 
Suddenly, it seems more pleasant to curl up under the blanket instead. Pedestrians’ 
shoes are clicking on the wet pavement outside as they return from work, and Khan 
makes a desperate effort to get a little more sleep. “Ah, come on!” say his exciting 
toys. “Let us listen to your fun wake-up song!” Khan’s atrophied heart muscle begins 
to throb slightly from the little effort and there is no more sleep. His hand reaches for 
the headboard, his finger moving over the ivory keys of the tape recorder. Underneath 
the draperies, the objects are held in suspense. And then there’s a click, and before the 
gentle arpeggios of a guitar and the soft sound of an old electric organ, the tape hisses 
empty for a few bars. 


J) It’s been a long, long, 
long time 
How could I ever have lost you... 
A loud, thumping drum beat with bass comes in from the left channel. 
J) ...when I loved you? 


In pyjama pants, Khan rises to a sitting position to the sound of rolling drums. Pushing 
aside the snake skins of the sheets, the man puts his feet into his sharp-tipped slippers. 
His unshaven chin shakes in one last yawn until he opens his big almond eyes wide 
and puts on his glasses. Khan ruffles his hair and begins to sing along lazily. He has a 
beautiful voice. 


J) It took a long, long, 
long time 
Now I’m so happy I found you 


Hairy belly hanging slightly over his pyjama bottoms, he plays the next part on his per- 
sonal air drums... 


J) How I love you 


... and presses the switch with his foot. The old bulbs flick on and off, in sync with 
the drumbeat. The filament buzzes for a moment and then goes out. A dodecahedron 
autographed by the unknown dodecaphonic composer comte de Perouse-Mittrecie sinks 
back from the golden light into darkness. When the bulbs light up again, the title on the 
back of the book - “Los Desaparecidos” - emerges from the dimness. 


36 


J) So many tears, 
I was searching 
So many tears, 

I was waiting 


This part is catchy, singing loudly and unashamedly, Khan moves through the basement 
like a performer. A row of ceiling lights reveals the carefully arranged stuff on the tables. 
Wooden file drawers rise in alphabetical order, on the wall is a portrait of Nadya Har- 
nankur in an oval medallion, a map of the desert of Erg with Ramout Karzai’s supposed 
route to the dunes, to plead an audience with God. And pins mark the places where 
he might have found his mysterious end on this journey. As he passes, Khan pulls the 
draperies from the boards and puzzle after puzzle unfolds before him. Twelve miniature 
golden and green ships with sericite dragon carvings, barely the size of a thumbnail, 
lined up. Rows of oars in a dark blue fake sea with white wavy crests; the papyrus- 
yellow sail lines of the little ships are proudly lowered. Men in reed armour stand on 
board, pennants flapping on their spears. It’s the Gon-Tzu expedition of a thousand men. 
At the behest of the Safre emperor, they set sail from the coast of Samara eastwards, 
more than three thousand years ago. They are searching for peaches that can make 
the emperor immortal. Never to return. Two and a half millennia later, signs of their 
settlement are found to the east, in the Anise islands. The Gon-Tzu expedition could not 
return. The emperor was cruel and fierce, a tyrant, and there are no peaches that can 
make one immortal. All these beloved objects - trinkets, things left behind - somehow 
touch Khan. And how it stings! How odd... he has never fully understood what it is. And 
yet a smile appears on Khan’s mouth, a smile of a fat cat who is getting its chin scratched. 
Above the desk on the stand, under the light of a green desk lamp is all about the girls. 
Newspaper clippings, scattered notes, and there in the middle, copies of “Malin’s let- 
ters”. The handwriting analysis is extraordinarily 95% accurate. The letters arrived a 
year and a half after the last day in Charlottesjal. To the girls’ parents. “Everything is 
fine. We’re with a Man,” says someone who says she’s Malin, “we love you.” 


Khan puts the coffee pot on the burner and the song turns soft and quiet, like in the 
beginning. It’s his favourite part. In the whole world. He could listen to it forever. He 
shakes his head with a bitter smile and puts his hands over his heart. 


J] Now I can see you, 
Feel you 
How did I ever misplace you? 


Outside, you can hear the wheels turning as the machine stops in front of the house. It 
starts to drizzle and raindrops can be seen on the basement window. The tape recorder 
makes a “click” and the song ends. There is a calendar on the door where no one has 
bothered to turn the page for two months. It’s still August, and under the twenty-eighth 
is written “International Day of the Missing”. It is the twenty-eighth of August just in 
their honour. That’s the day. 


“Tni, your friend Jesper is here, brush your teeth first!” Khan’s mother shouts from the 
kitchen upstairs. The man pulls on his top-stitched dressing gown and makes his way 
up the basement stairs. 


In the middle of the room, in a glass case, stands “Harnankur”. 


37 


Two years ago. 


The crystal goblets are ringing. Saturday night bustle in the Telefunken Tower restau- 
rant. Behind the panoramic windows, Vaasa spreads out. A slim ghost. Darkness, snow 
and lights. The prices are expensive here, but not like tastelessly expensive. This is not 
the way, the clientele has too much social nerve for that. The food is five-star, but the 
company? Higher class! Look, there’s the president of the Communications Department 
with his wife. And the CEO of the Freibank with the charming singer Pernilla Lundqvist 
and a Vesper businessman having dinner. The charming singer is eating a salad, with 
olives, while the CEO recommends crawfish to a Vesper business partner. It’s delicious 
here, you have to try it! And him there, next to the bearded professor, isn’t he Konrad 
Gessle, four-time Oskar Zorn nominee? A very intelligent man... The CEO of Freibank is, 
of course, wearing P. Black. Out of his mind... And look! There’s a thirty-year-old loser! 
The loser lives in his mother’s basement. The loser is wearing the same light blue shirt 
he graduated from primary school in. 


“We hate you, loser!” 
“Who let him in?” 


“It’s so sad to watch, he’s probably on a date. So pathetic! That woman hasn’t said a 
word to him for ten minutes... Listen to that silence, I would hang myself!” 


“How about if I give him some money? Just a little bit, like ten real, maybe he’d feel 
better?” 


“Disgusting loser, don’t give him anything, I hate him!” 


“He certainly can’t pay his bill! He certainly won’t - hysterical laughter - that wine alone 
is like forty real, hahhah-haa!” 


“T hate you, loser, die, I hate you so terribly!” 


Khan is sweating again and tries to cover his ears with his hands... Shaking his head, 
blinking his eyes, anything to end this barrage of humiliation, until suddenly - silence! 
A brunette woman with a sharp face sitting opposite him twiddles with the wine glass. 
The boredom is suffocating. The woman glances at the panoramic ceiling, at the dark 
brown, beautifully shaped table under her arms. Then, suddenly, a flash of inspiration! 


“It’s a beautiful place. There’s a new design here, I think. I remember... The last time I 
was here, everything was completely different.” 


Khan’s face lights up. “Yeah-yeah! My friend made it! He likes this kind of stuff, minimal, 
and clean. I haven’t quite figured out exactly what was up with it now, but I think he 
kind of... invented it. He’s quite famous.” 


“De la Guardie?” 
“Jesper. Yes.” 
“You know him? He’s so talented.” 


“Oh, of course. Jesper and I have been friends for a long time. Before he became fa- 
mous. To be perfectly honest...” Khan smiles nervously, “...1 don’t think I would have 
got reservations here. If, well...” 


“Ah! I was wondering.” 


“What were you wondering?” Khan asks, but the brunette woman doesn’t answer. It’s 
silent again. Khan glances across the floor at the guests, who, for a moment, don’t 


38 


seem to look back at him in contempt. Back at Konrad Gessle’s table, he sees a woman 
introducing a skinny man with blond hair to the documentary filmmaker. The waiter, 
too, notices his presence and rushes to serve the gentleman a “regular”. Ice water with 
a slice of lime. In a dark grey waist-cut suit and a lime wedge between his teeth, the 
gentleman looks very young and somehow elegantly sleepless. The chic way he shows 
off his plain T-shirt under his jacket is unmistakable. He can afford it. The shirt has the 
iconic album cover of a famous dance artist. 


“Jesper!” Khan exclaims inappropriately loud across the tables. His date flinches a little 
and then looks questioningly towards Gessle and Jesper’s table. 


“There he is,” Khan says cheerfully as if relieved, to the brunette across the table. He 
stands up so that his friend can better see where Khan is. 


‘Jesper, hey!” 


Like this, with sweat stains on the armpits of his frilled shirt, he stands in the middle 
of Telefunken’s panoramic restaurant and watches as Jesper furrows his eyebrows in 
annoyance, spreading his arms in the direction of Konrad Gessle. He pretends not to 
know him. 


“Ow! ” 


It’s a hot Saturday afternoon, eighteen years ago, and a rosehip bush has scratched 
Anni’s leg under her short skirt. The girl steps angrily out of the bushes and Jesper, the 
doctor, trots to her side. 


“What happened? Let me see!” Anni lifts her skirt just a bit and then gives up. “Ah, it’s 
nothing, silly bushes... Oo!” she stops halfway through the word and her mouth looks 
like that vowel, “So beautiful!” 


“Beautiful,” says little Jesper, still seeing Anni’s leg in his mind, the pleated edge of her 
tennis skirt curling up. Khan pushes the bushes aside and Charlotte and Malin step onto 
the edge of the cliff, mouths agape. 


“Really, I can see why you’re loitering here all the time. Such a nice wind...” The breeze 
blows Charlotte’s auburn hair in her face. The girl squints her eyes, pushes her hair 
carelessly aside and goes: “Mmm...” 


The wind tears white petals into the air. It seems as if little Maj in a winged dress is 
floating above the rustling bushes. She draws shapes in the air with a fairy godmother’s 
wand and feels like the most important person in the world. She is on Tereesz’s shoul- 
ders, who doesn’t care one bit about the thorns of rose hips. He wades through them 
and sets Maj down on the grass. Tereesz is scratched up and smiling stupidly. The salty 
breeze dies down, the air is redolent with the syrupy scent of flowers. Insects buzz. The 
seven of them barely fit on the lawn of the boys’ hideaway, and that was the plan. Any- 
way, Jesper is content. The boys couldn’t sleep all night. Grinning, making plans for the 
next day, sneaking around. You can say that the mood flew. Tereesz was against coming 
to the rock because of the long journey and the thorns. Jesper, along with Khan, found 
that it was still the best place. And it was! The girls are impressed by the view, Khan 
introduces the classification, power to go through the Pale and capacity of the Graad 
antique cruiser glimmering on the horizon. Looks like Malin hasn’t started yawning 
yet. And the best thing - it’s windy, but the weather is so warm that Anni still wants to 
sunbathe. Malin unwraps her beach towel and ends up next to Khan with Maj, who is 
waddling along. Khan is straining his memory, but unfortunately, he can’t say anything 


39 


more interesting about antique airships. Let Tereesz and Jesper carry the conversation. 
He lies on his back and closes his eyes. 


The orange shimmer of the sun, the sound of water, and the clattering of tools, all cool- 
ing down quietly, and in the boy’s popular-science dream, it’s space autumn up above 
in orbit. And the vibration, as always. It’s starting to get chilly. The faceless, bottom- 
less epiphyseal membrane spreads beyond the giant ridges. Forgotten in the sky, these 
ancient communication satellites calibrate their rusty bellies towards the curvature of 
the earth. Articulated joints of catapults shift position, boulders screech at the edge of 
the stratosphere like a flock of cranes, and communication units crackle into the ether. 
A cluster of measuring device compound eyes looks down where the southern coast of 
Katla isola blooms briefly ina summer gust. Like a beautiful dream, a landmass dozes in 
the cool cradle of thousand-kilometre maps and cycloidal eddies. It’s the past, approach- 
ing, all-consuming. The Pale is all around. But the dark green forests of matter and the 
white shoreline, the shimmering sun mirror of the North Sea, the Vaasa archipelago and 
the small Charlottesjal still hold on. And the less matter remains, the smaller the area 
you compress it into, the more strangely it sparkles. 


Seven of them lie in a half-circle on a green patch on the rocky peak, with the waves 
crashing below. Up above, there is a cotton ball-like cloud from a castle in the air, and the 
cloud cities reflect on Khan’s curved glasses. He opens his eyes. Charlotte Lund, entirely 
made of scented matter, pulls her summer dress over her head with one swoop. Her 
rounded curves and smooth sun-kissed skin come into view. Tereesz feels her slender 
joints, it grazes him. It’s hot. Anni is embarrassed about her birthmarks and lies on her 
back with sunglasses as a headband. Jesper doesn’t dare say anything about it, even 
though he really wants to see them. And Malin, modestly, unties the bow on her dress 
belt to feel the wind blowing in from underneath her skirt. The dress fabric flutters like 
a sail. “Cider!” announces Tereesz, baring his upper body. And indeed, from the depths 
of his backpack emerges a three-litre container, acquired through an unprecedentedly 
complex operation last night. Drops of water sparkle on the glass, the hermetic cap 
hisses open, and a small, vaporous stream of carbon dioxide rise from the bottle’s mouth. 
The apple cider foams and bubbles, the froth accumulating around the bubbles. 


The girls’ mouths water, but little Maj looks confused and sips her lemonade with bits 
of lemon floating in it. Tereesz carefully places the cold bottle against Charlotte’s hot 
cheek. His father will find out next weekend that the cider is gone, just when he wants 
to offer it to the gallery owners and curators at the cultural cooperation garden party. 
But Tereesz doesn’t care. Look how beautiful she is, Charlotte, and how happy it makes 
her. And his father is just an academic capitulator, a model kojko, and a bootlicker of 
usurpers. Franticek the Brave would not think highly of him. 


“Why are you so quiet?” asks Malin softly, so the others won’t hear, and rolls over towards 
Khan. 


Anni’s ears perk up. “Strange that you should say that. Little sock!” she teases. 


“Ah, be quiet,” laughs Malin with a soft, warm chuckle that Khan can feel against his ear. 
“Speak... you always have such cool presentations. In history and natural science...” 


Khan jumps up from his school desk and triumphantly pumps his fist in the air. 
“Yeah! Yeah! That peach story was so sweet!” 
“Anni, don’t interrupt...” frowns Malin, “Wait, what peach story?” 


“Tell us, Khan, it’s really loud. That Ilmaraa, the fleet, and the emperor...” 


40 


Finally, Khan opens his mouth. “Wrong isola, dude. Samara.” 
“Oh, sorry, I didn’t mean it like that, you know, in a racist way.” 


“Very funny, Jesper. Anyway...” Now Khan also turns a little towards Malin, cautiously, 
to not touch her, “You were sick then, I remember.” Khan remembers very well, he 
wanted to postpone the presentation so that the performance would not be wasted, but 
the teacher did not understand the subtleties of the situation. “In Samara - more pre- 
cisely in Safre - there is such mythology where peaches play an important role. If the 
Anise Islands have cherries, then they have peaches. They grow there wild, you can 
pick peaches from the forest. Apricots, peaches, and nectarines, all come from Samara. 
Even now, a lot of fruit is brought to us from the SRV through the Pale.” Malin nods 
dutifully. “Yes. Long, long ago, when Katla wasn’t even populated yet, the emperor of 
Safre sent his most famous explorer, Gon-Tzu, to bring back peaches that would make 
him immortal...” 


Twenty years later. 


The city of Vaasa is blue. The ornate lanterns on Konigsmalm’s rush hour street gleam. 
The dark grey dome of the sky and the northern-clad crowd pass under it like a migration 
of ghosts from a fairy tale. Tereesz’s head is spinning; he hasn’t had a smoke in so long. 
His head is thick and throbbing, nicotine pressing on his eyes, sounds fading, becoming 
muffled. He sits down on the steps in front of the police station, his coat tail underneath 
him. A slight drizzle moistens his sleepy face. 


Five minutes ago, clothes were thrown in his face and he was let go. The last remnants of 
the dream still linger. They echo in his mind, a monster sliding on the lapping waterline, 
right beneath his waking consciousness, giving him a throbbing headache. “Danger,” he 
usually answers, he is made of violence, but sometimes he says he is the Man. He bends 
the rosehip bushes and looks at them on the rocky peak. He’s always there, wanting 
to tear them apart, but waiting patiently. In the pine forest where he puffed cigarettes, 
Tereesz sees him sneaking from behind one tree trunk to another. He crouches on the 
edge of Khan’s binoculars, down on the beach, holding little Maj who falls asleep and 
the doors of the horse-drawn tram close. He is swallowed, bottomless, nothing stands 
under him, and everything can collapse on him at any moment. A few days left. The 
rest of his life is coming soon. False and terrible. Then, when they go into the water 
on the last night on the secret beach for girls, he comes to their sheets and sniffs their 
things. The man chews on a meat pie in oil batter and watches him through the sun 
blinds. Tereesz is Agnetha, an ice cream shop worker, and the Man has a new face every 
time he passes by the window. From the corner of his eye. He wears Vidkun Hird like a 
costume, an adult Khan whom Tereesz now fears for some reason, and sometimes he is 
Tereesz’s father. Tereesz feels ashamed later in the day when he sees his friends there, 
but there’s nothing he can do about it. 


Slowly, timidly, he makes his way through the crowd, fearing bumping into someone, 
angering someone. People in dark clothing flow through the streets, at a large intersec- 
tion the traffic lights glow and motorised rickshaws come to a stop, smoke rises from 
their exhaust pipes, and engines throb. At the crossroads of beltways, he sways along 
with the crowd, and above him, dimly lit neon lights shine, and a giant lingerie model 
smiles high on the department store wall. The lights of a row of taxi phones. When 
Tereesz steps into the cab, it starts to rain outside for real. The cab windows are wet 
and somewhere in Vidkun Hird’s memories - or in his own prison dream, Tereesz is not 
sure - a monster squats above them and puts the torn bodies of the girls back together 


Al 


into a chimaera. 


“You know...” The sleet sizzles under the taxi wheel, and the granite rubble rattles. Khan 
looks out the window. “There’s one thing... I didn’t tell you before... about me.” The car 
stops in front of his door, in Salem. A brunette woman holds a handbag in her lap, the 
man opens the door on his side. “This doesn’t usually come up. It just doesn’t. But you 
could know this about me. That actually...” He steps out, and leans into the cabin: “ 
I’m the world’s leading expert on disappearing.” 


Khan slams the taxi door shut, takes three steps over the pedestrian road to the external 
stairs, inserts the key and enters the hallway of the wooden house. The sound of a motor 
can be heard from outside, and the machine starts. It’s dim and warm inside. Potatoes 
are boiling in the kitchen. “Mom, it was terrible!” Khan picks up the phone, the device 
hangs on the wall, and the numbers are on the keypad in the wallpaper. “Absolutely 
terrible, don’t even ask!” His yellow fingers jump on the keys, a sixteen-digit series. An 
interisolar connection, at the expense of the responder. 


“Mr. Ambartsumian, I was given your number from an auction.” 


“Mr. Ambartsumian is not available right now,” the male secretary’s voice replies, quietly 
and from a distance. 


“No, you don’t understand, I’m calling about “Harnankur”. I was supposed to receive 
my airship manual. This is very important... sorry, can you hear me?” The line crackles 
and the call is fading into the Pale. The noise of time. 


Two years later. 


“Have you heard anything from Tereesz?” Jesper asks as soon as he enters Khan’s hall- 
way. The sweet smell of poverty wafts into his nose. What is it? Cinnamon? Stale 
bread? 


“No, I haven’t heard anything. I actually wanted to ask you about it. This whole thing, I 
have to say, it worries me,” Khan leads Jesper, his bathrobe fluttering, straight down to 
the cellar. “Clothes,” he points to a nail above the stairs. 


Jesper feels uncomfortable. That same strange smell, just like before. How he dislikes 
it. He would rather live on the street, he would rather burn all this rubbish down than 
put up with that smell. Above all, he fears that Khan’s poor old mother will jump out 
from somewhere at any moment. But Khan insisted unyieldingly: we’ll do it at his place, 
he can’t be bothered to come to the city, we’ll do it at his place or not at all. Jesper, with 
his past mistakes, had no room to argue. With a heavy heart, he descends the last step 
into the cellar. But then, the boy in him takes over. 


“Wow!” 
“Yep. Not too shabby, you’d say.” 


“T would say,” Jesper’s big head spins on his neck. “Oh!” he exclaims, “Gon-Tzu!” He 
taps on the little man standing in the bow of the first ship in the Safre fleet with his index 
finger. Tiny Gon-Tzu, barely the size of a fingertip and with long drooping moustaches 
like Samara’s dragon, holds a pennant with the emperor’s coat of arms. In the man’s 
other hand is the compass the size of a pinhead, a gadget that he claims to have invented 
himself. 


42 


“T put this together a year ago. Remember, last time I only had the ships ready, still 
unpainted.” 


Khan stands proudly in the middle of the room. 
“Wait, what’s that?” Jesper points to the shiny showcase behind him. 
“That... that’s my crown jewel! That’s my precious! Jesper, that’s the ‘Harnankur’!” 


“The original?!” Jesper approaches the showcase reverentially. 


“Of course not, don’t be naive. It costs more than you,” Khan laughs with professional 
superiority. “It’s a copy. One of two existing. 


” 


Figure 2: Harnankur (by Aleksander Rostov) 


The fragile silhouette of the “Harnankur” spreads out behind the glass panel of the show- 
case. Jesper strokes the glass, which is taller than him, and looks for the switch to turn 
on the lights. 


“Look, there, under the base, a big switch.” 


Jesper clicks on the lights and it’s not the showcase, but the brilliant light of the an- 
tique airship itself with its ten floors that switches on. The model hangs in the middle 
of the showcase, suspended in the air by invisible wires, like a silver and varnished 
wooden swan. On the first-class deck, behind crystal glass walls, small chandeliers glit- 
ter through the four-story hall. Tiny people are frozen, trying to come down the spiral 
stairs. It seems so light! Fragile. Silver arches stretch like sails on the ship’s hull and 
converge at the bow as the nickel-plated coat-of-arms swan of the Sest empress. 


“It’s amazing, isn’t it, that they thought something like this could pass through the Pale. 
Look! Here there are blankets.” Khan is so happy that he can finally show it to someone. 
“Blankets! These little baskets here have outdoor blankets! Ridiculous stuff. Sitting 
right in the Pale. With your girl. Honestly, I could stare at it all day!” 


“T understand how. It’s not, well, it’s not too shabby...” Jesper circles around the display 
case and shares his discoveries with Khan, as if he hadn’t been staring at it every day 


43 


for the past two years, sitting in an armchair next to the model. 


“Sit there, it has a particularly good view,” he points to the chair. Jesper has no time to 
sit in the chair: “Wait, the propellers, do they...” 


“Now go back to that switch, and push it up one more notch,” Khan says with a sly, 
cunning smile. Jesper puts his hands on his forehead, and his mouth falls open. The 
swan’s large silver propellers, sharp as knives - six of them for manoeuvring on the 
sides, under the ship, pointed towards the ground at different angles, and two even 
larger ones at the stern - start rotating slowly and then with an increasingly loud hum. 
The individual blades disappear, leaving only glowing, hazy disks. The propellers are so 
large and dynamically directed that Jesper has the impression that the ship is about to 
take off from the display case and fly away, disappearing from the room and from history. 


The hull of the ship bears the beautiful inscription “Harnankur” in the Graad script. 


Jesper unscrews the cap of his water bottle, and Khan makes himself coffee. They sit 
at the edge of the display case, in armchairs. Looking at the ship, the interior designer 
now feels the same foolish hope that Khan can sometimes infect him with. Still wearing 
his morning robe and pyjama pants, that lazy cat sips his hot coffee, and Jesper looks at 
him in surprise. “It’s seven o’clock, tell me you weren’t asleep?” 


“A little depressing, I know.” 


“That’s what it is,” Jesper laughs a dark laugh and then stares at “Harnankur’” for a long 
time. “I wonder why he didn’t call? Tereesz. Right away. I’ve been fidgeting for two 
nights. It’s getting on my nerves.” 


“I’m not fidgeting. I’m just like this, with a nocturnal lifestyle all the time. Kind of an 
artist type,” Khan smiles. “Maybe he found out something from Hird and started right 
away.” 


“So you don’t think Hird himself might have done something...” 


“... done something? Pfft! Hardly. Fantasy! You can’t even imagine how much those 
guys can lie. I did ten! I did a hundred thousand, I did more than Erno Pasternak! They 
have everything in numbers and fame. But that drawing was...” 


“One-on-one! I know!” 
“Exactly. Something should come out of it.” 


“Something, yeah.” Jesper gets up and takes his bag from the coat hanger. “But I don’t 
think Tereesz is fishing somewhere. As far as I know, we have, you know, an agreement. 
That when it comes to girls, we do it together.” 


“That’s right...” agrees Khan, but out of the corner of his eye he still peers at “Harnankur” 
with a mysterious absent-mindedness. Until a soft black parcel lands on his lap. 


“See! One... er... female acquaintance brought it for me. She must have thought I’d 
gained weight. Or something. Should be fine for you.” Khan pulls out a brand new 
Perseus Black dress shirt from the package labelled “P.B.” 


“Thanks, man!” he’s sincerely grateful. 


“You can throw that rag with frills away now.” 


Tereesz’s potato-coloured kojko hair is wet from the rain and appears almost black. 


44 


“Excuse me, do you happen to have change for ten real?” he crouches down behind the 
entire kiosk counter in his long coat. 


The teenage girl chews gum indifferently. “No, we don’t.” 


“Very well, then I’ll have the cheapest thing you have - a box of matches, for example - 
and please give me coins in return.” 


“Sorry, sir, we don’t sell matches.” Nothing is more unpleasant than a whining teenage 
girl. The girl stretches the toothpaste-blue gum between her mouth and fingers. 


“Damn it, how about ‘Astra’?” 
“What?” 

“ ‘Astra.’ ” 

“What is that?” 


“... A lollipop. Give me that lollipop there, now!” A raspberry-flavoured lollipop with 
caramel swirls clicks against Machejek’s crooked teeth. He piles coins clattering into 
the pay phone. The cabin has a sweet smell of rain, it’s nice to watch how the water 
droplets flow down the glass. Tereesz likes the cabin. The lollipop is good too. Good 
thing there were no matches. The phone pressed between his shoulder and ear, he turns 
the numbers. His head has cleared up a lot. The caramel is sweet and the raspberry 
is sour, just like raspberries are. Damn, Jesper is never home! On the table, under 
the phone, the notebook with the Collaboration Police emblem is open for the phone 
numbers. Tereesz’s wet fingers leave stains on it. 


“K, K, Kabroleva, Khan.” The wheel rattles again and outside the glass, dozens and 
dozens of people come out of the department store and go in. Freibank’s sea eagle 
glides over the bank’s sign, steaming and golden from the rain. 


“Hello, I’d like to speak to Inayat Khan.” 
“Is this you, Tereesz?” Khan’s mother’s worried voice crackles in the receiver. 
“Yes, ma’am, is Inayat home?” 


“Listen, Tereesz, you still listen to me. Don’t start tormenting yourself with that again. 
You know, I saw the girls’ mother one day...” 


“Yes, of course, listen, ma’am...” 
“We happened to talk a little bit...” 


Yeah, in one ear and out the other. Khan’s mother’s talk is a mood killer. “Ma’am! Please 
tell Inayat that I’ll call, it’s urgent. Sorry.” 


“Mom! Who’s there?” Khan’s shout echoes from afar, “Is it Tereez?” 


“No, it’s Pernilla Lundqvist, one of your many admirers,” the older lady says sarcastically. 
Footsteps are heard running down the cellar stairs and cars zoom past. A splash of water 
against the phone booth door. 


“Tereesz!” 
“Hi, Khan! Listen, where’s Jesper, we’re in a hurry.” 


“Here,” Jesper’s voice responds from afar. “Me here. Jesper.” There’s nothing more 
enjoyable than hearing the lively voices of your friends while hungover from ZA/UM. 


45 


“Listen, you need to get to Lovisa quickly. Nursing home ‘Skymning’. Look somewhere, 
I don’t know, in the phone book. Visiting hours end at eight o’clock.” 


“Okay, ‘Skymning’. What’s there?” 

“Deerek Trentmoller. And, you know, I think... Kexholm’s circle.” 
“Tereesz, Kexholm’s circle is a horror story for women!” 

“Tt’d be better if it were.” 


“Why do you think it isn’t?” Jesper tries to squeeze himself behind the phone, “Khan, 
ask him why he thinks it isn’t.” 


“Why do you think it isn’t?” 

“Listen, we’ll talk about it on-site, okay.” 

“Okay, we’ll take a taxi. Jesper, do you have taxi money?” 
“Yes.” 

“Okay, we’ll take a taxi!” 


What follows is just the weight and mass of time and space between places, the taxi ride: 
pedestrians in dark clothes, a grey sky, and puffs of smoke from the engine. Tereesz 
Machejek. Autumn moments like smooth traffic in a row. Yes, Khan’s mother saw the 
girls’ mother in the doctor’s waiting room. So what if they’re her four daughters? Who 
is she anyway? “Lose all your children in one day. Can you imagine how that feels?” But 
tell me, what has this woman done to find them? So what if she has “found her peace”? 
Khan’s mother’s voice crackled in the phone: “If the girls’ mother can reconcile, can’t 
you...” We can’t. You see, we’re mnemotourists. We love the girls - yes, I dare say it 
- we love them more. Even this moment, the evening city sliding past the taxi window, 
where the world is going wrong and time is disjointed, is a crime. It must be rectified. 
Solved. No peace. No truce with the furies. 


And listen! Traffic glides by the side window, distant trumpet calls, long notes that shift 
out of place. Waiting. An hour, two hours, three hours, evening, the next morning, the 
next week, winter, spring, a year, the next year, ten, twenty years. Time-like crack- 
ling sounds from a cloudy sky. The summer rain wants to break loose! Boys, a little 
mnemotour? Why are you standing there, whining, you’re such a mnemoturist?! Some 
are exploring the Pale between the isolas, they’re called entroponauts, and some are 
discovering new lands, they’re explorers, but you! Mnemotourists! When the sense of 
normality creeps up again, leave behind the burnt shells of your present and dwell again 
in the days of wonder! 


The air is heavy with the impending rain. Swallows swoop over the water, catching 
insects. Jesper watches approvingly. 


At first, only a few heavy drops fall, unnoticed. It is still so hot, the sun shining like a 
white blade between the clouds. And the Safre archaeologists are off to Anise Islands 
to search for traces of the Gon-Tzu expedition. But Jesper knows what’s coming. These 
sudden downpours always lurk in the Katla summer clouds. And Jesper also knows what 
time to turn on the radio in the morning. “Today’s weather,” the announcer says. It’s all 
part of the plan. 


Khan shifts closer to Malin while telling a story. He can already feel the hem of her 
skirt tickling his shin. The others listen to Khan’s story, but Jesper retrieves the beach 


46 


umbrellas from the bushes. He opens the girls’ umbrella, just as thunder rolls through 
the sunlit cloud cover. Anni lifts her head and laughs. The sun-drenched rain curtain 
rattles over the beach and the cliff. At Jesper’s signal, two more umbrellas open: Khan 
opens his without interrupting his story, and Tereesz covers both Charlotte, who listens 
with her chin in her hand and the showy little Maj. Maj has braided her grown-out boyish 
hair into small tufted ponytails. The manoeuvre is executed brilliantly. The knights just 
smirk at the girls’ laughter. 


“So warm! Feel it!” Anni sticks her hand out from under the umbrella into the rain. 
Her back arches in front of Jesper. The boy murmurs something in response and gazes 
spellbound at the birthmark bird path on Anni’s arched back. His hand wants to reach 
out and count the stars. The dusty smell of rain permeates deep into his nostrils. How 
long is the memory’s exposure time? 


“Oh!” Anni extends her neck and shakes her head in the rain. “You’re so different when 
you're not at school.” 


“Aha,” nods Malin in agreement, “prepared!” 
“Kind of like, older, would you say?” Tereesz raises an eyebrow inquiringly at Charlotte. 


“Hey, I saw you once in line for lunch,” the girl chuckles and chews on a straw in a glass 
of sparkling apple cider. “I really couldn’t say.” 


“But back then Tereesz was still a boy,” Jesper teases. “Now, though... a man.” 


Malin is getting closer. Under the third umbrella, there is just enough room for the girl 
to curl up. The golden wreath of hair falls to Khan’s knees, and rain patters on the beach 
umbrella. The girl tucks her head down and looks up at Khan, long and foreign, with 
shimmering dark green eyes. Khan swallows. Malin is the only girl who doesn’t want 
cider. 


“How does the story end?” Her voice comes from some unfamiliar place: “Why didn’t 
they come back?” 


“Well, that’s the question,” Khan coughs, “Why didn’t they come back then?” 


Malin suddenly bursts into giggles, wicked dimples flashing in her delight: “They didn’t 
want to give their immortal peaches to the stupid emperor!” 


“Fool,” Khan blurts out accidentally, “There’s no such thing as immortal peaches!” 


Charlotte sits up: “But maybe there is, how do you know? You think that’s how it was, 
that Gon-Tzu and those thousand sailors didn’t dare to come back, the emperor will kill 
them, right? But if I were Gon-Tzu,” Charlotte looks over to little Maj and draws dragon 
whiskers with her fingers, “and I found the immortal peaches - I wouldn’t tell anyone! 
I would share them secretly, only with my best friends. And then we would travel the 
world together for a thousand years. And see what wonders people come up with!” 


“Would you give me immortal peaches too, Lotte?” Little Maj looks up at her oldest 
sister. 


“Of course. When you grow up, I'll give you some.” 
“Why do I have to grow up?” 
“So you can be a young lady forever, not like a little beetle,” Charlotte teases. 


“Not...” Tereesz shakes her head and watches as terrible Charlotte’s hair brushes her 
shoulder like a paintbrush, chin proudly raised, “...not as pretty.” 


47 


Khan and Jesper, startled by Tereesz’s sudden change of strategy, don’t know what to 
say. Charlotte exhales, and her chest slowly deflates. Capillary burst on her cheeks. 


Tereesz stares at her: “But me? Could I also get your immortal peaches?” 


“We'll see.” The girl grins and gathers herself: “But first, you should bring me some- 
thing.” 


“Just tell me what.” 


Khan sees Malin secretly exchanging glances with the girls out of the corner of his eye. 
Something is happening. 


Anni pulls up her tennis skirt over her tanned legs. “Next time it’s our turn, isn’t it? 
And our place. Don’t think we don’t have our own secret spot,” her eyes flash at Jesper, 
“What are you guys doing on Saturday?” 


The boys aren’t doing anything on Saturday: “Absolutely nothing, let me check my cal- 
endar - nothing!” 


“We’re going to the countryside for a week. Gardening,” Anni’s back arches, she rises 
on tiptoes and slips the waist of her skirt over her rear, “but we could meet up at the 
beach on Saturday evening?” 


“Sure thing. No, sure thing. Absolutely,” the boys mutter in unison. 


Charlotte’s purse jingles. The girls’ gazes reflect back and forth between the boys like 
trigonometry. The rain stops, but a few drops still sparkle. The bright sun emerges from 
behind a cloud, and the goddess from ninth grade stretches in its rays, placing her hands 
over Maj’s ears and squinting at the boys: “This is our half. Bring cherry speed.” 


“What?!” Jesper is dumbfounded, mouth agape. 


“Cher-ry spe-ed,” Anni enunciates. Her red tongue touches the roof of her mouth at the 
“d” sound. 


“It’s like amphetamine,” Charlotte speaks matter-of-factly. Her breasts rise and fall as 
she breathes while speaking. “Just, you know... special. It’s really good. And we want 
to do it with you guys.” 


Silence. 
Rain-soaked rosehips steam in the sun. 
A sea eagle hovers in the sky. 


“Maj is staying home, right...” Tereesz is still thinking of those funny braids sticking up 
from her head. Khan and Jesper see him smoking his “Astra” next to Charlotte. 


“Of course, silly!” 
“Davai then,” he shouts, “let’s get it done!” 


Malin smiles, infinite joy reflected in her eyes, facing Khan. As befits a teacher’s daugh- 
ter, she starts giving instructions: “Zigi’s number is in the wallet. Call him then, okay? 
He’ll have it.” 


48 


8. LINOLEUM SALESMAN 


The Linoleum Salesman travels from town to town. In Norrkoping, he sold linoleum 
along the banks of a large frozen river. Small wooden churches and narrow streets. The 
Linoleum Salesman admired the wooden architecture and the frozen silence of the North. 
By nine o’clock at night, the streets were empty and the wind blew through the city. The 
wind blew, coat tails flapping, and thick snow fell on the roofs of the houses. Snow fell in 
the Linoleum Salesman’s heart. Rows of orange streetlights. What images flickered in 
his mind that evening? In his rented room, under a blanket. What stories, what patience. 
In the neighbour’s garden, the Linoleum Salesman admired two brothers: faces like 
gears, mouths pursed, and cheeks red from the cold. And in Arda, at the beginning of 
the mountains, where fjords cut into the valleys between the peaks. Houses the colour 
of red clay at the foot of a snowy giant. And at night, when the window panes blinked in 
the dark like small eyes and the mountains’ blackened teeth were bared to the sky. But 
their smiles were nothing compared to the Linoleum Salesman’s smile. 


He practised. Lowering his chin like a caterpillar, raising his upper lip. The man in the 
hotel room mirror became sly. What if he were to enter like this? Into a low-ceiling, 
concrete-walled basement. What would it be like to see something like that? Look now, 
beauty, look at me now. 


Then, when the linoleum factory closed down, times became hard. But the Linoleum 
Salesman got back on his feet. He made new contacts and met importers. A new 
linoleum factory opened. And wherever he went, whatever he looked at, he always 
wanted to see more. He sold linoleum but thought of himself as a day photographer. For 
him, the world has preserved its hidden landscapes and beauty furnaces that no other 
person can see. 


Like a child with a kaleidoscope, he dismantled the shapes. In Graad, above winter’s 
orbit, the Linoleum Salesman was selling linoleum. The magnet train was raging on 
the northern plateau. Outside the windows it was dark and the aurora was above the 
plain. In the toilet of the restaurant car, the dark mountain tunnel swallowed the train. 
And then, when the Linoleum Salesman came out, his hands were full of broken glass. 
Where did the charming flower mandala go? It beckons, hidden, it is interesting but then 
disappoints with its ugly structure, a show-off. The Linoleum Salesman lost his patience. 
His greedy nerves were raging. Jelinka. In Polarasul, a man rubbed snow on his face, 
but the snow only melted from his hot nerves. 


Now he rests, trying to take care of himself. He works, selling linoleum to construction 
stores, interior design offices, and retailers. Brown linoleum. Linoleum with flowers. He 
comes down from the north to Vaasa. In Kexholm, selling linoleum in the elite garden 
suburb of Lovisa, he sees something new. Something he thought he would never see. He 
sees other Linoleum Salesmen. Only they’re not really Linoleum Salesmen. In the gay 
park on a mattress, he talks to the Ticket Inspector about Vaasa, the feeling of safety, 
schools, and liberal education. The aspen grove rustles. And the rest too. They have 
new ideas and knowledge. They tell each other their stories. The Garden Equipment 
Renter, the Foot Doctor... 


“Briefing.” Tereesz looks at the silver watch that his colleagues from the Missing Persons 
Department gave him for his tenth anniversary. “Five minutes.” He marches through 
the retirement home park with Khan and Jesper, the folds of his coat fluttering. 


49 


“Okay, okay, ‘briefing’, Khan falls behind the others.”I’m in pain, I need to rest.” 


Jesper hurries. “Listen, you have a serious heart problem. I think we all agree - you 
should see a doctor.” 


“T agree,” Tereesz agrees. The white window frames of the houses glow in the dim light 
behind the fence. The leaves rustle under Jesper’s suede shoes. He looks at the mud 
splatters on the shoe tip and then shrugs. The sweet smell of decay. He is nervous about 
waiting. 


“Your local authority could be more accommodating,” Agent Machejek continues. “The 
collaboration initiative and international sentiment were lacking.” 


Khan tries to keep up. “Did you get to interrogate?” 
“T did, I did.” 
“Yesterday?” 


“No, this morning. They dragged it out. Nothing I could do. I was on the phone all day 
yesterday, I don’t know, like an acrobat. A hundred calls. Sorry.” Tereesz is a brilliant 
liar. Jesper doesn’t doubt for a second: “Whatever, hey, what did Hird say?” 


“He didn’t see them.” 


Jesper notices Khan’s sigh of relief and furrows his eyebrows suspiciously. He is honestly 
a little disappointed. All this preparation. For nothing. Ah, let the funeral party begin. 


“Wait, wait, that’s not all,” Tereesz raises a finger. He wears black leather gloves and 
smiles at his gesture. “Hird was so kind and gave me a name. Deerek Trentmoller. 
That’s where he heard it from.” 


Khan suddenly stops and looks angrily at Tereesz. “He just gave you that name and told 
you everything honestly? He talked?” 


Jesper doesn’t understand why Khan doubts his friend’s interrogation skills: “Well, you 
were also hammering him with questions, right? In Graad style,” he looks approvingly 
at Tereesz and walks on. “So. Deerek, who? Trentmoller?” 


“Exactly. I checked. It all fits. They shared a cell eighteen years ago. The last year of 
Deerek’s sentence. He was released early. There’s one more twist to this, remind me 
later. Anyway. Together they got each other riled up with their stories, and then, one day, 
Hird has a really juicy one. Deerek feels like he owes him. Anyway, he starts blabbing. 
He recognises a guy... wait-wait! From the Kexholm circle. 


“Come on! Bullshit!” Khan is unimpressed. Tereesz is not bothered. “This guy is from 
that circle - let’s assume for a moment that there is some kind of circle, right - and 
he’s like... a leader. Seriously a bad person. And dangerous. A few years after the girls 
disappear, the leader comes to Deerek and starts talking about how he and his friends 
abducted the girls. They’re lovers, by the way, the leader and Deerek.” 


“Nice.” 


“And Deerek can’t tell anyone anything, otherwise they’ll kill him. So. Now Deerek 
tells Hird. And you can’t imagine the things that, in the format of Hird’s and Deerek’s 
conversation, are... errr... interesting. I also looked up Deerek a bit. As much as I could 
find in the Kronstadt papers. A paedophile. Molested his sister’s children, mainly the 
family. Nothing serious. The woman eventually turned him in. Deerek is a coward. Tells 
the pastor how much he regrets it and how it’s something that pushes him.” Tereesz 


50 


“ 


sceptically shakes his hands as he says this and then continues: “... and all the rest of 


the diabolical stuff that comes with it.” 


Under the trees is the back of the nursing home. The veranda has white painted wooden 
edges, the stone stairs lead to the back door. Time-appropriate red walls, and fragile 
wooden architecture. Just the kind of house from Vaasa’s past that would remind its 
inhabitants of their youth. Chestnuts drop their last leaves on the roof of “Skymning”. 


“Now, of course, Deerek is seventy years old. Or seventy-five, you do the math. And do 
you know why he was let go earlier?” 


Khan and Jesper don’t know why Deerek Trentmoller, the homosexual lover of the leader 
of the Kexholm paedophile ring, was released from prison earlier. 


“He became senile.” 


“What? So, in his sixties or something?” Jesper understands the complications that could 
arise. 


“Something like that, yes.” 
“Totally senile?” 


“T don’t know. It wasn’t written in there how senile. Anyway, the situation deteriorated. 
Quickly. We’ll see.” 


Khan shuffles up the stairs of the retirement home after the others. The three of them 
stand in front of the arched wooden door. Tereesz rings the bell. 


“Drawing...” Khan pants, hands on his knees. “Where did Hird get the drawing?” 


“Tt’s like a relic there. It goes from hand to hand. If we can find the man who had it 
originally, we’ll have our funeral party. That I promise you. We can finally start living.” 
Tereesz rings the bell again, this time a little angrily. “Only Hird finally put up. The 
leader of Kexholm...” At Khan’s glance, Tereesz corrects himself, “The leader of the 
supposed Kexholm group gave it to Deerek, and Deerek showed it to Hird. It seems to 
me that Hird was just a bit curious. You know, to see what happens.” 


Tereesz smiles evilly. 


Vaasa slumbers in the blissful peace of the ’50s. Winter is ending. Icicles drip from 
the eaves onto the pavement, leaving holes in the ice. The days are getting longer, and 
somewhere far away, in the yard of a central school, Sven von Fersen is picking on an 
overweight immigrant. What did he think, that Malin would enjoy hearing such hurtful 
talk? Huh? Was it really so? Tereesz stands at the far end of the yard and doesn’t 
dare to intervene. He hopes that Jesper will start to feel too much pain from watching. 
Reflection. 


The Linoleum Salesman walks along the suburban sidewalks, his boots stained with salt 
from melting snow. He hasn’t slept all night, the bright light and sun reflections on the 
ice are hurting his eyes. His hands shake from coffee, his head is throbbing. A tense, 
red, pulsating relay of nerves. Thousands of images from their nighttime conversation 
swirl in the Linoleum Salesman’s mind. He puts his hand in his pocket, where there’s 
a hole cut with scissors at the bottom. He takes the horse-drawn tram in circles and 
gets off at Fahlu stop every time, slips under the bridge, looks at the willow thicket, and 
gets back on the tram from the other side of the road. The Linoleum Salesman’s head 
rests against the window. Sometimes he falls asleep, but even then his imagination 


51 


keeps going, taking increasingly strange poses, spreading his legs before him. Even 
when he sleeps, he wants. But the Linoleum Salesman trains his nerves. The tram clock 
strikes two outside the window, and the school day is over. The Linoleum Salesman’s 
jaws tremble, he is awake. Children pour out of the tram cabin. In the garage at home, 
there are rolls of linoleum lined up. He lives here now. In Vaasa, Kexholm. He walks 
the streets of the Lovisa suburb. The Linoleum Salesman hangs onto the handrail. He 
wants to squirm. An old lady looks at him strangely. It’s the same old lady. She was 
on the tram the day before yesterday. And yesterday. He can’t take it anymore, he has 
to choose. Fahlu station comes, and the Linoleum Salesman gets off. He slips under 
the bridge and looks at his willow thicket of longings. He can’t bear it anymore. Small 
ice mounds drip from the willow branches, and the Linoleum Salesman’s breath warms 
them up. Drip, drip. The sun sparkles on a water drop, and the visions disappear on 
the other side of the willow thicket. Four in a row. The smallest one talks incessantly. 
Blah, blah, blah. This is the most beautiful moment in the Linoleum Salesman’s life. He 
wants them. After that, it’s over. He kills himself and frees the world from the Linoleum 
Salesman. But first, them. 


The smell of heart medication makes one nauseous. Jesper wipes his neck and nervously 
adjusts the tie in his sweater collar. It seems like all those joint ointments have somehow 
made it onto his skin. He doesn’t know why anyone would hold onto life so desperately. 
White lace curtains are tied on either side of the window, and something crawls on the 
walls of Deerek Trentmoller’s room turned into a makeshift ward. Tree branch shadows 
on the floral wallpaper. Occasionally, when a motorised carriage passes by with a hiss, 
the shadows come to life from the headlights and slide in the dim light. The table lamp 
is yellow. Layers of flowers and tree branches slide over each other. Death - the word 
that rarely appears in the boys’ conversations, as if it doesn’t exist. Everything just 
disappears and goes away. 


When the time comes, Jesper steps out into the December air. The light of the cube 
house stays behind him, and ski trails lead to the outskirts of town. Barren fields spread 
under the snow, and Jesper crosses over them, to where the wall of trees darkens. Zig- 
zag drom, the branches of spruces brush his white coat. Dark forest, eyes green with 
darkness. In the cold air, girls’ voices ring out like jingle bells, they are waiting... under 
eternal ice, in a pristine environment untouched for millions of years; deep in the lungs 
of Graad, where no human is allowed to go. Jesper doesn’t tell anyone about it. 


Deerek’s room, or rather, the ward, is cluttered with tubes. Family pictures stand in 
frames, on a small bookshelf. Glowing glass. Jesper doesn’t dare to look at those photos. 
Children, nieces? Will these caretakers clean here someday too? Above the bed stands 
a silver icon of Dolores Dei, and below it sits Deerek Trentmdller, hands folded on his 
lap, a plaid bedspread on his shoulders. A tiny silver cross shines around his neck. The 
frame of the drip bag stands tall at the head of the bed. 


“Boys, my memory is fading... Tomorrow I wouldn’t recognise you. It’s the best thing 
that ever happened to me. It’s like a blessing, for someone like me. Some mornings I 
wake up and don’t even remember my own name. I don’t remember who I am. Let alone 
those things...” 


Tereesz stands with his hands behind the curtains, examining the window frames. “You 
seem pretty good now,” he turns around. “Who did you get the drawing from? Of Anni- 
Elin Lund’s back. Who?” 


“Oh, dear...” Mr. Trentmoller’s liver-spotted face trembles and he looks tired, “I don’t re- 


52 


member such things anymore. The things I want to remember, I don’t. I don’t remember 
my son. So then, those things...” 


“Don’t fool around with me, Deerek.” Tereesz squats in front of the old man and puts 
his hands on his knees. Khan watches with fear as Agent Machejek pierces Deerek’s 
clouded eyes. “Now focus, you talked to your cellmate, Vidkun Hird - you don’t want to 
say you don’t remember Vidkun Hird? Who could forget? You talked...” Tereesz puts his 
hand under the old man’s chin and turns his face towards him again, “Do you hear me? 
I know you told Vid kun Hird in prison that you know someone who kidnapped four 
Lund girls from Charlottesjal beach, twenty years ago. And you drew a sketch of one of 
the girl’s birthmarks as proof. Deerek, the sketch matches!” 


Tears flow down Mr. Trentmoller’s flabby cheeks. 
“Deerek! Hey! The sketch matches!” 


“T did... I went to the gay park. I don’t remember, I don’t want to...” Deerek whines his 
old man’s whine, but Tereesz gets angrier and angrier. His upper lip is starting to curl 
around his tobacco-stained teeth. Deerek pulls back as if he’s seen a ghost, but Tereesz’s 
hand is on the emergency button. “If you’re not cooperative because of your memory 
sickness, then know this! We have a machine nowadays. It’s like an ice cream scoop, 
Deerek. I'll scoop out whatever I need from your brain and then...” 


“Tereesz!” Khan has got up from his chair and is holding his shoulder. 
“... then comes the blessing!” 


“Tereesz, don’t start with that!” Jesper doesn’t understand. He watches in confusion as 
the agent hovers over Deerek, his hand on the alarm button. Khan angrily pulls him by 
the shoulder, “You know how this will ruin you, Tereesz, you know. We need you in the 
CoPo. You must not get fired. I have ideas too, we don’t need...” 


Tereesz calms down. “Okay. Jesper, get the door.” Jesper peers out into the empty 
corridor. The retirement home is quiet in the evening as if abandoned. He pulls the 
door shut. Heart pounding in his chest, the man rests his back against the doorknob 
and nervously ruffles his blonde hair. The air in the room is thick and Jesper can see the 
old man shivering on the bed. He hides his face from Tereesz with his hands. 


“Linoleum Salesman,” says the Collaboration Police agent in a single word. 
The man’s sad, wrinkled eyes grow wide, and his eyebrows rise. “Who?” 


“The linoleum salesman. Your boyfriend. He made the drawing. He told you about the 
girls. Who is he? Who, Deerek?!” 


“He’s just... He was just.” Deerek doesn’t cry anymore. The tears dry on his cheeks. The 
old man slumps under the sun as if struck by lightning. “Just a linoleum salesman. They 
all were. That’s what they called themselves, professions.” A weary sigh rolls from his 
mouth, “Oh Lord, help me...” 


It’s quiet in the room, a lone motorbike whizzes by outside and the shadows of trees 
glide across Jesper, opposite the door. Khan quietly pushes Tereesz aside. “Very good, 
Deerek. See how good it is now,” he looks at the old man under the blanket with his big 
almond eyes. “You’re going to help us find these girls, aren’t you.” 


“Two places,” Tereesz whispers to Khan. 


“Two places, Deerek. Tell us two places this man went. Where he lived, and in which 
district? Do you know that?” 


53 


“In Kexholm, they were all in Kexholm.” 


“Very good. Excellent. And now another one. Think, Deerek, think where else the 
Linoleum Salesman was inscribed. Help us find the girls. Where did he go?” 


“He was looking at them... on the beach. At a hotel.” 
“Havsanglar?” Tereesz paces nervously under the window. 
“T don’t remember, please...” 


“Got it,” Tereesz nods and takes two steps towards the door, “Havsanglar. Let’s go!” 


Eighteen years ago. Vidkun Hird sits in the corner of a cubicle at a homemade desk, a 
single strand of old-fashioned combed-back hair clinging to his forehead - now you could 
still say “classic”. Vidkun is young. Relatively. The forehead is not yet covered with 
curls, the cheeks are just beginning to sink into a Nordic bulldog look. There are heaps 
of manuscripts on the desk. Philosophy of the future, historicist, eugenicist universal 
theory. It explains all things in the world, it is his legacy to mankind. 


“Vidkun Hird: ‘Vidkun Hird’” is written on the cardboard cover, in bold letters. Two 
reform beds line the wall, and daylight seeps in through a small window in the ceiling. 


Deerek Trentmoller lies on the bed. Old. And somehow distracted. He takes the silver 
cross from around his neck, looks at it for a moment and then starts to laugh. “Oh! 
You’re going to love it! I think it even has a certain superhumanity about it. Adventure 
and science at times, and all that, no doubt, beyond good and evil.” 


What a spiritual honeymoon! Deerek talks and Vidkun takes notes. Nods knowingly. 
Asks to pause for a moment, then replaces the inkwell. The window’s beam of light 
creeps across the floor and spreads on the steel door. It’s getting dark, and Vidkun 
lights the table lamp. He lifts a sheet of paper into the air and blows on it. 


Good times, good times. 


Deerek stretches in the middle of the room and leans closer to Vidkun: “And you know 
what he said then? Linoleum salesman. I’ll never forget it! He did ‘brilliant surgery’ 
on them. He ‘joined them together’. The smallest one died. The others survived. You 
understand, like that.” 


Linoleum Salesman. Linoleum Salesman. The Linoleum Salesman reaches out his hand 
for toilet paper. The salty sea air seeps into the room from the balcony of Havsanglar, 
and there is a telescope on the reed mat. A special camera is connected to the telescope. 
Afterwards, he wanders around outside. 


He reads the timetable in the waiting pavilion, but the last tram has already gone towards 
the city. Girls on board. The summer evening is warm and makes the man’s heart tender. 
He takes off his sandals. He walks barefoot on the warm asphalt. The asphalt is light 
and crumbly. The tram rails are cool. Charlottesjal in the evening. He loves it. He loves 
the girls. He loves the beach, where nothing means anything anymore. He is in love. 
“Tt will never happen to me,” he thought as the aurora borealis curved over the polar 
ice cap. Couples under the cover of greenhouses. Snow was falling behind the glass. 
It never happens to Linoleum Salesman. But he loves the beach. And the girls. One in 
particular. Especially that one. And others too. 


54 


Sand under bare feet. Between his toes. Warm in the daytime. And then damp. He 
walks along the water’s edge. Music can be heard from the gardens, and lights from 
the houses shine far away among the pine trees. Away, under the rocky cliff, where no 
one can see. The rocks are slippery from the water, cold under his bare feet. Where did 
his shoes go? He doesn’t remember. He walks among the stones, under the rocky cliff, 
waves splashing onto his trousers. Gentle darkness, he sinks to his knees and laughs. 
The pine trees rustle. Swim! He goes into the water between the rocks, no one sees how 
happy he is. The trousers get wet, and he slips and hits his knee. So what! The water is 
dark and warm, and the stars are in the sky. 


“To Telefunken!” Jesper snaps his fingers. “I know people there, it’s close. You can make 
as many calls as you want from there, Tereesz. Work your magic.” His hand is raised 
and the three of them try to hail a taxi on the only main road in the Lovisa suburb. Cars 
whiz past. On the other side of the road rises a wall of trees, and traffic is sparse in the 
evening. “It’s half past nine, we’ll make it.” 


Khan follows behind. “I don’t know... what’s the point of rushing. Let’s talk.” 


“Nothing to talk about, we’ll make some calls. We’re flying in tonight.” Besides Jesper, 
Tereesz is also eager, his hand is raised even for those taxis whose yellow lights are not 
on. “What are we waiting for? Aren’t you tired of waiting?” 


“Exactly. And I don’t care,” Jesper hops on one foot. A passing carriage splashes his 
clothes dirty. “If you think I desperately want to know what kind of awful, ruinous - 
very emotional, Khan - machine you, Tereesz, use, then I’m not interested. You do your 
job and you don’t have time. Three days are the time in which the chances of finding 
someone, especially a child, alive, decrease by half every day. One hundred, fifty, twenty- 
five per cent, Khan. What would you do?” 


“That doesn’t matter! Damn it!” The rain above slowly turns into late autumn sleet. A 
splash from under the wheel sweeps over Khan. “You and your taxis, the stop is right 
ahead! Jesper, you don’t understand, you don’t understand how it affects us! Fucking 
mescaline... lysergic...” 


“Here it is! Stop!” Jesper runs after the taxi stopping by the roadside and shouts back, 
“So you would use good cop tactics, right?” 


“Seriously, enough...” Tereesz grumbles in the taxi, by the window. 


Khan slides in sideways into the passenger compartment and pants, “You see, Jesper... 
you don’t understand that this thing is... illegal. In all the countries that have signed the 
declaration... Which, incidentally, are precisely the countries where the Collaboration 
Police have, well...” 


“Authority,” Tereesz finishes Khan’s sentence from the front and tells the driver, “Tele- 
funken.” 


For a moment, the car is quiet. The engine starts. Sleet sizzles under the wheels. Jesper 
searches for an argument, but Tereesz beats him to it. “Yes. I used the machine on Hird. 
My decision. He would never - never - have told us anything. He would have sat there, 
he would have smirked. He would have talked to me for two hours about crossbreeding 
gipsies and blacks, and that’s it.” 


“But Tereesz,” Khan’s voice takes on a whiny tone, “they will fire you!” 


“Tt’s under control. And you know what? I don’t want to talk about it anymore.” 


55 


The next day. The Linoleum Salesman’s long gaze glistens in the warm summer rain. 
The image shakes as he adjusts the tripod, then becomes still - sharp, clear. The sound 
of rain rustles in the Linoleum Salesman’s ears. The clouds brighten in the sun, and rain 
falls onto the hotel balcony. The wet edge of the beach extends over half of the reed 
covering. And the rain rustles down on the beach, but in his mind, he hears the joyful 
drumming of raindrops on the parasol. A small red-flowered parasol in the telescope’s 
eye. It is almost a kilometre away, on a cliff, but the Linoleum Salesman stretches his 
hand out into the rain and touches it. “Get out of the way, fat boy,” he says. The Linoleum 
Salesman bought a women’s magazine from the city. On the cover was the fashionably 
dressed Ann-Margret Lund, a woman in politics. And there were pictures inside. Ann- 
Margret in her beautiful apartment. And there she was with her four daughters on a 
coffee-coloured couch. Under the picture were the names and ages in a row. 


Anni-EFlin... 


What stories he came up with that day when he first saw them. Horrible things. How 
he takes them on. The Linoleum Salesman is a doctor, he is a doctor. Doctor Linoleum 
Salesman. And he sets them in motion like this. Walking towards him. And he still 
couldn’t get enough of it. How his nerves hummed, hungry, they wanted to eat them 
alive, those nerves. And how it all receded. When he came here. What a place! They 
chatted, on two tram seats facing each other. He was behind them. And the Linoleum 
Salesman smelled the scent of their white, white hair. The tram rolled down the hill, and 
the horses trotted. The beach came to him, not the other way around. And the four of 
them led him there. Dust rose from the asphalt, reeds swayed, and the sun shone pale in 
the blue sky. It was not like those other beaches, in Arda and nearby in Vaasa, Ostermalm, 
where the Linoleum Salesman sweated. He wriggled among disgusting, flabby bodies 
and chased after small wrinkled puppies with his eyes. This is not the Jelinka swimming 
pool, where the Linoleum Salesman’s eyes were red from chlorine and he had to wait 
two hours before he could get out of the pool. 


The wind ruffled his hair. And the vastness! The world could fit inside it. The wind blew; 
he took the highest hotel room so that the wind could blow in and cool down the Linoleum 
Salesman. He looked at them tenderly, not daring to go down to the beach. Near them. 
He would turn to ashes if he even touched them. He took pictures. The photons travelled, 
and the same light that sunburned the girl’s back bounced off her tiny birthmarks and 
etched onto the pitch-black negative. White dots like stars in the night sky. The shutter 
speed of memory. He made a linen cord, and a noose, and masturbated. For the last 
time. His breath fluttered against the sheet and with the semen, the Linoleum Salesman 
came out of him. And vanished. 


The memory of the Linoleum Salesman and everything the Linoleum Salesman saw is 
fading day by day. Drops drum against the umbrella and Anni reaches out her little hand 
into the piano tinkling of the rain. Today, when he woke up, he no longer remembered 
the Linoleum Salesman. At the photo store, when they took the family picture, a little 
morsel, the Linoleum Salesman came to mind. And later, only more rarely, the Linoleum 
Salesman comes to his mind. Anni shakes her white head in the rain, pigtails on her 
back. And only He looks tenderly through the telescope. 


Thousands of kilometres and two months more than twenty years away, on the other side 
of winter’s orbit, stands the meteorological research vessel “Rodionov” trapped in ice. It 
is half past twelve on a polar night. In front of the crew, the spotlight beams spread out 


56 


over the North Channel, a cold vision. Men in fur coats crowd the deck, their silver-grey 
collars lifted up to their fur hats. The crew is panicking. Where the darkness seems 
to thicken slightly, but the distance moves on endlessly without the slightest sense of 
horizon, that is where the Pale begins. The crew feels and fears, although no one can see 
beyond a hundred meters into the night. The research vessel’s antenna unit broadcasts a 
desperate distress signal along with scientific readings. This radio transmission reaches 
the relay station in Katla Graad Oblast, distorted grotesquely like in a curved mirror: 
“Sector-Orbit-Sector, Sector-Orbit-Sector...”. 


There are crackling sounds as the ice edge curves into the sky under the Pale, wiping 
gusts like music played backwards and ten times slower. The Pale approaches - an 
avalanche of memories of the world - and buries matter with reckless speed. The ex- 
panse of the starry sky disappears one star at a time under its rolling brush. 


In orbit, the communication satellite “Icon” sees how the Pale sweeps over the entire 
Katla North Channel with a single wave. It also engulfs Samarskilt, the stony desert 
spread in southern Samara, and half of Supramundus on Mundi. The Pale cycles, and 
curves, gathers in rebellion against the matter. The black holes swallow the eyes of 
the cycles. “Azimuth” calibrates at the stratospheric edge. The immediate zones of 
entroponetic catastrophe now include Lemminkainen, Nad-Umai ecoregion in the north- 
east Samara taiga, Graad Yekokataa, and the network of irrigated plateaus in Severnaya 
Zemlya. The remote, life-abandoned corners of matter. It is September 29", the early 
’70s. Two nights ago was the class reunion. Now it’s the end of the world. 


And Tereesz Machejek, at the Telefunken panoramic restaurant, put the phone on the 
table two hours ago and instructed the secretary of Havsanglar to read out the whole 
guest list for June and July of the fifty-second year. The table is loaded with food. The 
delicious crab claws are lying half on the phone. Khan loves delicious crab and Jesper 
explains how to suck the meat and juice out of the tube. 


“Suck, suck,” says Jesper, pointing to the waiter to take away the plates. Tonight, dinner 
is Jesper’s way. Jesper’s treat. And Jesper loves good food. He doesn’t settle for rice 
and macaroni. 


Khan sucks. “Well, I don’t know, it’s certainly better, but if you put dumplings in rice 
and macaroni...” 


Jesper sips ice water. “Tereesz, listen, I can take Kexholm myself. I’ve designed a pae- 
diatrician’s residence there and know one developer. I think he should have access to 
what he was...” 


“The population register,” says Tereesz. His shoulder throbs with pain. But the Yugo- 
Graad red wine here is so good that he wants to take a sip. And then he has to put the 
phone back on his shoulder. The secretary ended the call once already. Then Tereesz 
called the administration and asked to pass on: “The lives of four little girls will be on 
your conscience.” That worked. 


Beside his wine glass, Khan holds a notebook open and over two thousand names are 
written on the pages. 


“Halfway there, ma’am, just two thousand more,” his head throbs with Lars and Berg 
and Ake flashes in his eyes like train lights. 


“Okay then,” Jesper unfolds the napkin proudly and wipes his mouth, “it’s half past 
eleven. An hour and a half to go. Then it closes. I can bargain for two and a half. 


57 


So. Let’s start, I’ll take the population register.” 


The waiter puts another phone on the table. The rest of the guests watch the trio’s meal 
with restrained interest. A thin kojko has been reading names monotonously for two 
hours and writing them down in a notebook. A yellow-brown overweight man in Perseus 
Black’s double-collar shirt lifts his glasses, breaks a crab claw and then waves to the 
aunt at the opposite table. Tereesz’s notebook is messed up by that. “Khan, um, you 
don’t exactly have the hardest of tasks. Just deal with it!” 


“Tereesz, listen, for God’s sake, let’s take this notepad.” 
“No. It has to be in the notebook.” 
“What’s with the notebook?” 


“Deerek Trentmoller,” says Tereesz in an accustomed, mechanical voice. And then looks 
at Khan with wide-open eyes: “Deerek Trentmoller! Hello! Are you sure? Did he mark 
anything there?” 


“Vacation.” 
“What else?” 


“Linoleum Salesman,” says the secretary with a tired voice on the other end of the line. 
“Deerek fucking Trentmoller, June 17-24. Linoleum Salesman.” 


Jesper slams his fist against the table he had designed five years ago. 


Khan puts the crab claw on the plate. “Now comes ZA/UM.” 


Deerek Trentmoller dreams of a Linoleum Salesman. All the things that the Linoleum 
Salesman sees rotate before his eyes like a uniform mass of flesh and darkness. Occa- 
sionally he wakes up. He cannot sleep. Then the whirl of flesh and darkness returns 
and Deerek falls asleep. In his dream, they are lovers with the Linoleum Salesman. He 
is someone else. Through a rising, shapeless memory, a clicking is heard. The wooden 
window creaks. The glasses rattle in their frames. Then a thud and Deerek wakes up. 


Death. This must be death. Dark brown flowers on flowery wallpaper. Shadows of 
branches sway and curtains flutter in the wind. Yes, this is exactly as Deerek always 
imagined it. In front of the open window, a tall, thin figure in a fish-tailed coat appears. 
There are more of them! Fat Death falls from the windowsill with a thud and whispers, 
“Okay, inside. Keep watch.” 


Tall Death comes to the edge of the bed and disconnects the alarm button. Fat Death 
turns on the table lamp and steps over Deerek, placing a hand gently on his hair. Those 
big dark brown eyes look familiar. “Deerek. Don’t struggle. We need something from 
you now. We need you to remember, and that’s why we’re giving you a little injection. 
It’s not painful. It’s like a dream.” 


Deerek hears the click of a suitcase and Tall Death presses his gloved hand to his mouth. 
Strange smells, everything fades, kind dark brown eyes look at him. 


“But what if he really doesn’t remember? How does it work then?” 
“We'll see.” 


Deerek Trentmoller opens up in front of Tereesz. Now it is Tereesz who is by the water’s 
edge. The tiger wades through the water. He is always there, lurking. And wherever 


58 


Deerek ends, the tiger prowls around, sniffs and finds the Linoleum Salesman. In Nor- 
rkoping, in the Arda fjord town, in the magnet train, in the Jelinka polar settlement, he 
follows, his eyes phosphorescently glowing in those dark corners where the Linoleum 
Salesman goes. He is in a low-ceiling, concrete-walled basement when the Linoleum 
Salesman makes faces at his niece. When he finally arrives in Vaasa, the tiger waits at 
the station, sitting at the end of the platform and licking its paws; where the light of the 
lanterns does not reach. He rustles in the park’s alder grove and the Linoleum Salesman 
is startled. Walking on Lovisa streets on a spring morning, with a hole cut in his pocket 
with scissors, one can see into the tiger’s heart fora moment. The schoolyard is visible, 
and a fight, between small boys. 


When the Linoleum Salesman comes to Charlottesjali, Tereesz treads the wind there, he 
is a bird of prey, keeping watch. He has eagle eyes, he sees everything. Until one evening 
he sees the Linoleum Salesman disappear, on the top floor of the Havsanglar hotel. Half 
of the people have gone. Day by day, it is forgotten that the Linoleum Salesman ever 
existed. Until finally, there is only senile, old Deerek Trentmoller. 


“Linoleum, linoleum, linoleum...” he hums, “is there such a word as ‘linoleum’ at all?” A 
strange, strange feeling of loss. But it is not linoleum that he longs for. The Linoleum 
Salesman mourns himself, sometimes remembers himself and imagines a life where he 
never disappeared. He spews out disgusting talk and reads Vidkun Hird’s memoirs. 
Fantasises on his own. Deerek Trentmoller longs for something completely different. 


It is August 29", twenty years ago, and he feels bad. Something is wrong, he couldn’t 
sleep all night. The morning newspaper lies on the bathroom floor. The education min- 
ister’s four daughters are missing. Deerek Trentmoller cannot breathe, the world is 
going wrong, and time is disjointed. In the light of a red light bulb, a hobby photogra- 
pher reveals pictures taken on the hotel balcony. His hands tremble, he is sure they 
were there. Sure. But the photos on the clothesline have clothespins lined up and they 
all have horror vacui. Nothingness. 


The contours of a rocky cliff appear on the glossy paper floating in the developing tray. 
A pale summer sky. But not them. 


Khan and Jesper carry the barely conscious Tereesz into a taxi. His shoes drag along the 
ground and the man trembles. Jesper’s voice comes from the convex mirror. Jesper... 
Jesper is still a cool guy. 


“Tereesz, Tereesz! Stay awake. What do we do with you?” 

“He didn’t do it. He didn’t do it.” 

“Okay, but what do we do with you now, take you to the hospital? Tereesz!” 
Tereesz’s voice is barely audible: “What do we do now?” 

“T don’t know, you tell me! Do we take you to the hospital or let you sleep it off?” 


Tereesz tries to get his bearings. “No, you don’t understand. Dead end. I’m so sorry... I 
don’t know what to do next.” 


Khan holds Tereesz’s head down as they put him in the taxi. “Wait now, tiger. You'll 
sleep it off first. Then it’s my turn. I have a plan.” 


Tereesz faints. Everything disappears. 


59 


9. SACRED AND TERRIBLE SMELL 


What was that sacred and terrible, elusive smell in the air this time? My name is Am- 
brosius Saint-Miro, the locals call me “Ambrosius Pyha-Mira” and in Graad they call me 
“Svjata-Mira”. “Diduska?” they ask, their eyes wide with affection, but I answer them: 
“No. Iam not your diduska.” I am Ambrosius Santa-Mira from Mesque, Ambrosio Ha- 
giamira, Iam ambrosia, the holy world. You chose me, authorised me with your life, your 
thoughts, your mind cabinet. At night, when you went to sleep and tomorrow morning, 
from the window of public transport. But what I do is no longer a conversation, there 
are no arguments here, no sides to choose. The time for doubt is over. 


Icome once in every era. It is a great fortune to live when I am in the world. Iam innocent 
and now you are too. If you decided, then it was either right or wrong. If I decide, my 
decision is what is. When God still seemed like an interesting idea to you, I was Pius 
Pericarnassus; I was Erno Pasternak - you wanted to be betrayed and slaughtered. I 
made you sing Pasternakian songs. That’s how fierce I am and my unnecessary war. 
You wanted to hate me then. I was Franconegro, you were nationalists, you wanted 
international, black-coloured banknotes and militarism. Wanted to work in the factory, 
serve God. And medieval-industrial architecture, wanted to live under a concrete arch. 
I was a woman, Dolores Dei when it seemed to you: I want a mother, a perfect mother. 
I had beautiful breasts, I was young and so were you, you wanted to fall in love and I let 
you. Humanism, and Renaissance, care for each other. I sent you to school and taught 
you languages. You got tired of me, and I died. You wanted a world where I didn’t exist. 
Then I was your innocent Sola, an indifferent girl, sitting with folded hands and watching 
you make coups. “Oh, do it yourself, make mistakes, don’t learn anything,” I thought. 


I was a citizen. I went from country to country, from one insel to another, and introduced 
you to my thoughts. Everywhere I went, I infected you with my cynicism and nihilism. 
On the radio, I talked about how everything is wrong, how everything is equal, and 
pohhui, who cares? Presidents, kings, princes, and sheikhs - everyone was afraid of me, 
no one wanted to let me into their suzerainty. They didn’t want me in their publishing 
houses, on the big screen, or on their talk shows. But then, when I signed books in the 
bookstore, they saw! You broke down. And when I spoke on the radio, ratings went up. 
I was brilliantly popular. Thank you, you made me happy. They let me into their talk 
shows and there I showed what human thoughts are capable of. You may be right too. 
And how witty you are, you kept listening and laughing. You called your whole family 
to gather around the radio and together you listened, realising how special you actually 
are: “I could have a supermodel girlfriend too,” I said, “but I have chosen solitude. That 
would be bourgeois. Dear supermodel, of course, I could spend the night with you. We 
would have fun, you would be as high as a kite on cocaine, and I would stick a pipette 
full of milk up your ass and watch it squirt out. Of course, I have thought about it. But 
that wouldn’t be me anymore. That would be against everything I believe in.” 


But that’s a show. That’s not why you chose me. I was the only one who asked: what 
was that sacred and terrible smell in the air this time? I don’t have such weakness and 
arrogance that I would tell you what it is. I don’t pretend to know what a terrible beauty 
is for you. In your heart’s secret. The end of the story - I’ll show you. I want to tear 
the world apart layer by layer. And this time it’s not a deception, a figure of speech, 
it’s realpolitik. I attack. First Revachol, then Graad, and then further. It never ends. I 
open one front after another. Then, when everyone who isn’t with me is dead and the 
Pale sweeps over the whole world, then, please! Here are terminals where you can fall 
dead by yourself. Go of your own free will, it doesn’t mean anything. I’m evacuating the 


60 


world. We’ll go live in the past. In front of the polyclinic, on a park bench, you come 
back! You’re all under the parade, the rain is pouring down, and you’re talking. Your 
friends come across the square, in a snowy city, their collars raised. Only the memory 
remains of this world, an entroponetic catastrophe. 


You could never quite say exactly what it is. Even when your eyes were turned inside 
out and staring straight into your head, you couldn’t say. The ghost, slipped through all 
the lost places, irrevocability. I give it to you to take, it smells in the palm of your hands, 
the sacred and terrible smell, rub your face against it now. The Pale is ripe with colours, 
it seeps from the slimy cracks, I open the rib curtains, intermediate frequencies, and all 
the terrible lost colours of the past come out. Everything is new again. 


This is where nihilism leads. This is no longer what could be or what might not be. This 
is it. 


The whole world is in the immediate zone of an entroponetic catastrophe. 


61 


10. GOOD NIGHT, ANNI 


When Jesper arrives at his suburban home, the lights are turned off. He walks around 
in the dark, his eyes adjusting as furniture gradually emerges from the darkness. He 
doesn’t even take off his shoes. It’s clean and quiet, and over half of the wide glass 
windows have been freshly cleaned. Someone has made Tereesz’s bed. The vomit bucket 
of a Collaboration Police agent is gone, and the parquet floor shines. Mud from Jesper’s 
winter boots soaks into the sheepskin rug. Bookshelves separate the sleeping area from 
the main room, and Jesper stops. He looks at shopping bags labelled “Ozonne,” “En 
Provence,” and “Tea Shop.” There’s a scent of green tea in the air. A tiny silver dress 
hangs on a hanger attached to the shelf. The fabric sparkles in the dark. 


Slipping between the curtains, the man enters the bedroom with his hands outstretched. 
Moonlight falls on the bed from the corner window. Jesper’s model girlfriend Anita sleeps 
in the bed with her blonde hair spread out on a black pillow. A shadow runs along the 
young girl’s body, which is curved with protruding ribs and a single birthmark on her 
chest. Jesper watches as her chest rises. He tries to remember. Four years. They’ve 
been together for four years. What is she now, nineteen? Jesper is thirty-four. 


“Psst, hey, wake up!” The girl hums in her sleep like a child. Jesper blows in her ear and 
a blonde strand of hair trembles in his breath. “Anni, wake up, it’s Jesper here, hey!” 


“Hmh... Jesper, come to bed,” the girl pulls the edge of the blanket up to her chin. “It’s 
so nice and cool here...” 


“Listen, I can’t, I have to go.” 
“Go... where again?” 
“Wake up, let’s talk for a bit. Do you want me to make you some tea or something?” 


“T brought you tea, see?” The Vaasa-Oranje mixed-race model stretches, her joints pop- 
ping, and black shadows move on the surface of the blanket. “Yes, I saw it, thank you 
very much, that was very considerate of you.” 


The girl begs, her drowsy vowels long like her legs: “Let’s talk tomorrow, Jesper, let’s 
go to bed...” 


“T can’t tomorrow, I said I’m leaving. Jesper looks at the girl’s face. Silence. The clock 
with flipping numbers rustles briefly. The wind howls outside the window. 


Then the girl suddenly snorts, “Mh, don’t go to the woods with your friends again, I 
haven’t seen you at all. Let’s be together tomorrow. I came for you, remember?” 


“No, you don’t understand, I’m leaving today.” 


“Today? What time is it?” The white clock crackles. “Two in the morning! Where are 
you going like that? You’ve been acting really weird lately!” The girl props herself up 
on her elbows, her mouth drawn in a worried frown. 


“T came here because of you, I wouldn’t have come otherwise.” 


“T apologise. Really. And I apologise for what I’m about to ask, but please, come out of 
bed for a moment, I need to move it.” 


“What do you have there?” 
“Things.” 


62 


The girl stands on the cold floor, rubbing one foot against the other, looking puzzled as 
Jesper pulls the bed. The bed legs creak, the Vaasa-Oranje mixed-race model holding the 
blanket on her shoulders like a cloak. She is very beautiful, but it doesn’t mean anything 
anymore. 


“Where are you going?” 


Jesper kneels and the floorboards creak in response. “Disappearing.” The trapdoor 
opens and Jesper pulls out a snow-white, packed suitcase. 


“And when will you be back from disappearing?” 


“I feel like any clever answer I could give you would be too cold. So I better not say 
anything.” The lock opens, and Jesper takes a package of papers out of the suitcase 
pocket. The girl is annoyed. She likes those Jespers - Jesper at home, making tea, Jesper 
being productive, Jesper being awkward when showing his support - but she doesn’t like 
this Jesper. “Please don’t treat me like an idiot. This is not a cultural interview you’re 
having right now.” 


“Okay then,” Jesper nervously rolls up the papers. “Do you remember when I told you 
about the Lund girls? That I knew them, they disappeared, and so on.” 


“At my parents’ summer cottage?” The girl’s eyebrows are still suspiciously furrowed, 
but her mouth softens at the memory. “You were so drunk!” 


“See, that’s why I don’t drink,” Jesper awkwardly laughs. “But you had to beg, right?” 
“You were so funny then!” 


“So funny,” Jesper bitterly remarks, “back then. Okay. I was funny. But now, I’m going 
to look for them.” 


“Who?” 
“Cornelius Gurdit, who do you think?” 


The intricate bone structure creaks from the knees as the model sinks down against the 
wall. “But you said it was pointless! You said you were done with it. Maybe you don’t 
remember what you said?” Jesper hits his palm with a rolled-up paper and takes a few 
thoughtful steps on the floor as if he needs to consult with another Jesper - the one who 
got drunk at Anita’s parents’ summer cottage. A very inappropriate incident. A very 
inappropriate Jesper. But still, he is a thousand times smarter, a thousand times better 
off than this helpless creature here. He tousles his blond head with the paper roll and 
says, “There is hope.” 


“Jesper...” 
“You see, I have to.” 


Jesper places his real estate papers in the girl’s hands. “Stay here, take my house, live 
here, please. Sell both apartments in the city centre as quickly as you can. Prices will 
start to fall tomorrow morning. First thing in the morning, go to my broker. Here’s the 
number...” The girl’s shoulders shake, but nothing is heard, only the wind whistles out- 
side the window. Jesper squats down in front of his model, his winter coat hem touching 
the parquet floor. He puts his hand on the girl’s shoulder. 


“Hey, I’m going to make some tea now, okay?” 


The clock ticks: “02:30”. The cups steam on the floor, brown sugar cubes in a square 
sugar bowl, and a special spoon for lifting sugar cubes. It’s hard to pour, but there’s no 


63 


fire to light either. 
“02:45” 


“T don’t understand. What does this mean now?” The girl swallows at the end of a long 
silence. 


“Well, what do you think it means?” 


“And all this time, you had that suitcase,” the girl points her index finger to the centre 
of the room, “like I didn’t even exist.” 


“It was there long before you.” 
“What, I had to convince you then?” 
“Well, come on, try to understand.” 


“Try to understand? You know what I think?” The model angrily puts her teacup on the 
floor. “I think this whole thing with the Lund girls is complete nonsense. You’re just a 
paedophile.” 


Jesper’s betrayed expression is unforgettable. The girl is even surprised by the power 
of her words. For that, and only for that moment, she regrets them. 


“Okay then.” The man stands up in the middle of a sentence. He picks up his suitcase 
and calmly steps out through the curtains. Then, Anita’s frustration takes over again 
and the naked and angry model rushes into the large room after Jesper. 


“You can shove your cube up your ass! I’m not staying in this godforsaken Katla hole!” 
Pieces of white paper fly out of her hand and scatter into the dark room, one by one 
the pages fall onto the exceptionally beautiful herringbone-patterned wooden table and 
onto the parquet floor. Jesper doesn’t turn around yet, he stops and tilts his head. “And 
where do you think you’re going if you’re not staying here? Are you going to work at the 
Graad ammunition factory?” 


“You're pathetic! You and your girls, it’s just pathetic. Everyone warned me! And I 
already knew before the cottage too! Everyone knows! I was just fifteen then, I was so 
stupid...” 


Anita pants, leaning against the kitchen counter with one hand. “Anni this and Anni that. 
My name is not Anni!” Jesper feels his hands growing cold. The word “morbid” comes 
back in a whirl. He remembers himself, an underage lingerie model cuddled up to him, 
saying “Good night, Anni. Good night, Anni. Good night.” I’m so happy. She falls asleep, 
the branches of the trees rustling outside the window like a second chance. What’s sad 
about that? It’s so beautiful! 


The model returns to the bedroom and shouts in an inexplicable fit of malice, “Good 
night, Anni!” 


The human mind is naturally trusting. At first, he does not consider such a nightmare 
of coincidences possible. But the more the difference between Jesper’s own thoughts 
and the mocking voice in the room becomes apparent, the slower the man’s breathing 
becomes. As if the body were preparing to shut down from shame. He picks up the 
paper from the floor, one page at a time, and pats the pile on his lap evenly. He chooses 
his words and doesn’t really know exactly who he wants to attack. The world, mostly. 
He walks back into the bedroom, places the papers on the bedside table and lays out his 
terrible trump card. 


64 


“What do you think, that you are going back to Revachol? Things are not good there 
anymore. Come, look at it.” 


The girl sits on the bed and angrily tries to put on her evening dress, not yet fully under- 
standing what the fuss is about. 


“That city doesn’t exist anymore,” Jesper repeats, and now the girl stands up in alarm. 
“What do you mean?” 

“You know, they haven’t been able to make contact for five days now.” 

“T don’t know! Contact with what?” 

“Revachol. Explosion. Gone. You really should read more newspapers!” 

“Are youjo king?” 


Jesper, blinded by revenge, is not yet sure exactly where his lie will take him. He has an 
idea, but now it’s too late. The girl gasps for air, her hands trembling in panic. Her nails 
clatter on the buttons and the radio’s yellow display lights up in the dark. The dial spins 
under her fingers, the hiss and squeals filling the speakers as the needle slips over the 
shortwave frequencies. The foreign news reports speak with nervous professionalism, 
everything mixed up. Her cosmopolitan mind only grasps horrible fragments: “Mesque 
aggressor,” “Saint-Miro,” “Revachol,” “atomic weapon,” and “half the population.” The 
girl shakes so intensely that Jesper begins to fear for her health. At any moment, the 
fragile machine will just fall apart. Finally, a voiceover announces the death toll. The 
girl collapses wounded when the domestic passenger list from the Ministry of Foreign Af- 
fairs scrolls through with a peculiarly detached announcer’s voice: “...the famous singer 
Pernilla Lundqvist recording her third studio album...” Anita’s big eyes are dark in the 
darkness, wide with terror. She screams, “God! My sister! My sister is there!” 


“I’m so sorry,” Jesper says. 
“Are you sure? How can they be sure? Why aren’t they d oin g anything?” 
“T don’t know.” Jesper grabs his suitcase. 


The girl gasps like a horse, her mouth contorts into a huge, dark scream. That mouth 
threatens to swallow the world. And so it does because Jesper doesn’t remember any- 
thing further. In the vacuum of the scream, white, white snow swirls, and the room 
echoes from the concrete walls: “Don’t go!” Jesper has bruises on his wrist from her 
nails, he closes the door behind him and stands in front of the house. It’s snowing in 
the courtyard. It’s cold and the wind is whistling, his skin is hot with steam. He grabs a 
handful of snow and rubs it on his face. On the edge of the courtyard, at the mouth of 
the tunnel of fir trees, there is a black motor carriage. Tereesz Machejek steps out of the 
car in the glow of the salon and waves at him. Jesper, with his coat flapping in the wind 
and a white suitcase in hand, crosses the courtyard. The fir trees scatter snowdrifts in 
the distance, zig zag drom. And then suddenly the world is so light, as if all meanings 
have been taken away from him. He is no longer worth anything. Jesper smiles. 


It’s warm in the taxi. The machine sways as he sits across from Khan. Tereesz closes 
the door and slides inside. 


“How did it go?” 


“Well, let’s just say it didn’t go very well,” answers Jesper and collects himself for a 
moment. “Drive.” 


65 


The night before Monday, seven days earlier. 


The city explodes in the taxi window like a disco, and Tereesz trembles, and loses his 
mind. Jesper holds him tightly: “Listen, he’s having seizures or something. It’s bad. We 
have to take him to the hospital.” 


“Tereesz, listen,” Khan leans over his friend. “We’ll take you to the hospital, okay?” 
“No!” Tereesz grabs Khan’s jacket. “Please!” 


The boys look at each other quizzically and then shrug. Tereesz’s face is dripping with 
sweat: “You have to promise me! Promise me you won’t turn me in!” His chin trembles 
for a moment and then a vacant look comes into his eyes, his body stiffens like a log. 
“What the hell?” Jesper shakes Tereesz and puts his hand over his mouth. 


“He’s breathing, you know, I don’t know, let’s not take him, okay?” 
“Yeah, let’s not take him. To your place?” 


Jesper sighs heavily. “Ohhh... okay, to my place then. There’s just one problem. A girl 
from Revachol is coming here the day after tomorrow, what do you think, will he be okay 
by then?” 


Khan shakes his head grumpily. “How would I know, do you know any private doctors?” 
“Private doctor, Khan! You can’t get a license if you don’t work in a hospital!” 


“Well, yeah, but I thought maybe you know someone.” 
“T know one regular doctor, Khan. Will a regular do?” 
“Regular will do, don’t be angry.” 


The taxi rushes past Vaasa at night. Sometimes Tereesz is Linoleum Salesman, then 
Vidkun Hird, then Deerek Trentmoller, then Tereesz Machejek again. And sometimes he 
feels like he’s not really there anymore. The explosion of Vaasa colours fills with black 
ink like a jellyfish, the aquarium goes dark. Tereesz’s suit is the blackest of the black. It’s 
made of leaves, slush on bike tires, and the sky above the city. He straightens his cuffs 
and adjusts his tie knot. He’s formal, he’s polite. The suit smells of dry cleaning, and 
then, like umbrellas under cemetery birches, a funeral party opens before him. Longed 
for, feared, all are there! At the funeral, there is the mother of the girls, with a black 
lace mourning veil and elegant wrinkles of concern beneath it. Paper manufacturer 
Karl Lund holds an umbrella over the woman’s head. The birch leaves tremble, it’s the 
end-of-summer rains. 


Khan and Jesper are also at a funeral. Even Khan’s mother has come, and the whole 
class too. They are all much older now. Tereesz doesn’t recognise most of them, but 
that must be Sixten over there, and that’s little Olle. Von Fersen is chatting with his 
lackey. And Zigi! The naughtiest boy in school is also there, still wearing his black 
leather jacket. And Jesper is the only one with a white umbrella. Tereesz walks through 
the funeral, everyone talking quietly, patting each other on the back. As he passes by, 
they nod respectfully to him. And the girls are there too, under piles of flowers, soft 
fluffy soil. They are rows of toe bones, rib knobs, and clavicles like relics. Nothing is 
lost, everything is preserved. The records are clear as a school paper, this is the magnum 
opus of identification, and they will teach it at the academy. And a handful of teeth too - 
Maj’s baby teeth, pearls from Anni’s jawbone, Malin’s mean, mean canines - everything 
is there, everything fits: every little filling, the missing piece from Anni’s molar, the bike 
accident. And Charlotte’s movie star smile. Some would have liked to take some of 


66 


them from there! Just as a memory. How they would clink in their hands, those precious 
stones! But you mustn’t do that. It would be unprofessional. 


A doctor comes and injects saline, Monday night to Tuesday. Tereesz gradually regains 
consciousness, it’s chilly and everything at the funeral is grey and silver-green. A grey 
tent over the black chokeberry bushes, an old-fashioned crystal on the table with fruit 
motifs. It’s quiet. Something rustles in the bushes like a radio signal. When Tereesz 
wakes up, he realises what it was. News of the collapse of the Northern Highway has 
made the public space anxious, and he has no desire to play along. Tereesz asks Jesper 
to turn on the classical radio. Classical radio, they say, plays music by dead and white- 
skinned men in wigs, even when the world has long ended. Perouse-Mittrecie surges, 
it’s beautiful to listen to, like the ocean, mm... grave. Everyone is dancing slowly, and 
the more Tereesz thinks about it, the clearer it becomes to him that the funeral party 
will never come. The investigation is exhausted. By Tuesday morning, he is ready to 
admit to himself that they will never know what happened to the Lund children. 


The high heels leave imprints on the floor of the taxi. The girl crosses her legs, coral- 
painted toenails in a row, nude-coloured straps running over her Serj van Dijks. A cluster 
of gemstones sparkles at the convergence point of the straps. Elegant, you’d say? If 
there were some vulgar crystals on department store shoes, it would be a complete 
faux pas! But this Serj van Dijk here - what we’re looking at now - costs 10,000 real. 
The other one costs 500 real more - maintenance. A single diamond jumped from the 
Revachol delta to a dump, what a dizzying night! Besides, Serj van Dijk himself said 
that there’s a difference between elegance and snobbery. And since Serj designed these 
shoes... draw your own conclusions. 


“I’m going to Korsfall, 130. It’s a bit outside the city, isn’t it?” 


The shoe size is 37, and what an arch! Like the arches of the West... The Foot Doctor at 
Kexholm’s circle would give them a nine and a half on the scale of locking them up in 
the cellar. Out of ten. 


The suitcase phone rings, click, and the lid opens. But we’re still looking at those ten 
thousand Serj van Dijks, how the gemstones sparkle as the foot sways to the rhythm 
of the taxi radio. Fakkengaff. We can’t get enough of it. “Hello! Berenike, darling! 
Ozonne! So nice! I’ve always wanted to do something with them! No, I won’t stay long. 
A couple of weeks.” 


The taxi door closes. The thirteen-centimetre heels tip on the sidewalk, it’s getting 
darker; here it always gets darker or it’s dark, where did the day go? White shins flash, 
and a view of a concrete cube opens up in the background under the fir trees. The 
lights are on inside. The moss sparkles, and there’s a frost on the puddles before the 
October storms. The suitcase sinks to the ground next to the shoes in front of the door. 
The doorbell rings. Jesper’s model girlfriend’s legs seem to last forever. We crawl past 
them and it seems that the edge of the bell-jingling cloak will never reach us. Before the 
butt-curve, Mesque’s fleet of world-enders, black like a pot, appears on the horizon of 
Revachol. In the fashion capital, they’re actually already putting their hands over their 
eyes at Anita’s knee-bends and asking, what’s that ominous chimney smoke over the 
ocean, like storm clouds? 


“It’s open!” Jesper exclaims. The girl enters and a large room opens up before her, 
smelling strongly of tobacco and sweat. Jesper crosses the room from the window. There 
is a guy on the mattress, his greasy potato-brown head visible from under the covers. The 
interior designer takes the girl’s suitcase and introduces her to the sweaty, overweight 


67 


guy next to him. The immigrant smiles awkwardly, and when she shakes his hand, it too 
is warm and sweaty. 


“My name is Anita,” the girl introduces herself. 


“Tam Inayat, but everyone calls me Khan. You can call me Khan too. And this here,” he 
points to the pile of blankets, “is my partner Tereesz Machejek. He’s feeling unwell, as 
we can see.” Khan thinks he did pretty well. It could have gone worse: “What the hell?! 
Jesper, why didn’t you tell me you’re dating a real model! Cool! If I had Anita Lundqvist, 
I’d be telling everyone. Hey, give me an autograph, hey, your sister is Pernilla Lundqvist, 
right, give me Pernilla’s phone number, and show me your boobs! Jesper, tell her to 
show her boobs!” 


Khan ruins his jovial introduction with his laughter over the “boobs”. Now he’s also 
looking at them, hidden under the girl’s baggy fashion outfit. “Boobs, boobs, model 
boobs, famous model’s boobs,” he thinks and laughs more and more. Of course, he 
doesn’t notice when the girl asks about Tereesz for the second time. 


“Poor thing, what’s wrong with him?” 


“Food poisoning.” Jesper takes the girl’s arm and leads her to the bedroom to change. 
Khan uses tact and calls out from the doorway, “Hey, okay then, see you tomorrow, right!” 


“Are you leaving already? Wait, I’ll call you a taxi!” 
“You and your taxi, I’ll walk instead.” 


“Goodbye!” the girl calls out in a friendly voice. As Khan limps along the forest road 
to the bus stop, his feet crunching on the cold moss, the girl puts on her pants on the 
bed. On her loose, bohemian fashion top is the face of Serj van Dijk, in a revolutionary 
two-colour scheme, grey and turquoise, as if stencilled. What? It’s not pretentious! Van 
Dijk is a kind of revolutionary, too. A fashion revolutionary. The Mazov of the fashion 
world. Only, he doesn’t send the bourgeoisie to exile in the taiga of Northeast Graad, he 
sells them, you know, clothes. 


“Jesper, who are they?” 
“What do you mean?” 
“You never told me about this Khan guy. And the other one?” 


“Tereesz. They’re just old classmates from high school. We just had a reunion. I didn’t 
tell you about it?” 


“No.” 


“We were just reminiscing about old times. Hey, Tereesz lives in Graad. He’s staying 
here for a few more nights, I think. You don’t mind, do you?” 


“Of course not,” says the girl, but she senses trouble. She stares suspiciously at Jesper’s 
back as he goes to make tea. The reception left something to be desired. A measly kiss. 
The girl paces angrily around the bedroom but then notices a ring box on the bedside 
table among the books. Oh, a surprise? Is it for tonight? The box is just far enough away 
that Jesper could reach it from the bed. Could it be? Don’t think so, but it’s still better 
to know what’s coming. And besides - curiosity! The mood immediately improved. A 
black velvet box, a tiny box. The girl opens the box, click! 


68 


Night falls over Vaasa. In the city centre at Konigsmalm, a fox cub runs across the 
intersection. Its breath colours the air blue, and it tucks its ears. The street is quiet 
and empty, the downtown buildings with balconies standing in a row, and yellow traffic 
lights flashing in window mirrors. The northern metropolis at night is a light installation 
- a beautiful modern thing, but visitors are scarce. The royal architectural museum in 
the Dideridaada style looms over the river, and the facade lighting makes the building 
glow golden. And below, in the dark, the river water drifts along, glossy like vodka 
taken out of a refrigerator. Bridges curve over it, with rows of lantern pearls on their 
backs. A lone cyclist rides home, with the sound of the bike rattling, and the scent of 
farewell lingers in the air. The advertising signs in the corners of the department store 
go into power-saving mode with a hum. A giant lingerie model above the payphone line 
smiles and disappears. Anita Lundqvist. “Child, cover yourself,” says the chairman of 
the presidium, Sapurmat Knezinski. “Aren’t you cold?” And two Collaboration agents 
run up the stairs of the police station. “Tereesz Machejek! Where is Tereesz Machejek? 
You arrested him four days ago!” This man is a Man from Internal Affairs. He is the 
angel of death. “Tereesz who? Machejek?” The security officer waits for an answer 
from the machine. “We haven’t had anyone by that name here.” 


The asphalt glistens. There’s a night frost and frozen puddles on the ground in Saalem. 
Wooden houses squat on the sidewalks, and the sound of footsteps echoes from the street. 
And somewhere inside, in the basement, Inayat Khan toggles the lights of “Harnankur.” 
The only source of light is the airship model, which goes out every time it lights up, 
revealing Khan’s face. The rows of lights on the ship’s floors are reflected in his glasses. 
He has an idea, a flash of inspiration - one that can only be seen when all other lights go 
out. Khan has been waiting for this moment for two years. He cuts the threads, takes the 
airship like a baby from a cradle, and dances with it in his arms. An empty display case 
stands in the middle of the room. The incandescent filaments of the spotlight cool on 
the other side of the street, in the courtyard of the manége; the horse trams disappear 
into the darkness. Horses sleep in rows in the stables. 


Passing through the streets of the suburb, there are white picket fences with gate latches. 
In the distance, the barking of dogs can be heard, window frames gleam in the dark, and 
wooden garden furniture stands empty on the veranda. Who rustled in the buckthorn 
bushes? The night smells of frost, and the fear of the future haunts the nuclear family’s 
dreams. And where Lovisa ends, the coniferous forest begins, and Jesper de la Guardie 
rolls out of bed. Anita went to sleep angrily, and Jesper is worried. But not because of 
that. Jesper can’t find his beloved scrunchie. He sneaks around in his underwear, looks 
on the bedside table and the bookshelf, then puts on his bathrobe and steps through the 
curtains into the living room. The end wall shimmers in the dark from the windows, and 
the floor is a minefield - milk cartons, socks, cup ashtrays - a hermit crab named Tereesz 
Machejek is settling into his new box. 


The agent, with his nose against the glass, wakes up. Jesper puts a cup of tea in front of 
him. It smells like peppermint. 


“Hey! Wake up! Let’s talk a little, I don’t know, chit-chat or something.” 
“Okay, but I want to smoke inside.” 


Mouths move, bursts of laughter are heard, and slowly but surely, the dawn starts to 
appear outside the window. The stockpile of cup-ashtrays and cups slowly peels out of 
the darkness. 


Behind the glasses of the café “Cinema,” the morning light is seeping through. It’s 


69 


Wednesday. Early risers are bustling about on Ostermalm, the street-cleaning machine is 
humming, and morning newspapers are falling into rows of mailboxes. Traffic is stirring, 
the machine operator is scraping frost from the windshield. 


The copywriter in his late twenties with a moustache is drinking coffee and eating scram- 
bled eggs. Suddenly, he chokes on the coffee and runs coughing to the toilet. The morn- 
ing paper is left open on the table. In the announcement section, there is a copy in Malin 
Lund’s handwriting that reads, “Everything is fine. We are with the Man, and we like 
it here. We love you.” Below the copy is Inayat Khan’s contact phone number, and the 
text says, “Good person, it’s not too late yet. If you have information about this letter, 
if you sent this letter or if you know anything new about the disappearance of the Lund 
children - whatever it is - please contact us.” 


“T would like a box of ‘Astra’ with menthol, no, wait, has ‘Radar’ arrived yet?” 


“No, sorry, Mr. Ulv, this evacuation stuff! No new goods are coming in at all anymore, I 
don’t know how long I can keep this store open.” 


“Well, in that case, give me three boxes of ‘Astra’,” says a curly-headed, chestnut-haired 
young man. “That blackcurrant wine from there, how strong is it?” 


“Let’s see, let’s see.” The seller takes a dusty bottle from the alcohol shelf. “Huh. Twenty- 
three per cent. Pure spirit I think.” 


“Excellent. Do you have more of it?” 

“There’s two here.” 

“These and the vodka, ‘Final Station’. It’s been aged in the Pale, right?” 

“Where else. If it wasn’t, I’d take it to the Pale myself, it’s right behind the meadow!” 


“So, a pack of matches, a pack, not a box. And those candles, no more? Oh yes! I would 
also like to take this wild strawberry liqueur, I forgot to take it last time. Give the two 
you have there.” 


“This second one is raspberry, the wild strawberry one is gone.” 


“Well, I'll take it then. You know what? Better hand me all the alcohol if you’re going to 
close the shop anyway. And some smoked sausage too.” 


“A 11 the alcohol?” 
“Yes, and half a bar of smoked sausage.” 


A curly-headed young man rides a bicycle through the town of Lohdu, in Lemminkainen, 
in the immediate entroponetic disaster zone. Dusty bottles jingle in the trailer, mixed 
with boxes of cigarettes. And half a bar of “Doctor’s” smoked sausage, wrapped in paper. 
On the village road, the street lamps shine like diamonds in the morning darkness. 


70 


11. SELF-CHILLER 


In the early 50s, a young mother watches her four-year-old son Ulv on the Lovisa play- 
ground. It’s mid-summer, the poplars drop grey flakes, and the sun sparkles in the sky, 
but the mother is worried. Other children run around the playhouse, and boys scream 
and pull girls’ hair. The suspension bridge of the playhouse vibrates as toddlers run 
on its tables. Down below, girls and boys build a town on the wooden edge of a large 
sandbox. A girl spins a tiny airship model around a tower and two boys dig a tunnel, one 
on one side and the other on the other side of the hill. The tunnel meets in the middle 
and the boys laugh triumphantly. The girl is bored, she starts crying, and the other girls 
come to ask what’s wrong. 


Only little Ulv sits alone, far away, on the other side of the sandbox. And when someone 
asks him what the solitary house is that Ulv has built on his huge piece of cloth, Ulv 
doesn’t say anything. The boy just looks vaguely into the distance and smiles his mys- 
terious childlike smile. As if he’s somehow... too cool for that. Too cool of a guy to talk 
about his house to the rest of the rascals. The others soon tire of Ulv’s arrogant manner 
and leave him alone. The young mother doesn’t understand why her child doesn’t care 
about being in the company of others. Even with his own parents, Ulv has not exchanged 
more than ten words. He does speak, but only when he’s alone with himself. Sometimes 
the mother listens to him from another room and doesn’t understand what’s wrong with 
her little boy. 


A distant street parade is heard, and the bass drum thumps: nts-nts... Ulv sits in proud 
solitude in the corner of the sandbox, moving his curly head back and forth to the rhythm 
of the music. It almost seems as if he’s... self-chilling. 


It’s Wednesday afternoon in the forest near Jesper’s house. This time Khan is leading 
the way and the others try to keep up with him. He is heavily caffeinated and hasn’t 
slept all night. Until the morning, he tapped on “Harnankur”’s buttons, made coffee 
and long-distance calls, and listened to sad songs until his mother asked him to turn 
the volume down. Khan waves his hands while speaking, his orange coat open and a 
turquoise-orange-violet striped scarf in Iilmaraa colours fluttering. His mother knitted 
it for him for the winter solstice and the tutu pom-pom hat for his previous birthday. It 
is also in Iilmaraa colours. They come as a set. 


The forest path winds between hills, and tall pines on either side of the road. Three 
abreast - Jesper in the right tire track, Tereesz in the left and Khan straight in the middle 
of the grassy tuft - they come down the hill on the snowy sand of the road. The hay is 
patterned with grey, rustling underfoot. Single snowflakes are flying in the air, and the 
dried late autumn nature sparkles. 


Khan takes a deep breath of fresh air. The moss decays. He claps his mittens together, 
which go over his back with a string. “I’ve never believed in a criminal solution, you 
know that. Every step forward is a step forward, and in that sense, it’s of course great 
to chase linoleum salesmen, but Tereesz, sometimes I feel like you’re collecting those 
guys like I collect memorabilia, you know what I mean? I don’t mean it in a bad way, of 
course.” 


Tereesz blows big silver-grey smoke rings and makes “Astra” rings in the middle that the 
quiet wind carries away. “I don’t mind, you’re right too. You collect that stuff because 


71 


you think you’ll find something about the girls there. I collect my monsters for the same 
reason.” 


“And what do you collect, Jesper?” Khan asks. 


“T don’t collect anything, you freaks. But it’s still nice for a man to have a hobby. Hey, 
what’s next?” 


“Well, we have to search Trentmoller’s property and interview relatives,” Tereesz lists 
on his leather-gloved fingers. 


“But you saw that he didn’t do it, right?” The forest path turns, and light brown hay 
brushes over the rails like someone’s hair and rustles under Jesper’s feet. “Or are you 
not sure?” 


“You can never be sure in Captain Pepi Popikarnassos’s Psychedelic Cabinet,” the hyper- 
active Khan cuts in and turns around. Walking backwards a few steps, he explains to 
Tereesz, “That’s why the court doesn’t count ZA/UM as evidence. It’s psychedelia, you 
see, it’s not enough on its own. Reality has to correspond. There have to be witnesses 
and things. It’s all pointless anyway!” 


“Well, I wouldn’t say it’s completely pointless,” Tereesz throws his cigarette butt under 
the trees, and the orange spark bounces off. “But you were right about Pepi Popikar- 
nassos, his test subject’s fantasies and reality get mixed up. It seemed to me like it was 
more of an... aspect of him. One that ceased to exist or... if I have the time, I should let 
the local authorities investigate these things.” 


“But right now, as you Say, it’s bastaa?” Khan asks. 
“Right now, it’s bastaa, yes.” 


“Very good, because let’s be honest! Which one of you wants to find them in some ditch? 
Seriously. It’s not a goal in itself, it won’t accomplish anything!” Khan smirks and waits 
for answers, seeing Tereesz raise his hand. 


“T do. And it is a goal in itself. Have you heard of closure? That concept.” 


Jesper still thinks of Pepi Popikarnassos’s synthesizer as overrated futurist self- 
gratification. “Do you have anything better to offer? Tempus rev? We do it right this 
time?” 


“Not a bad idea. Honestly, I wouldn’t say no.” 


” 


“Now come on, Khan, be reasonable.” Tereesz lights another cigarette, and there’s a 
smell of sulfur in the cold air. “Time is running out, we’ve lost contact with Revachol and 
Occident as well. Half the world is on the back foot, if war breaks out, all investigations 
will be halted, and documents, papers, and people may disappear. We have to work 
quickly, tie up all loose ends before it’s too late.” 


Three small silhouettes move through overgrown fields, balancing and shifting as they 
argue over a log fence. Ice drifts along with the stream underfoot; they jump over fallen 
trees in the dim forest tunnel and move in a line on the white meadows. Khan goes 
through the barbed wire, and Jesper jumps over like Tereeszki. Clearings fall behind, 
the forest thins and the sandy road lies below the tree roots like a tiny canal. Already 
the sea wind rustles above the treetops and the expanse of the water can be felt in the 
air. 


“We've been doing your thing for so long, and nothing has come out of it. Give me a 
chance now,” Khan explains with more gestures than words. 


72 


“Okay, you’re right that it’s a dead end,” Tereesz admits. “But just tell us the plan and 
let us think about it. If I think something might come out of it, then okay, we’ll do it, if 
not, then we have to take a break.” 


“You don’t understand,” shrugs Khan. “If you say no, we’ll never know. There are no 
other options anymore. I can’t take the chance that you’ll say no. Let’s take a little trip 
before, huh? Let’s go talk to a professional. We should have contacted them long ago; 
it’s urgent now.” 


“What do you mean there are no other options anymore?” Jesper doesn’t understand. 
“But what about Malin’s letters? Someone had to send them, the handwriting matched, 
at that age, there should be some development. If a thirteen-year-old writes, then their 
handwriting may not be 100% the same at fifteen, 95% is very promising; I’ve read about 
it. Right, Tereesz?” 


“Yeah-yeah, that’s right,” Khan jumps in. “But you know what? I have an idea of how we 
can straighten this out. We just shouldn’t wait for it now. We have to act, right away!” 


“What idea?” 
“Well, I put an ad in the newspaper.” 


Tereesz walks in his ’50s-style fish-tailed coat, he looks like a true kojko, and his mouth 
is slightly open in thought. “This may not be such a bad idea, when did you put the ad 
in?” 


“T submitted it the day before yesterday; it should be out today. I put your number there 
too, Jesper, in case I’m not at home.” 


“And what did you write there?” 


“That if anyone has any information, come forward, nothing bad will happen, help us out, 
you know!” 


“Such a thing can be more effective than you think,” Tereesz explains to Jesper. “Espe- 
cially with old things like this. But you still have to fish in different columns for months 
and months. Where did you put it?” 


“In Dagens and Kapitalist. I didn’t have more money. By the way, you both owe me 
fifty each. And for the advisor I’m recommending, he needs it too. And for the trip. You 
should take at least a thousand, he’s very expensive, very highly rated. I’ve been waiting 
so long for this, reading about him...” 


Jesper becomes impatient. First, he definitely doesn’t want to go anywhere now, and 
second, he already senses whose money is at stake here. Khan lives off the solatium 
money from his father, who died on a fuel oil rig, and if Tereesz doesn’t start an investi- 
gation, he won’t be paid anything. “Listen, lay it out, which advisor are we talking about 
here?” 


Three silhouettes reach the cliff edge. The expanse of the sea meets them, beyond the 
dried-out meadow. The hay is dotted with white snow, and a single group of pine trees 
quivers in the wind. The sky darkens as the men approach the cliff edge. Jesper pulls up 
his coat collar, the sound of the water growing louder in his ears. He often walks the six 
kilometres here alone. From this spot, they can see what they all long to see - the strip 
of Charlottesjal beach shining blue on the other side of the bay, in the snowy distance. 


Khan leans on the wooden fence and looks down. The crashing waves hit the rocky wall, 
the water curves and the white wave crest breaks into a million foam clusters. Drops on 
the man’s glasses blur his vision. Jesper appreciates the autumn waves, they come once 


73 


a year and now he has a clear plan. Let’s go. He’ll tell the girl he’s going too, and he’ll 
think of something else for the boys. He measures the wind. 


“Selfchiller” Khan says, “it’s the last chance to talk to him about girls.” 
Jesper starts laughing, but Tereesz is serious. 


“Wait-wait! He confirmed Abadanaizi and Dobreva’s skeletons within a kilometre ac- 
curacy,” Khan explains. “What’s more? Two years ago, they followed his hint to find 
Cornelius Gurdi in Corpus Mundi. The chain he brought out has now sunk into the Pale, 
but they found Gurdi’s dishes and campsite nearby. After a hundred years of references! 
The Self-chiller, Jesper, lives in Lemminkainen, a country house in the woods, and we’re 
going there.” 


On the lead-grey sea it’s snowing, and the temperature is at zero; the wind in the bay 
is less than ten meters per second, and the next two weeks will see storms in Western 
Cato, right on the edge of the Pale, causing the ocean to surge. A two-week window, 
perfect conditions. Jesper already feels how the water mass on Charlottesjal beach, ten 
kilometres away from here, breaks into waves. Waves move before his eyes, long and 
stable like beautiful thoughts. 


“Okay,” Jesper says, “but I have a conference. Design stuff. From Thursday to Saturday. 
And by the way: going to Lemminkainen is not a very good idea right now. Or maybe 
you don’t know?” 


Little Ulv is nine years old when modern dance music is born in Oranje. Johan Hauer, 
Rietveld, and Arno van Eyck spin records in university halls; at Vesper in Viderund, the 
world’s first discotheque, “Das Baum,” opens; on a summer evening in Messina’s arcade 
square, after the most epic set in human history, the ecstatic crowd crowns Theo van 
Kok the innocence. Ulv comes home from school with a backpack on his back. He is in 
the fourth grade, sitting alone in the back of the class because Ulv doesn’t care about 
what the teacher is saying. Mathematics and science do not interest Ulv. Stupid girls 
do not interest Ulv; only one thing in this world interests him. With his mouth open, he 
stands in front of Fonopoe’s door on his way home in Vastermalm, where music lovers 
come and go. Theo van Kok’s coma remix plays from an old machine, and music lovers 
watch as little Ulv rocks and dances like he’s possessed. Tears flow down Ulv’s cheeks, 
and the whole world disappears. Everyone laughs and looks on in awe as the little boy 
bounces and flails, sways, puffs, waves, and roars, “Wow, isn’t this something?!” He 
slams his hands and feet in the air, smacks the car hood with his palms, and just can’t 
understand: “How can it be s 0 good?! It can’t be th at good!!!” A salesman with 
a trendy sweatshirt comes out of the store; from the Pale of lost things, from the coma 
echoing across human history, Ulv steps up to the young man, and he hands Ulv a Stereo 
8 tape. “Theo van Kok/” reads the cover, “Comte de Perouse-Mittrecie.” This is the first 
and only time in Ulv’s life that a living person has been valuable to him. 


The grooved tire of the motor carriage is spinning and the snow is rustling under the 
wheels, but Inayat Khan is not there. He is thirteen years old and stepping out onto the 
veranda of Tereesz’s father’s villa into the apple orchard. It is dark, and crickets are 
chirping. The self-chiller puts a Stereo 8 tape into the player, and two plastic discs are 
spinning. The sound check is underway, but the June night is quiet, and the music does 
not carry far. This is twenty years later and far away from Inayat Khan. The air is filled 
with scents, and he approaches the boy like a spirit from under the trees, circles around 


74 


his knees, and smells of early-ripening apples. Khan steps barefoot on the dewy grass. 
The boys are sleeping inside on the second floor, but he can’t sleep. They went to work 
together at half past seven in the morning. Khan’s body is tired from construction, but 
his heart is restless. The money is not enough. Dealer Zigi was throwing astronomical 
amounts on the phone. 300 real. Jesper took his collection of “Man from Hjelmdall” 
adventure novels to the antiquarian bookstore, after much persuasion. Khan sold his 
binoculars. 


Sixteen-stroke combustion chambers are kicking in the heart of the machine; in far-off 
Lemminkainen, the window panes of the farmhouse tremble in bass rhythm. Check, 
check... But Inayat Khan is not there. An apple falls to the ground in front of him. Little 
Inayat wipes the apple clean with his sleeve and sits down on the garden bench. He bites 
into the fruit and feels the sweet pain kicking in his heart, making it hard to breathe. 
It’s the feeling of slipping possibility that grows all day and then makes itself felt in 
the evening. “Speak... you always have such cool presentations. In history and natural 
science...” Dark green eyes, incredibly kind and so very interested. Are you sure, Khan? 
Try to be reasonable now; there’s no point in lowering yourself for nothing. 


The hood is steaming, the engine belt is running, and the tape is sliding against the 
magnetic reader. But it’s still quiet in the apple orchard. Inayat Khan doesn’t believe in 
God, especially. God was supposedly invented by someone named Pius more than three 
thousand years ago in lilmaraa. Maybe. But now Khan throws the apple core into the 
bushes, puts his hands together, and prays. 


“Please make me likeable to Malin. God, please make me really likeable to her, not just... 
you know, you’re God after all. I promise that then I won’t think that some man - Pius, 
from Perikarnassus - invented you. I promise that I’ll believe that you’ve existed since 
the beginning of time and drawn the sky and the earth with your... uh... golden compass 
or something. Sorry, God, for joking like this about you, but you see, it’s really hard for 
me to believe that you exist if I’m not likeable to Malin Lund.” 


Khan looks up at the sky. In the darkness of his heart, love spins and spreads like stars. 
Love, like a smooth-haired cat, curls up inside his stomach. To him, love is also a fear of 
loss. 


The red glow of the taillights stains the snow with blood, the engine muffler crackles. 
The chained tyres whizz on the snow and the engine roars fora moment. Gear change. 
The tone rises. Acceleration presses the daredevil driver into the seat. The young man’s 
fingers are frozen to the levers and the racing goggles to his head, he’s in a driving 
helmet. The unlit mountain road is reflected off the hard surface of the glasses and 
disappears under the wheels. 


The atmosphere is swirling above the Lemminkainen entroponetic catastrophe zone. 
Dark mountain ranges with snow-dappled peaks cut the horizon, their teeth bared like 
those of a Linoleum Salesman. In the valley below, clearings and spruce forests stretch 
out, while a black motor carriage speeds along the winding road at one hundred and 
fifty kilometres per hour. 


“Damn, this is sick!” Khan exclaims. Tereesz nods, the fumes from the engine filling 
the cool air of the cabin, which is industrial and acidic. The agent looks out the window, 
watching the snow-covered roadside posts fly by in the blizzard. In the valley below, a 
white mass looms, dotted with clearings. Khan hops over to the opposite seat next to 
Tereesz and takes the last sip from the wine bottle. The strong drink jostles his senses, 
and he thuds against the cabin wall. 


75 


“Gone,” he shows Tereesz the empty bottle. Another bottle of flavoured berry wine ap- 
pears in Khan’s hand. The twist-off cap pops off with a snap. “Sugar: 25%,” he grinds the 
sugar between his teeth. In the distance, on the opposite slope, flickering lights shine 
in the dark. All the other vehicles are still moving in the opposite direction, away from 
the entroponetic catastrophe, since Wednesday evening. That was when Khan, Agent 
Machejek, and the crazy rally driver Kenni - just Kenni - set off from Vaasa: 


“What’s your name?” 
“Kenni.” 

“Kenni kuka?” 

“Vain Kenni.” 


“Kattoo, entroponeetisen romahduksen vyohyke! Ei voi olla, kuusetkin rupee taivaasen 
ajautumaan, saa-ta-na, ihan kuin ne sanoi, sen kylld tdytyy ndhddd! Ja talot myés!”* 
shouts Kenni from the driver’s seat. 


“How are you?” Khan shouts back. He, unlike Tereesz, is still a little worried when the 
machine shakes and in the darkness, in the yellowish glow of the speedometer, he sees 
the pointer shift to one hundred and seventy. 


“Hienosti menee, ihan hienosti, en huolehdi ollenkaan!”° 
“And the road, how is the road?” 
“Etta mikd, tiek6? Ei, hyvin on, en huolehdi ollenkaan.”® 


Kenni doesn’t huolehdi ollenkaan’. Kenni wants flavoured berry wine instead, and when 
Khan thinks Kenni shouldn’t drive drunk, Kenni says: “Ala huolehdi, alright? Md oon 
puolet tiet juonu jo, muuten md nukahtaisin. Se autta mua keskitymddn, kato!”® 


The road continues winding through the slopes of the mountains, between the spruce 
trees. Kenni leans forward to stay on track in the curves. Khan only feels safe when the 
motor carriage plunges deep into the forest along with the village road. The sound of 
snow crunching under the wheels and the engine struggling to keep up, the windows 
covered in circles of snowflakes. The dark forest walls flutter behind the illuminators. 
Suddenly, Kenni pulls over to the left side of the road, and Khan jumps back to his own 
side. The car rushes past a red Graad Telecom van. The news crew waves to Khan from 
their own snow-covered illuminator, and Khan waves back. 


For the past two days, Khan has been drinking with Tereesz in the cabin. The driver 
refuses to make stops. Kenni wants to break a record. He has a stopwatch in his hand. 
And all this time they see all the other traffic going in the opposite direction. Two hun- 
dred kilometres from Vaasa, and the traffic jam on the opposite side of the road still 
creeps along. People from the outskirts travel to cities and visit relatives. From the car 
radio, they learn that the same panic is happening all over Katla. Arda is the place that 
everyone goes to, with its magnet train station in Norrkoping. Even Jelinkas, near the 
collapsed Northern Highway, has sold out tickets for the next two months. There’s no 
way out, might as well just walk across the boreal plateau. 


“(Finnish orig.) “Kenni.” / “Kenni who?” / “Just Kenni.” / “Heavens, the entroponetic collapse zone! Can’t 
be, the fir trees are drifting skyward, saa-tan, just like they said, you’ll have to see! And the houses too!” 

5(Finnish orig.) “It’s going great, it’s going great, I’m not worried at all!” 

6(Finnish orig.) “What, the road? No, it’s fine, I’m not worried at all.” 

7(Finnish orig.) “worry at all” 

8(Finnish orig.) “Don’t worry, alright? I’m half way drunk already, otherwise I’d fall asleep. It helps me 
focus, man!” 


76 


Slowly, the side window turned into a domed landscape with hazy ridges slipping on 
the horizon, and spruce forests crouching. Late at night, the motor carriage took the 
highway, but the oncoming traffic didn’t thin out; only the road came down from the 
pillars, in the middle of the fields where the snow thickened, and the fields shone with 
it. Khan fell into a deep sleep, his head resting against the side window, and in front 
of them, in the dark, a diamond sea of headlights shone on one side of the road, and 
on the other side, a cold, empty highway. Only one pair of red taillights sped towards 
Lemminkainen. And they were accompanied only by military convoys and foreign news 
agency vehicles, with radio antenna units on the roofs. 


In the morning, he opened his eyes and saw an abandoned village passing by outside 
the window. Electric wires waved between the poles, and on the empty village street, a 
country girl rode her bike. She wore a long skirt and a jacket. The country girl looked 
Khan straight in the eye, with reflectors on the bike wheels shining. They were 1500 
kilometres from the Vaasa border, and another 1500 were ahead. Kenni drove slowly, 
and from the cabin, you could hear the ice breaking under the wheels in puddles. The 
girl waved and turned onto a side road on the outskirts of the settlement. The darkness 
of the forest swallowed her up, and the rear light of the bicycle flickered in rhythm with 
the dynamo. Snow was already falling heavily in the tunnel of trees ahead. So they 
went - Inayat Khan and Tereesz Machejek, with Kenni, simply Kenni, the toughest guy 
in the taxi park. For a few hours, the boys sat quietly and watched as Suru passed by 
in the dim light. The cold stars of streetlights lit up in the distance, and the corrugated 
iron on the roofs of houses crumbled into eternity. As the evening approached, the 
snow became thicker. The dark sawteeth of the mountains rose on the horizon, villages 
became increasingly rare, and Tereesz suggested opening a bottle of flavoured berry 
wine. 


“Otherwise it’ll get depressing.” 


In the darkening mountains ahead, they often saw military airships in the sky. Once, a 
metal bird whizzed right over the bridge, trying to catch them in its spotlight; the air 
cushion threatened to turn the car over. But then the bird was gone. Only its lights still 
glided over the darkness of the forest. This is called an evacuation. 


The checkpoint stood abandoned by the roadside, the letters shining “LEMMINKAINEN” 
above it. Across the road ran a military barrier made of concrete blocks. Kenni put snow 
chains on the wheels and drove around the barrier, uprooting half the field. Winter’s 
orbit, always snowy from there on, remained behind with the checkpoint. The asphalt 
disappeared gradually, and so the families on sledges came towards them, along snowy 
gravel roads. To see the Pale rising behind them with their own eyes, from childhood, 
is their great privilege. Horses pulled the sledges, and passing families, with all their 
possessions, waved to the funny little fat man with dark yellow skin and thick glasses. 


“So strange, they’re always waving,” Khan says, and the Graad Telecom van is far be- 
hind, under a snow cloud from Kenni’s machine’s wheels. No more headlights or sledge 
lanterns flicker in the dark forest. Only those who want to stay here are left in those 
farmyards, combine driveways, and closed village stores. In the dark, looms the Pale. 


“Kuuletko sen?” asks Kenni, “Harmaa... se on nyt varmasti harmaa! Mua vahdn 
huolestutta.”° 


Tereesz and Khan are listening. And, indeed, there is a new sound growing beneath the 
wind, a sickening rumbling, low crackling noise. Like a wave breaking, slowly, slowly... 
To Khan, it sounds like the beginning of a song. He heard it in a dream. 


°(Finnish orig.) “Can you hear it?” / “The Pale... it’s definitely the Pale now! I’m a bit worried.” 


77 


“I’m not in CoPo anymore, they let me go,” Tereesz exclaims, drunk, his hands in front 
of his mouth acting as a megaphone. 


“What?” Khan can’t hear at first, the noise mesmerising. He feels the hairs on his body 
stand up and chills run down his spine as if he’d just pulled off his sweater in a cold 
room. 


“They let me go from the Collaboration Police!” 


“T know!” Khan exclaims, handing Tereesz a flavoured berry wine. “You’ve been flashing 
the badge of someone called Somerset Ulrich all the way!” 


“How do you know?” The smell of alcohol rises from Tereesz’s mouth into the cold air of 
the cabin. 


“Because all the checkpoint guards call you Mr. Ulrich, and Agent Ulrich, and Somerset 
Ulrich.” 


“It’s a missing agent whose papers I took. I have more.” Tereesz takes a sip, his lips 
reddening and sticky liquid spilling from the neck of the bottle onto his shirt. “Papers, 
I mean. And missing agents. In Kronstadt I put “Machejek”, otherwise, they won’t pick 
up the trail. I thought I’d take Somerset Ulrich to Lemminkainen and leave the track, 
come and get me if you can!” 


” 


“You're a wanted man, or...?” 
“Yeah, yeah, didn’t I tell you, huh? Some guy had a heart attack from that stuff!” 
“ZA/UM, or...?” 


“Yes, that,” says Tereesz, and in front of him he sees the rally ace Kenni, a black mass of 
snow drifting slowly into the sky. The earth crunches and crackles as the spruce trees 
tear themselves up by their roots. The wood screams, and the soaked ore, like in a 
dentist’s chair. The limestone boulder flies into the air, and far above, in the darkness, 
the first trees are wrapped in the Pale. 


Two years ago. 


Khan hears the phone ringing in his sleep. It’s a cold and unfamiliar voice, a false awak- 
ening. He opens his eyes in his mother’s basement and gets up, wearing only his pyjama 
pants and slippers. He feels that something is different, but goes anyway. The basement 
around him is strange from sleep, things are in the wrong places. Nadja Harnankur 
smiles horribly in her locket, Gon-Tzu holds an immortal peach instead of a compass, 
it’s mouldy. 


In the middle of the room, an empty glass display case gleams on the table. Khan doesn’t 
dare to look in that direction, there’s something he can’t remember in its emptiness. 
Something wrong. The phone rings too - how it sounds through the darkness of the 
apartment, from the hallway upstairs. 


He goes up the stairs, the hallway is asleep around him, and the phone rings on the wall. 
He stretches his hand, afraid. His palm becomes sweaty on the plastic of the receiver, 
something forbids him to answer. But he has to, it’s important, every thread counts. So 
he picks up the phone from the cradle, and the hallway fills with static from the Pale. It 
hurts his ear next to the receiver. 


“Hello?” Khan asks. 


78 


But no one answers. 


“Hello, who is this? Please tell me who you are!” he repeats, and each time the man’s 
voice becomes more pleading, the static louder. Until it deafens him, the pressure in his 
inner ear goes awry, leaving only the vibration of unknown origin at its core. Silence 
passes through flesh and bone like waves. It’s cold. 


“Please,” big tears flow from Khan’s eyes. “Tell me who you are...” 


“You know who I am.” The vibration emits a child’s voice, saying terrible things. Khan 
begins to tremble and slumps into the corner of the hallway, the receiver in his hand. 


“Tt’s not you, it’s not you!” he cries. The man’s real body shakes with his mind. He 
wakes up and cries in his bed. His ear hums and the dream continues in wakefulness, 
only the airship model is back in the display case, Nadja no longer smiles, and Gon-Tzu 
holds the compass. 


On top of the display case are dried cheese sandwiches from his mother, and cold coffee. 
And an envelope - a morning magnet mail from Graad. “Sarjan Ambartsumjan” is written 
in the sender’s box, and inside is a single key, golden and immeasurably complex. 


He has two years. 


79 


12. ZIGI 


Nineteen years ago, in late autumn. It’s 8:15 and Khan is running late for school. He 
hurries through the city centre in Konigsmalm. The white streaks of traffic glow in 
the morning darkness, and thick sleet falls heavily. The boy runs with his backpack on, 
across the pedestrian crossing, the horn blares and a car zooms past. He almost gets 
hit. Sleet droplets get in his eyes, and melt on his cheeks and woollen hat. Khan runs 
up the stairs to the front door, when something stops him in his tracks. The school’s 
caretaker is scrubbing a big red letter “O” on the corner of the school facade, together 
with a cleaning lady. The letter is as big as the cleaning lady. A policeman shakes his 
head and looks up at the wall where a huge slogan reads: “THE WHOLE WORLD IS IN 
THE IMMEDIATE ZONE OF AN ENTROPONETIC CATASTROPHE”. 


Zigi is that kind of boy. 


Zigi is the worst boy in school. Zigi is so bad that some would even say Zigi is too bad. 
“He’s in tenth grade, but you know what? He came to us from another school, and Sixten 
knows someone there, and he told us that Zigi came to their school from another school 
too. Guess what year Zigi was in! Exactly! Tenth grade too. I swear. And you know what 
else? That school he went to before... he was in tenth grade there too!” Zigi’s mother is 
a cheerful Vaasa woman, she works at the Ministry of Education and gets on well with 
the Lund girl’s mother. That’s why the boy is able to go to school in the city centre, even 
though he’s been suspended twice. At home, he’s got loads of notebooks full of all kinds 
of demarcation machines, city maps and trajectories, but Zigi doesn’t want you to know 
that about him. 


Zigi’s father is a nihilist, a kojko and a drunk. Zigi is very proud of that: “My father? Oh, 
I don’t know. Nihilist... kojko... a drunk... Zigi’s real name is Zygismunt Berg. Tereesz 
once saw him in the boys’ toilet, raised his left hand in his fist and said,”Franticek the 
Brave!” Zigi said nothing. Zigi pissed. Then Zigi went to the door and stood for a 
moment. The locks on the leather jacket rattled. 


“Hey, dude, listen!” 

“Yes?” 

“Shove your Franticek the Brave up your ass.” 
Zigi is a nihilist and also a communist. If needed. 


The word “bourgeois” rolls off his tongue like a butterfly knife: “bourgeois”, “bour- 
geoisie”, “bourgeois art”, “petty-bourgeois opinion”, “you are bourgeois”, “your bour- 
geois parents”, “your parents are bourgeoisie”, “it’s because your parents are bour- 
geoisie”, “it’s because you are a bourgeois, Ann (Zigi also calls teachers by their first 
names),”’bourgeoisie larvae”, “bourgeoisie puppy”, “pederasty is a bourgeois illness, 
pederasts are bourgeoisie”. Zigi has read books and is familiar with the most beautiful 


yn 


names of the bourgeoisie: “pursui”, “bourgeois”, “petit-bourgeois”, “burgher”, “kulak”, 


yn 


“middle class”, “rentier”, “large landownert... 


mn 


His influence is huge. A girl in fourth grade with pigtails comes home and asks: “Dad, 
why is social democracy so weak?” 


“Where did you hear that?” 


“Zigi said that social democracy is weak and communism is powerful. Why don’t we have 
communism, dad?” 


80 


But above all, Zigi is a nihilist. He reads dialectical materialism, says that animals are 
automatons, is a fan of behaviourism, and worships the Pale and Mesque’s nihilistic 
inspiration Ambrosius Saint-Miro. “If you had even a little bit of courage, you would go 
down to Saint-Miro as well,” Zigi talks about his homeland in revolutionary fervour. This 
is no longer a part of Zigi. Zigi lacks a homeland. His geography teacher sent him to the 
principal’s office, and Zigi stopped at the door, the locks on his leather jacket rattling: 
“We’ll see you in the Pale,” he said, and ran his index finger across his throat. Back when 
the school did not yet discuss entroponetics, many gathered around Zigi during recess, 
and the hallway echoed with his half-truths: “The Pale is made from the past,” he said. 
“All lost things are mixed up there, sad and abandoned. The Pale is the world’s memory 
of the world. It accumulates at the end of the matter and wipes everything off its path. 
This is called an entroponetic collapse.” 


“But when will it happen, Zigi?” 
“Yes, Zigi, when?” 


“During your lifetime, little Olle. Or at least I hope so. History swallows up the present, 
the world made of matter disappears, desaparecido... That’s why there is no point for 
our generation to going to school, there will be no future. When you grow up, don’t have 
children like your underdeveloped bourgeois parents. You’ll end up seeing them die and 
that’s all. Compared to the Pale, there is only a little bit of the world left! Eventually, the 
isolas will sink, tens and hundreds of square kilometres of land mass, you will understand. 
Like a ship sinking into the Pale. Vuhhhh...” Zigi makes a sinking ship with his hands, the 
leather jacket locks rattle and the children gasp. “Don’t worry, Olle, it’ll be the highlight 
of all mankind.” 


Zigi is smoking. In the school toilet, in the cloakroom corner. Zigi has a sprechgesang 
band, and the leader of the hobby group made a big mistake when he let Zigi perform 
during the winter solstice. Zigi sprechgesang like a machine gun. Four hundred bullets 
a minute... 


Hook: 
“Smoke cigarettes! In the school toilet, in the corner of the cloakroom, 
abragq adabra, in the lobby (oh yeah!) in the lunch queue. 

1st verse: 
It’s a nasty morning, it’s dark, tired to be, 


It’s snowing, my spirits are low, and right on the corner of my house (Mum 
can’t see!) 


A cigarette in front of me, mmm... you get the idea, I’m getting kinda fancy. 

A cigarette in front of me, it’s warm inside, and everything disappears! 
Hook: 

Abraq adabra, school toilet, cloakroom corner, 


abraq adabra, vanish like the world.” 


And so on. In January, Zigi was expelled from school. And mind you, it wasn’t because of 
his obscure rhymes. In the tolerant educational environment of Vaasa in the fifties, such 
sprechgesanging was seen more as a natural part of the process of coming of age. The 


81 


point was that Zigi was a drug dealer. That’s why he came to the school in the first place. 
No one expected such a thing at the time and Zigi was more than aware of it. He acted 
fearlessly, right in the classroom, talking about his deals openly and loudly, handing 
out samples, reaping the rewards of Vaasa’s naivety like Vidkun Hird or the Linoleum 
Salesman. He consumed himself too, came to class drugged, he was an anachronist, 
twenty years ahead of his time. Zygismunt Berg was a black bobbing stain. 


Then, when the police finally caught up with him, Zygismunt emigrated to Graad, to his 
father. He disappeared off the radar. A few years later, his charred corpse was found in 
the furnace of a particularly depressing apartment block. 


82 


13. CHEMICAL MARRIAGE 


With a blond strand of hair annoyingly in his eye, eyebrows crinkled from the sun, little 
Jesper de la Guardie stands in the transport hub of his timeless consciousness. Every- 
thing leads here and everything goes out from here. He wears a white sailor suit for the 
occasion, with a navy blue-striped sailor hat in his hand, nervously bending it. Jesper 
is thirteen years old, with a bottle opener in his pocket, a monogrammed handkerchief, 
twenty-four-speed pills, and a lily bouquet on the bench next to him. All previous time 
flows into this place, the Charlottesjal horse tram stop, and everything that follows goes 
out from here. It is July 1°*, year 52, and Jesper stands on the edge of a summer evening, 
under the white arch of the funk! waiting pavilion. He is afraid, while the rattling of the 
wagons is heard as the rollercoaster gradually lifts him to its acceleration ramp since last 
Sunday. And so it has been all week: the height, the feeling of dizziness laying ahead. 
And falling, he is indescribably excited. The first tram comes, but there are no girls on it. 
The boy feels a strange relief, like when he was too short for the Steel Mountains three 
years ago at the Revachol amusement park. The danger has passed. But still, even the 
next tram brings passengers to the stop, and there are no girls among them. The feeling 
turns his stomach upside down - disappointment. What if they don’t come? It’s half past 
eight, and they were supposed to be here an hour ago. “You have to be at least this tall 
to ride the Steel Mountains, little boy.” Jesper rises on tiptoe and takes a sip of beer for 
courage. Beer is a terrible idea, he knows it. Beer makes you smell like hops. 


“This is a terrible idea, Tereesz. Beer stinks, chicks hate beer!” But after a week of con- 
struction work, a three hundred real payment to the school’s worst boy Zigi to redeem 
the mystical pills... after buying batteries for the record player, flowers, and God knows 
what else, Tereesz was right. He said, “We don’t have any more resources, Jesper, and 
we can’t go there dry... we just can’t.” So they stood in front of the beer stand, a helpful 
boatman licked his lips and dreamed of his share. The seller looked at the three mis- 
chievous boys from under his brow and the boys watched as the foaming liquid flowed 
from the cistern into paper cups. 


“Like piss,” commented Jesper. 


Khan took the half-litre bottle into his brown hands and watched as Jesper drummed his 
fingers against the edge of his sailor’s cap. “Shut up and drink, your hands are shaking,” 
Khan said. 


“Mm... you’ve been drinking piss, if I’m not mistaken?” Jesper replied teasingly and 
sniffed his drink. “We thought we’d keep up the facade of virginity, but here you are, 
reeking so elegantly of pis s!” 


Khan, with a low tolerance for jokes, chuckled as he drank the foul-smelling beer. Now 
he nervously paces at the stop, kicking small stones across the road. Every so often, a 
beachgoer throws a nasty glance at him from across the street as a stone hits their leg. 
The boy apologises and tries to dry the front of his shirt in the sea breeze, where the 
beer stain is still drying. 


“Does it stink? Jesper, tell me, is it noticeable?” 


“Tt stinks, yeah, it stinks really bad, and it’s noticeable too. Look, when’s the next tram 
coming?” 


“It’s coming at nine, another twenty minutes.” 


83 


“No, don’t tell me, go look!” Jesper frees himself from Khan and empties his cup. The 
paper cup flies toward the trash can and bounces narrowly past the edge. “Damn it!” 


Tereesz, speckled with sunspots like a devil from the construction site, bends his knees 
and dances in his shoes that are tied at his ankles. He has a portable record player with 
leather straps on his back. The cream-coloured plastic embossing reads boldly “Mono.” 
The machine is huge and weighs more than a load of bricks. In his hands, Tereesz 
bounces heavy batteries. 


“So, is it buzzing?” he asks Jesper. “It’s buzzing for me.” 
Jesper is buzzing a little, but not much. 


“It’s good, the point of courage is not to get hammered. Just the edges need to be sanded 
down,” Tereesz pontificates. He’s probably the only one who isn’t bothered by an hour- 
long delay off-track. We, the potato-coloured kojko-rabs who have survived through the 
genocide and the Yugo-Graad massacre on the buzz of alcohol... As long as we have the 
smell of hoppy beer or flavoured berry wine at hand, we’re not afraid of anything. 


Khan takes the chrysanthemum bouquet from the bench and now they all sit in a row of 
three, tapping the asphalt and clapping their knees. Uncoordinated, arrhythmic. The 
sound of creaking rails comes from behind the slope and Tereesz nervously squeezes 
his bouquet of seven red roses. The sound of hooves gets closer, the horses are already 
on the slope and the coachman’s silver badge shines on his hat. The buzz seems to 
disappear as Tereesz nervously picks at the silver paper of his bouquet. He didn’t skimp. 
Seven red roses, a full hand. If only he had also bought a box of chocolates, such a 
fancy one, with gold embossed writing like in a Graad novel, if only he hadn’t run out 
of money. Something flashes from the tram cabin, out of the corner of his eye Tereesz 
sees Jesper stand up. Let Jesper take care of his lilies and Khan can fumble with his 
chrysanthemums! Roses, red, seven pieces - that’s chic! Rdze i bomboniera, bardzo 
wybornie, Tereesz Machejek! 


The tram doors fold open with a sharp metallic sound and the boy doesn’t even notice 
how the thorns penetrate his clenched hands. The anticipation is vividly remembered, 
but the event itself is too brutal, the moment is shrouded in a veil of suspense. Something 
happened, something he did. The girls, all three of them, stepped from the train onto 
the asphalt, their long legs in knee-high socks, oh my god, what cruelty, they’re dolled 
up! The hem of their skirts flutters, looking so casually chic as if nothing significant is 
happening. Charlotte puts her hand on her hip and stops in front of him, but Tereesz, 
unable to play along, makes a mistake and hugs the girl. His hands around her, a huge 
rose bouquet hanging from the back of her dress, oh joy, the flowers are covered in 
golden dust, can it be any more wybornie? He smells a strange scent from the girl’s 
neck. They look at each other - Tereesz and the goddess from the ninth grade - and 
Tereesz, with a brown and red face, a silly smile on his face, says: “Hi!” 


“Well, hi to you too!” Charlotte replies with a boyish charm. As if nothing has happened. 
The girl takes the flowers and they walk together under the pines where the evening sun 
doesn’t reach. It’s dim and quiet and no one knows what to say. 


Outside, in the yard of the Self-chiller’s country house, Kenni turns the motor carriage 
around into a ready-to-start position. The machine’s heavy gas bursts merge with the 
distant noise of the forest massif, on the edge of the Pale. The Pale can also be felt 
from behind the stone-lined walls of the large house. The machine’s lights cut through 


84 


the dusty window and into the cracked stone floor of the old manor house’s foyer. The 
finger-drawn smiley face in the dust on the window sparkles. 


No one came to the door when they knocked. The lock was invitingly open, and flash- 
lights hung on nails in the foyer. Former Collaboration Police agent Tereesz Machejek 
and cellar-dwelling Inayat Khan now walk flashlights in hand, through the labyrinth of 
dark rooms. Garden tool racks, disassembled garden carts, and piles of old furniture 
pass by in the beams of their flashlights. Khan stumbles among stacks of roof tiles, while 
tall Tereesz walks ahead of him, practically stooped under the low ceiling. Another unin- 
habited room. A large, dark kitchen can be seen through a side door, smelling of chalk 
and mould. Piles of bottles and something that looks like half a bar of smoked sausage 
flicker there. Khan calls out the owner’s name fruitlessly from time to time. 


“Are you sure we’re in the right place?” asks Tereesz. 


Khan is sure, and Tereesz feels like he hears distant, muffled chaos amid a catastrophe. 
The ringing approaches, and phases in and out like an illusion. But it doesn’t come from 
outside, where the roots of trees rustle in the ground and electrical wires sizzle in the 
sky. It comes from inside the electricity-free house. Tereesz sits on a pile of old papers 
and observes the room around him in a beam of dust-filled light. He’s still a little tipsy 
from the berry wine, but the darkness sobers him up. Doors surrounded by various 
debris lead in all four directions. He thinks he can hear the low hum of a generator in 
the distance, in the heart of the house, and he sets his sights on it. Struggling with a 
jammed door, he steps into a large, low-ceilinged hall. 


Tereesz turns off his flashlight and steps carefully over the bent floorboards. It’s cool 
inside. The smell of gasoline cuts through the mould. Black cable bundles twist like 
snakes under his shoes and continue into the dim corner of the hall, where green and 
yellow lights flicker rhythmically. The hall is barely illuminated by candles hanging from 
wagon wheels, casting yellowish rays on the floor, while darkness creeps in through 
the window panes. Tereesz stands in a ray of light and feels the sound waves of the 
clockwork around him, cold and unfamiliar. On the plastered walls, there is equipment 
piled up on decks. Khan stops by the door and runs his fingers over the embossed letters 
“Mono.” 


“Tereesz,” he whispers, “‘Mono’! And this one says ‘Hertz.’” The high-frequency oscil- 
lations barely quiver under his fingers. “This is...” 


“a discotheque,” nods Tereesz. “This is a discotheque.” 


Three-quarters ofa century ago, the Ozonne islands were blanketed by a pitch-dark night. 
Everything is grey, dark grey, and under a cloudy sky, black waves lap against the sandy 
shore. The palm fronds sway over the heads of revolutionary lovers. The coups have 
failed, and everything has gone wrong. Dobreva opens her darkly made-up anarchist 
eyes. A dried-up line of poison bulges from the corner of her mouth. Abadanaizi crunches 
ampoule shards between his teeth as he strokes her hair. “Listen!” he says, and in the 
pitch-darkness above the water, the hypnotic rhythm of bells crackles. Slowly, the colour 
begins to seep into the black-and-white world. 


“Dance!” shouts Dobreva like a little girl. She stands up and walks away. Abadanaiz 
follows her into the waves, the water splashing around their ankles. 


“Do you hear it?” Tereesz asks Khan. 
“Like a buzzing, right?” 


“Exactly.” Tereesz takes a candle from the end of a nail and points it towards the dim 


85 


distance of the room. They move discreetly across the floorboards to the back of the hall. 
Gradually, rows of sliders emerge from the darkness on the mixing console, monolithic 
speakers towering on either side of the desk and behind it, a young man with a trendy 
sweatshirt sits with headphones. The headband of the headphones crushes his curly hair 
against his head. Ulv nods his chin to the rhythm of the music, but his eyes are closed 
as if under high tension. 


“Mr. Ulv,” Khan whispers. “I’m sorry, but...” 


“Shh...” the young man puts a finger on his lips. His eyes still tightly closed, he furrows 
his brow so intensely that it seems like an explosion is about to burst behind his eyelids. 


“Please... don’t ruin... my intro,” he pronounces like a vast river as if an incomprehensible 
cubic meter of superhuman partying presses against the dam of Self-chiller’s teeth. He 
points his finger at the mixing console where dozens and dozens of sliders slowly move 
up. 

“This is the most important... part.” 


Khan carefully places the envelope on the studio monitor, where Self-chiller points with 
his trembling hand. Like a bomb disposal expert, Tereesz takes a step back. He manages 
to read the names of the girls on the envelope. Still a well-trained agent, he doesn’t fail 
to notice that there are two - another envelope is hidden underneath the girls’ envelope. 
Tereesz can’t see what’s written on it. He keeps quiet, and as the man and Khan tiptoe 
through the house and the ringing of the bells around them swells louder than the entro- 
ponetic catastrophe outside, it seems to him that these two are somehow harmonising. 
They go through minefields of moving boxes. The sound rises behind them like a shock 
wave, a slow-motion gunshot, where everything is like it was eighty years ago. Kras 
Mazov rises from his desk, and the world is in black and white. Smoke from gunpowder 
rises from his mouth, and outside, in the courtyard of the parliament building, the sea 
of counter-revolutionaries roars. But Kras Mazov no longer hears the treacherous voice 
of this world; the intro is ringing in the mirrors of his office. 


“Well, what was there at the design conference anyway? Are Akerlund talked about 
how he wouldn’t mind a war. Do you remember Are? I made a mistake once and let 
him sit on the sofa with me for a design magazine cover. Now everyone thinks he did 
something there. Including Are himself. He thinks war is more like a happening, a media 
experiment nowadays. And no, I can’t exclude that it could have happened. He might 
have used the word ‘paradigm shift’ for it.” Jesper circles the room on the top floor of 
Havsanglar and practices to himself: “After he left the office, you know... he’s completely 
gone off the rails. He writes record reviews for Dagens. And he’s deaf from nose candy! 
It can happen, his nasal septum has collapsed twice, you should see him! He looks just 
terrible. Like a pig. How does he still write record reviews when he’s deaf? He doesn’t 
write them, he just paraphrases foreign ones. He lowers the grade for rock by one star 
and gives ‘disco’, as you, Khan, would say, two on top.” 


Jesper stops in front of the bed and nods approvingly at the beige cube table. “So, what 
happened in Lemminkainen, you ask? Ah, nothing special, we just went with the boys, 
surreal stuff, it wasn’t bad, I quite liked it. Snow, spruces, apocalypse. What, dear? Why 
did we even go there? Well, look, there’s a specialist living there. His name is Ulv and he 
knows how to party alone. Few are born like that. Most people party with other people. 
Otherwise, it’s not interesting for them. But not Ulv. Ulv is the Self-chiller. Or so they 
say. The evening comes, you bring a little drink, put on a record, dance, and chat with 
yourself. Like Iam now. Only louder. In the morning, when normal people go to work, 


86 


you're still selfchilling.” Jesper opens the frilly curtains in front of the balcony window 
and outside is a dim, cloudy sky. The balcony seems damp from the rain. 


“And what? Ah yes... You know, as usual. He talks to the dead. That’s right, a talker to 
the dead. They come when he plays them Van Eyck and old Rietveld. That’s why he’s 
alone like this. No, dear, he doesn’t tolerate Fakkengaff.” Jesper steps onto the balcony 
and stands on the reed mat. “He communicates with the Pale, you know. Whatever that 
means. You understand how it could captivate us. That thought. Yes, because of those 
girls. That’s right, ha-ha-ha!” Derek Trentmoller looked at them from here that day. 
Strange. He couldn’t say that it was eerie here. Completely normal hotel room. A little 
less sea painting wouldn’t hurt, the snobby decorations in the hallway are disgusting, 
and the wallpaper is, well, still just wallpaper. Otherwise, everything is top-notch, ’50s 
elegance. Jesper looks down from the balcony. Charlottesjal’s soul soaks in the rain 
there, the autumn wave washes it to the beach. The balcony is high up in the sky, on the 
twelfth floor. Jesper stands there alone. He spreads his arms. “Don’t be naive, of course 
not really. But the show was decent. The show is the most important thing in this field 
- psychics. Take them as entertainers. That’s it. Where are we going for dinner? No, I 
don’t really want to talk about it anymore.” 


Before leaving, Jesper stands for a moment in the middle of room number 1212 at 
Havsanglar. The moss-green cover of the sofa and the frilled curtains seem apricot 
cream in the soft light of the floor lamp. No, he doesn’t have anything against it. Out- 
side, the world is uniformly grey and the room’s feminine chic sleeps in the centre. A 
true petit-bourgeois dream. Jesper spreads his arms as if waiting for something to hap- 
pen. He also takes a few provocative steps and then stands with his arms hanging at 
his sides. The radio’s number pad gleams on the bedside table, the clock ticks, and the 
curtains before the unopened balcony door billow like a sail. 


“Please,” says Jesper, looking at the room, its clean walls and high ceiling. But nothing 
happens. Before the interior designer goes down to the beach, he curses in disappoint- 
ment to the room, “Bitch.” 


Jesper walks along the damp sand, with defiant steps. The reeds rustle in the cold of 
late autumn. The boys’ rocky outcrop, now much smaller, is blue in the midst of water 
droplets in the background. A slender white surfboard cuts into the autumn sky like a 
sabre. Jesper lifts his prised surfboard above his head. He casts condescending glances 
at the windsurfers on the water. One can soak naked here for two hours, then climb 
onto the same faded wave with ten other shaky guys. No, Jesper goes to his place. He 
already feels, in the depth of his chest, how the waves there swell, waiting for him. 


The skirt flutters and shines in the dimness of the pine forest, around the thin sun-tanned 
legs of the fourteen-year-old girl. The boys walk, led by the flag of Charlotte’s skirt. 
How long has it been going on like this? On this side of the pine forest, where the 
mint disappears into the dark green of the blueberries, they have never been before. 
Familiar places were left behind long ago, suspension bridges and the road that led up 
to the rocky outcrop. Everything passes in the dimness of silence, with the occasional 
sound of broken conversation. Shadows grow on the dunes, and on the distant horizon, 
the curtains of trees are slowly pulled apart. 


The opening field undulates in the salty sea wind. The blood-orange sun comes out 
low over it. The hair-like grass rustles as Charlotte’s stockings-covered legs spread out 
towards the sea. Six long shadows slide over the field, and the girls run relieved, and 
the boys run after them. Is this still Charlottesjal, this field, where the reeds rise on 


87 


the edges, swaying in the wind? Where the brownish-beige spread of hay turns into a 
fine white strip of sand, Malin stops and takes off her shoes. She breathes heavily from 
the sea expanse, with her chest pinched in her dress, next to Khan. On the horizon, the 
light blue mirror of the sea reflects another sun, scattered like an explosion. The ink 
blotches of the cloud ridges, black against the light, tear apart above the water. They 
stand there among the reeds, all of them, hands over their eyes, and the giant reeds 
bend respectfully on both sides. 


Anni, wearing shorts, plops down on the sand and gloomy Tereesz puts his portable 
record player down beside her, on the reed grass. The boy pulls out the antenna and 
turns on the shortwave radio to a popular youth station. Guitar pop music comes out 
of the speakers, utterly contrary to Tereesz’s mood. The girl didn’t hug him back. How 
stiff she felt, Charlotte, how straight and tense in her sandals. He doesn’t even dare to 
look at her now, feeling that something has been broken in the meantime. Such a thing 
brings to mind the massacre of Yugo-Graad. When the buzz is gone, you find out that our 
true heavy nature comes out. After all, we are just ordinary people with potato-coloured 
hair and eyes of random colours. But Malin, the Nordic cheerfulness, lets out a happy 
snap of her fingers and asks Khan, “Did you get it?” 


“We got it!” Jesper jumps in. He looks at the girls as their faces light up when he pulls 
out a paper bag from the bottom of his pocket. Malin spreads the beach towel on the 
sand and Anni brings out six shimmering water bottles from the bag. The bottles stand 
in a row in the sand and Charlotte explains how this will lead to an immense thirst. How 
they will have to bring water back from the beach later. But that’s okay, it will be quite 
an adventure for this daring couple who dares to go. The boys tremble with excitement 
at the word. A couple! 


Only Tereesz was distracted. Tereesz was still thinking of the genocide. 


Six of them in a circle, girls opposite the boys, sit on a beach towel and Charlotte pours 
pills from a paper bag into her hand. The bag rattles. Noses shift closer and everyone 
watches as twenty-four crimson diamonds sparkle there. The girl throws gems from 
one hand to the other, the tiny little wheels jump happily. One bounces off, the girl says 
“Oops!” and Malin picks it up from the sand like a trinket. She blows on it, painstakingly, 
gives her older sister a reproachful look, and then runs her finger over the surface of 
the pill like a ruby polisher. Khan sees how the girl’s lips glow. They are the colour of 
cherry-speed. 


“Listen, be a good guy, tell me what it is,” Tereesz finally bursts out, in the evening 
twilight, at the playground where dealer Zigi’s leather jacket locks rattle. It’s yester- 
day evening and the boy with greasy black hair is walking on the swing. He places his 
hands on the swing’s board on either side to balance himself, with his legs in front of 
each other in his jeans. And he begins: “You know how they say that drugs - they’re a 
waste of health?” The other end of the swing snaps against the ground as the boy goes 
over the centre. “Escaping from reality, you know, pointless bullshit?” The question 
is rhetorical. Let Zigi answer himself: “They’re right. Cocaine makes you a scumbag, 
heroin an idiot... Stay away from that crap, it dulls the mind and honestly, it’s dangerous 
for a developing organism. It’s not worth it.” Zigi jumps off the swing, sand flying from 
under his sneakers. ” But this, this specific drug! They make these generalisations just 
because they haven't yet...” he pulls a paper bag out of his back pocket and rattles it 
under Tereesz’s nose, “...tried Samara amph! You can’t even imagine how lucky you are 
right now! What a waste! I don’t understand why I even sell this. Why don’t I just do 
it all myself?” Zigi’s black eyes shine in the dim light. “It’s so new that it doesn’t even 


88 


have a name yet! Girls call it cherry speed, boys call it ‘Samara amph’. It comes from 
the Samara Republic, that’s why. All good things in this world come from the Samara 
Republic. They bring it in through the Pale. The world’s first street drug invented by 
communists! Entroponauts do it there, in the Pale to be fearless! But for partying? 
That’s a very pioneering mindset, very progressive. ‘Flying Communist!’ That’s what 
they call it in Graad. But me, personally, I say... You want to know what I call it?” Shad- 
ows fall from Zigi’s cheekbones, and his black brows and wrinkles at the corners of his 
eyes form a cunning expression. 


“Well?” asks Tereesz. 


“Chemical marriage,” says Zigi. “I call it: chemical marriage.” 


Little Inayat Khan is sitting opposite Malin with his legs crossed and watches as the girl 
pops pills into her mouth without any warning, like candy. The twist-off cap snaps and 
Malin wipes her lips clean of water. 


“So,” she asks cheerfully, “what are we waiting for? Let’s take them now. It’ll be a good 
forty-five minutes before they start working anyway. Waiting is boring.” 


“You took two?!” Charlotte is alarmed. “Idiot!” 


“So what?” mutters Tereesz, and Khan feels a sense of fear next to his friend, the freckled 
absurdist philosopher. Still thinking about the Yugo-Graad massacre, Tereesz crunches 
his pills. He doesn’t drink water with them, the saccharin-sweetened, bittersweet chem- 
ical fizzing in his mouth, but Tereesz doesn’t care. “I took two too. ‘The Flying Commu- 


a 


nist’,” he says, swallowing and stretching his arms out like aeroplane wings. 


“Okay, stop!” Charlotte exclaims, and Anni adds, “Two is too much. Start with half. What 
are we going to do with you now? Should we call an ambulance?” 


“No need,” grins Malin. “Last time I took it all at once, and it was really good. I think 
it’ll be twice as good now. What do you think, Tereesz?” 


“T know of bank robberies for which less preparation has been done than for tonight,” 
Khan suddenly bursts out, surprising even himself. “Look, gas lamps in case it gets 
dark,” he pulls three lamps out of Tereesz’s backpack, whose things he now confiscates, 
angrily. “And extra water!” A water-filled bladder hisses as it lands in the sand. “Because 
Zigi said that under that - honestly, I still don’t understand what its name is - all tastes 
become disgusting under that thing. And everything’s already... I don’t know, strange.” 


“Exactly,” Charlotte raises a lone raspberry-coloured pill between her fingers. She looks 
at Khan, whose emerging leadership qualities are confusing, and declares expectantly, 
“Skal?” 


“Skal,” replies Khan, and Jesper watches as his nerdy bench mate and Charlotte grab 
water bottles together. Only Anni is still rolling the pill in her hands. “Well?” The girl 
looks at Jesper with her hands under her chin. “Skdl?” Jesper throws a careless glance 
over her: summer pants with rounded cuts on the buttocks, bent knees, and flip-flops 
hanging loosely on her feet. The girl chuckles, not swallowing immediately, letting the 
pill melt on her sharp tongue. 


“It’s sweet, disgustingly sweet, and I like it. I think I like it because I know what it does 
to me. You would like it too if you knew.” The girl looks at Jesper and Jesper looks 
over her legs. A sun-cooled explosion over the water. A sudden gust of wind makes 
the reeds whisper around them, and everyone falls silent and listens. The boy puts the 


89 


little wheel in his mouth and feels the saccharin sparkle on his tongue. He hesitates 
for a moment and then swallows. A wave of fear rises again after swallowing, and the 
acidic environment reacts, unwittingly breaking down the raspberry-red brilliance in his 
abdomen. Colourants and dyes fizz. Waves wash up on the beach in front of his eyes, 
quietly like in a dream, seagulls screeching; in this dimming world, the boy with the 
white sailor hat is now just a traveller, at the mercy of semi-synthetics. Jesper himself 
surrendered, the last of all six, but voluntarily. Like everyone else. He doesn’t know it 
yet, but even now, he carries microscopic flakes of carbon, oxygen, and hydrogen in his 
undeveloped metabolism; the naturally non-existent combination of elementary particles 
settles inside him. Nothing here depends on him anymore, everything depends on them. 
They have their plan, and there are forty-five minutes left for it to work. They synchronise 
with him, form new patterns of behaviour, and take over like quiet weapons in a secret 
war. 


But something in this psychopharmacology doesn’t reach the snowstorm that ravages 
Malin Lund’s thirteen-year-old body. Khan looks on, his head bowed, as the girl stands 
up in front of him and unties her ash-blonde braid. Her hair flutters in the wind. Like a 
pregnant woman, she places her hands on her belly. Her metabolism is working overtime 
beneath the white-speckled dress fabric. She already feels the morning sickness turning 
her digestive delicacy, phenethylamines rushing against the petal-veined pink skin. The 
final synthesis of amphetamine, the non plus ultra! Her body wants to rid itself of the 
intruder, but she is so brave, she holds it all inside. She is clever, she hasn’t eaten all 
day, and she is also beautiful, very beautiful. 


On the glossy cover of the girls’ magazine, like on an abacus, twelve gems stand in a 
row. There were originally twenty-four. Charlotte took one, Anni took one, Jesper took 
one, and Khan took one more. Tereesz took two. Let’s count. Meanwhile, as the wind 
tousles Malin’s hair and she feels how it already floods her blood-brain barrier - her 
silent secret. A serotonin apocalypse whirlwind is rising. Well, what can she say, Malin 
Lund has a cute face, and soft curves, she only has the best grades on her eighth-grade 
diploma, and she really likes it when it feels good. 


Six of them, sitting in a row with their hands on their knees, silent. Expectation, the 
edge of the horizon is a hazy gold, the sun sinks into the body of water, and above it 
in the sky dome is a dirty blue-green stripe. Malin measures the remaining time with 
her thumb like an hourglass. Behind the thumb, the sun sinks, and the sky dome above 
the child’s head is darkening to a deeper blue with each passing moment. Stars light 
up there, one after another, and in silence, you can hear the sand on the water’s edge 
sizzling under the receding wave like lemonade. 


Jesper is standing on a beach where there is no one else. Twenty years stretch out behind 
him, and waves tower in front of him in the ocean. To his right hand in the sand, there 
is a white sword-like surfboard, and the other hand rests expectantly on his hip. Jesper 
wears a rubber black wetsuit, as always. He wears a full-body glove. His bright blue eyes 
look through the eye holes of the mask like a bank robber, and his mouth turns red from 
the cold in the middle of the mouth hole. The empty beach greets Jesper every year. The 
coastline has changed a lot, the sandbanks have crept over time like living sand, but the 
basic plan always remains the same. Jesper steps slowly into the ocean from between 
the reeds. The North Sea’s ten-degree water sticks tightly to his wetsuit, step by step, 
becoming deeper and deeper. Even through the neoprene cold-resistant skin of the suit, 
body heat is lost to the water. It happens gradually, imperceptibly. Hypothermia starts 
after three-quarters of an hour. 


90 


The waves beat at his waist, and the waves swell in front of him, in the dark grey twilight. 
Jesper crawls onto the board and starts rowing. The water splashes against the board, 
and the waves break around him as he rises into them. The further he goes, the higher 
they rise, until the man can no longer row through the wave crests. Before he lifts the 
sail, Jesper presses the sharp nose of the board underwater and dives. Hypothermic icy 
water explodes against him, swirling around in underwater eddies. It burns in his eyes 
like molten metal. Jesper’s coal-black silhouette slides towards the bottomless sea grave 
and pushes the bright white line of the surfboard into the darkness. 


“What comes next? What does it feel like?” Tereesz finally asks, and then when Charlotte 
and Anni convey to the boys the heightened physical sensations and the ecstasy that 
is difficult to put into words, it all shifts above them like a high-pressure system in the 
darkening dome of the sky. Khan is overcome with a strange indifference to the situation. 
He blinks his eyes behind his dialectical materialist glasses, breathes calmly, and feels 
himself, his overweight body around him, the layer of fat and his heart beating with 
excitement, as if all of it is no longer a part of him. Malin apologetically moves next to 
Khan, and they separate from the group. 


In Khan’s peaceful world on the horizon, it’s good to be calm. It seems like Iilmaraa’s 
tricolour - the colour combination that comes to the girl’s mind in connection with Khan 
- appears frozen into the evening sky. Malin says this to the boy and at the same time 
warns that there is still a lot of frankness to come today. Then, when it comes. 


“Very good,” nods Khan and moves ever closer to his new self, the one he has become 
with the help of the industrial empathogen. For the upcoming night and for the rest of 
his life. If he needs to, he will return to this place where everything is fine. Everything is 
under control. “And by the way, that’s where it comes from, the colours of the evening sky. 
Turquoise, violet, and orange. They are so bright on the flag because lilmaraa doesn’t 
have the right pigments. They don’t occur naturally there. That’s their misfortune, that 
and the incredibly bleaching sun. That’s why it seems like they have bad taste. Actually, 
it’s because of the pigments and the sun. They would like to do calmer things, but they 
can’t.” 


Malin nods. “You know, sometimes I just don’t have anything to add. Especially about 
something like this. I don’t know anything about colour pigments, but I like what you’re 
saying. So don’t mind me, okay?” 


“No, you don’t have to apologise. I know it’s interesting - the situation with lilmaraa’s 
colour pigments, antique airships’ ability to go through the Pale, even that bullshit I told 
you about when I walked you home - no one needs to tell me that,” Khan says. They 
both laugh quietly as if hiding their joke from others. Khan falls silent and raises his 
chin towards the ocean again. “And what about you, what would you say about it? That 
feeling? When it comes.” 


“I don’t know why, but I’m feeling a colour right now,” Malin explains, and Khan nods 
calmly. “I would say it’s black. Very dark. Very good darkness.” Khan nods again. He’s 
starting to enjoy this new way that Malin is opening up to him. He wishes the whole 
world would talk to him like this. About everything. And Khan would nod quietly in 
response, expressing his modest support. Inayat Khan’s support. This is no joke. He 
feels his palms sweating, his hands going numb. Malin tells him that it’s supposed to be 
like this. It’s all completely normal. It means that it’s coming soon. It’s about to start. 


Khan suddenly looks at the creature in front of him with burning care, and the crea- 
ture looks back at Khan. He wants the best for her. The girl trembles slightly, grits 


91 


her teeth, and clutches her sweaty beach towel in her hands. Beautiful thoughts flash 
behind Malin Lund’s dark green eyes, and her serotonergic neurons are reassembled 
in the intricate network of synapses. This law, this terrible thing called mood swings, 
original sin, and serotonin reuptake, is suppressed. This chemical cycle that torments 
Malin Lund with its meagre candy rations day in and day out - from school mornings 
to evenings when homework is done - now stops functioning. And not only that, but 
the neurons pump unnatural amounts of leftover pleasure into her. The girl is infused 
with the ink-black, overripe clusters of delightful juice, pure liquid ecstasy. ’50s guitar 
pop plays from a portable record player in the background. Transport proteins keep 
pumping more pleasure, so much that neither body nor mind can react yet. 


“I’m scared,” Malin suddenly says. “It’s different from last time. I hear you now, but 
everything else is just spinning. I don’t know what... I don’t know what I feel.” The 
girl’s breathing visibly quickens. She turns her back to her older sister and says quietly 
over her shoulder, “It’s so hot, Lotte, please take my dress off over my head.” 


“What, already?!” Charlotte quickly looks at her watch and unzips Malin’s dress. “There 
should still be fifteen minutes left. Of course, that time can be shorter, too.” 


Malin’s voice is weak, like a broken string: “My head is spinning, I can’t see anything...” 
The girl raises her hands up in the air. 


“It’s okay,” Khan says calmly, not losing his nerve. The more complicated the situation 
becomes, the calmer Khan gets. He blinks his eyes quietly and breathes in and out. The 
coolness of the sea, the rippling ocean, stretches out before him, always so vast and 
indifferent. “If your head is spinning, then close your eyes,” Khan says, and at least for 
now, he thinks it would be gentlemanly not to look in that direction. The crinkly white 
wrapping paper of the dress rustles in the air, and Charlotte lifts it over Malin’s head. 


The girl gasps for air: “Oh my God, I’m scared... Oh God...” She collapses into her sister’s 
lap, her red lips moving in the dark: “It’s coming...” Khan can’t keep himself from looking 
any longer. Malin’s hair is spread out on Charlotte’s dress, her body in her swimsuit 
glows hot in her sister’s arms, and her eyes are dilated to a mydriatic degree - enormous 
black discs, pupils without even a hint of green. The five of them sit in a circle around 
her, and Malin looks at Khan. 


“How can you be so calm?” she asks. 


Khan looks away from the girl’s body movements, from her joints that twitch feverishly 
in front of his eyes. He looks at the cold North Sea where the sun has sunk. The dark 
shapes of the clouds are breaking apart. “I don’t know,” says Inayat Khan, taking off his 
wet glasses and habitually wiping them with a handkerchief. “I think it’s working. I’ve 
been abnormally calm for a while now.” 


Charlotte strokes Malin’s head. “Maybe so. My first time was quiet too. Are your palms 
sweaty?” 


“Charlotte, my palms are always sweaty. But yes, I think they’re sweaty now too.” 


Malin snuggles into her sister’s dress like cool sheets. She rubs herself in, in a crib, ina 
kindergarten bed, the dress fabric rustling around her, smelling so pleasant and airy... 
Her body is only thirteen years old, but in the dim light of her central nervous system, 
oxytocin rivers are already flowing like postpartum bliss. Support and trust flow from 
her nascent breasts, the hormone of orgasm rises like yeast in warm adipose tissue, 
and the girl blushes in the waves of tenderness. She loves everyone. Anni watches her 
sister’s euphoria with envy: “Ugh, you already have it so good!” 


92 


“Oh my god, it’s so good,” Malin sighs. “You can’t even imagine how good it is. Say 
something beautiful, it’s rustling so loudly. I’m afraid it will become really sad other- 
wise.” “That could happen,” Charlotte nods her magnificent head and presses her palm 
against Malin’s chest but then recoils in shock like touching a hot stove. “Oh my god, 
your heart is beating so fast! Can you hear it? It’s like hoofbeats!” Anni buries her ear 
on her sister’s chest, listening to her heartbeat. “Malin, how many did you take, tell the 
truth!” 


“Two pieces,” Malin lies. She didn’t take two, she took six. She strokes Anni’s smooth 
hair with one hand and finds Khan’s hand in the air with the other. She presses it to her 
chest, a need for closeness, and breathes: “Everything is fine, believe me, everything is 
exactly as it should be. Oh my god, it’s so good...” She shakes her head slowly, cautiously, 
as if retreating from the waves of hot and cold; enraged, it flutters before her, horses’ 
mouths foaming. The substance rages, ravages. “...I’ve never felt this good in my life. 
Everything is so soft, you try too...” The girl presses the boy’s hand firmly against her 
ribs, and the circle closes in on Malin. Khan sits up straight above it all, lifting his 
plump chin towards the girl, proudly, indescribable peace reigning in his heart. It had 
already seeped into him before, but the feeling grows bigger and more confident with 
each passing moment. The dark-skinned boy looks at her from under lowered brows, his 
dialectical materialism glasses magnifying the blackening wheels of his eyes. He is a 
Serbian lion, a true khan of nations. 


“Malin, listen, I think it hit me too. That magic.” He squints his eyes. 


“Tinfected you!” the girl exclaims and smiles lovingly at her firstborn. Khan exhales and 
feels how his breath is terribly warm against the girl, like a sword, and the world around 
them hums with dark joy. The atmosphere vibrates, everything is under a noise filter, 
and a swarm of grasshoppers chirps, rubbing their legs against the threads from which 
everything is made. This throbbing heart attack runs through everything, even the soil 
beneath Khan’s hand, and in the warm darkness of Malin Lund’s body, an emergency 
alarm sounds. 


A crazy Suru rally driver is hitting the tire of his car in front of the house. It gets worse 
and worse, high frequencies swarm in his ears. Stop for a moment, let Kenni think why 
the third gear won’t go in. It’s worrying, really. He looks at the old crooked door of 
the wooden manor and the world stops there, suspended in snowflakes, for one clear 
moment. The gable of the house rises against the dark blue sky, everything is calm 
and quiet. A return to earth. Kenni’s silver breath rises from his mouth into the winter 
silence. 


Seventy years ago, Nadja Harnankur stepped off the bridge into the void, her proud ball 
gown turning inside out, the fabric flapping as she fell. She drops headfirst, straight as 
an arrow, and through the hovering white gauze of her petticoat, the operetta star bids 
farewell to the world. The Veera River flows beneath her fall, a mercury stream, frothy. 
And from far away, the sound of sleigh bells rings out, like a childhood memory. 


Inayat Khan exits the farmhouse door with Tereesz Machejek. The tall ex-agent looks 
around in surprise in silence. It’s so beautiful to watch the snow floating in the candle- 
light of the forgotten carriage room. And Kenni waves to them from beside the car, the 
other hand on his heart as if in relief. 


They take two steps forward, and Tereesz still hears the crunch of snow under his shoe, 
when suddenly low frequencies explode. Kenni sees the two men turn abruptly towards 


93 


the manor house. A deafening beat resounds, and the windowpanes rattle with its bass 
rhythm. 


Little Tereesz is dancing, self-indulgently like a shaman of a tribe. He shakes his fingers 
in the air, which are numb and pleasant, and the world whispers around him. A gust 
of wind makes the reeds rustle, cooling his sweaty forehead and bare upper body. The 
world’s kindness is inexhaustible, the Yugo-Graad massacre has never happened there, 
Franti¢ek the Brave is coming and the SRV revolutionary army is behind him, waving 
white flags. Tereesz could ask for anything from that world, but he dare not even look 
at what moves directly in front of him. It is no longer part of this world. Only the bass 
drum’s low sound from “Mono” echoes in his black mirrored hearing. They are six of 
them, hidden among the reeds. It seemed like such a good idea to all of them. “Let’s go, 
let’s go there, let’s make a nest!” they exclaimed together. 


Khan lights gas lamps in the dark. The gas has a nasty, slug-like smell. A spark from 
a match and the lamp ignites with a roar, blue flames dancing under the glass, casting 
delicate shadows around the children in the reed field. Khan looks at his handiwork and 
he likes it. He likes how the shadows flicker on Malin’s cheeks. He’s not afraid to tell her 
and the girl is grateful for it. Tucked into Charlotte’s dress, wearing white swimwear, 
Malin Lund is saturated and overripe. Mentally, she can no longer reinterpret the flood 
of substances as well-being, but her tissues are still shredding. The substance is now 
beating the girl, brutally, and jealously. And nothing in this feverish night indicates that 
it will subside. It hits her again, Malin presses her hands to her sides, and her breathing 
stops for a second. The pleasure of the dress fabric grinds on her lymph nodes, her 
armpits smooth, her rosy nipples protruding against the spandex, but her nerve endings 
have long been numb; too numb to notice. The sensory units are scorched, and the 
physical apparatus can no longer receive pleasure. The bottle of water slips from the 
girl’s hand onto the beach, no one notices, everyone just keeps chatting around her. A 
warm reddish glow sticks to Malin’s inner thighs, she writhes, her pupils glowing at the 
same frequency - in burnout mode. And around her, bouquets of lilies, chrysanthemums, 
and red roses wilt in the sand. 


The child shakes, and the body collapses under the strain. “Please comfort me, it’s too 
good to be...” she mumbles, “It’s too sad to be.” 


The operetta star opens her eyeballs’ whites wide; and remorse, suffocating remorse 
of glands! What have I done, me, foolish, foolish woman! Ice-cold water gurgles in 
Nadja’s lifeless lung tissues. All that Nadja has done remains in history as a shell, lifeless 
and distorted. She is a mannequin there, a delusion, almost nobody remembers who 
Nadja really was. They haven’t even heard of her breakthrough in “The Officer’s Wife”, 
her scandalous hit “The Sailor’s Mistress” is at best a historical curiosity. A ridiculous 
exaggeration of her time. She is forgotten, out of date, what use is a beautiful dress to 
her, there’s nowhere to go! But above the shimmering surface of the water, chandeliers 
are still being lit. Everything is still ahead, piccolos, her favourite instruments, and lively 
fanfare, with their grandiose sound! Thunderous timpani roll, the sound of water rushing 
in Nadja’s ears like a frenzy, life, ovations, burning, burning tributes. She resurfaces, 
and people, young and beautiful, are once again there with her. A real party is going on, 
it seems to Nadja. The world will probably end soon. 


“No,” says Franticek the Brave, “there are still eight years left.” 


What a pleasant young man, what cheekbones, like a steppe eagle! “Eight years? But 


94 


then everything is still possible!” 


“Yes, everything is possible for this world,” says Franti¢ek the Brave. 


Anni, the younger sister, carefully gives Malin bottled water to drink like a nurse, and 
Khan pulls back the reeds like curtains. He starts talking. Against the backdrop of the 
dark, the lapping body of water, two silhouettes sway. They dance. One wildly, the other 
in the same rhythm, but three times slower. Anni wraps her burning sister in a cocoon of 
dress fabric. Charlotte herself hatched out of there a long time ago. It was forty minutes 
ago when she had the second one. 


She comes out of the darkness to Tereesz and he opens his eyes to her voice. The half- 
naked girl puts the water bottle to the boy’s mouth and says, “Tereesz, hey! You need to 
drink, otherwise you'll get heatstroke. You too,” she calls out behind her, “don’t forget 
to drink water!” The boy takes the bottle and gulps it down, his thirst unquenchable. 
Thus, with the cool water, his desire finally subsides. Blissful chemical peace crushes 
the boy under its weight. Thumbs the same colour as the waistband of her golden shorts, 
absentmindedly, Charlotte Lund moves her newly hatched body in front of him. Head 
slightly tilted back and eyes closed, the girl nods along to the bouncing rhythm of the 
bass drum. She smiles briefly, it’s ringing. Charlotte laughs at her own jokes. This 
breaks Tereesz down; this and the half he secretly took. He hears the tremor of laughter 
kicking in there, in the mystery of someone else’s cerebral cortex. How would it be to 
laugh that laugh? It’s not about anything, it’s not even made up of words anymore, it’s 
long gone, lost to Tereesz. 


Machejek, in school uniform, came down the stairs. How was he supposed to know that 
only complete outcasts wear school uniforms in Vaasa? The guys who scrub the walls. 
He’d only just got here. The eldest Lund went down the stairs, her shoes clicking on the 
stepping stones and the girl’s tenth-grade friend, Handsome Alexander’s mouth kept go- 
ing on beside her. Tereesz went after them to the dinner queue like a shadow. Charlotte 
Lund never goes to the school canteen, she doesn’t eat, and she doesn’t even have a 
metabolism in this world. But Handsome Alexander charmed her. Tereesz Machejek 
from the eighth stood behind Charlotte and poured himself some mors. The girl turned 
around and reached for the mors ladle. Tereesz handed her the ladle. And so it hap- 
pened. 


“You're Charlotte Lund,” Tereesz muttered the girl’s semi-mythical name. 
“And you are?” 
“Tereesz Machejek,” said Tereesz Machejek. And that was that. 


Charlotte’s auburn hair strokes her shoulders as the girl shakes her head to the rhythm 
of the music. She raises her hands above her head, fingertips touching in the air, and 
beneath her collarbones are small, bare breasts taut and tanning lines white. She laughs: 
“Got it, Tereesz Machejek!” and then shakes her head happily from side to side. “I got 
it. Just. Got it!” There in the sand where Tereesz Machejek kneels, the girl peels off 
one dark blue sock with her foot. And when the girl crouches in front of him, Tereesz 
Machejek says, “I got it too.” Warm and cold waves crash above them. Between two 
pale thighs, the gold of her panty sparkles, which Tereesz looks at. Selflessly, with the 
innocence of a child. Just, you know... it’s nice to look at. They collapse on top of each 
other like houses made of matches, free of desires. Just for the sake of playfulness. 


95 


Khan, Tereesz and the crazy Suru rally driver are looking out, with their heads up, as 
the Pale approaches from behind the house. Inside, the bass drum thumps heavily, and 
outside, behind the silhouette of the building, a blackish grove of alders rolls up to the 
sky across the entire visible horizon. Like a wave, the Pale rises vertically from the 
spruce forests and mountain ranges above the world’s expanse. Its horror slowly shifts, 
thundering over the world, but the world is made of matter, and matter is evergreen, 
ancient; it must maintain its eerie dignity even at the moment of disappearance, smiling 
grandly, fondly, as Franti¢ek the Brave once smiled behind the dumpster. The peaks of 
the mountains darken silently, clearings expand, and their frosted spruce fields sparkle 
under the stars. 


“I’m not K. Voronikin or anything, but...” Tereesz puffs in the cabin of the car. He rum- 
mages on the seat there. Khan stands outside, leaning on the car, taking a snuff from 
Kenni. 


“But?” 


Tereesz crawls out of the machine backwards, with a bottle of flavoured berry wine in 
his hand. “But it seems to me that in half an hour, it will all be under the Pale, Khan.” 


“Ettd mitd? Mitd se sanoi?”'° 
“Nothing, Kenni. I wouldn’t listen to him. He’s not K. Voronikin or anything.” 


Tereesz twists the cork off the flavoured berry wine with a snap and brings the bottle to 
his mouth. He’d better not say anything more. 


“This is an oceanographic myth. The killer wave,” points little Khan towards the body 
of water. All four of them look, safely wrapped in a beach blanket. In the darkness, 
insects buzz around the gas lanterns. “For a long time, it was just that - a myth, a 
seafarer’s tale. Arda even has a mythological name for it: ‘halderdingr’. But now they 
are scientifically documented phenomena, they really exist, you know? It explains the 
tens, hundreds of ships that have disappeared without a trace. They’re also called ‘rogue 
waves’, ‘Draupner waves’, and my favourite - ‘freak waves’. They seem to come out of 
nowhere and are significantly higher than the rest of the waves. So a killer wave can 
also be relatively small. But, for example, when there’s a ten-meter wave, they’re the 
highest scientifically measured wave in the world. Oh, I’ve seen documentary footage 
of them!” Khan shakes his chin, demonstrating the exciting incredulity of the footage. 
“Footage was even taken from a Mesque ocean drilling rig. You can’t imagine what a 
monster it is!” Khan feels his tongue and mind working in perfect unison. Everything 
comes out perfectly. His tongue was once incompetent, his mind disjointed, but not now! 
If only it would remain so forever. He has forgotten his hand in mid-air. It still shows 
the awe-inspiring height of a killer wave that forms from a ten-meter wave. 


Malin watches it hanging in the sky. A sudden surge of interest saves her from the grip 
of her own body. She now knows what she needs. She needs to take more. Just a little 
bit, and then everything will start again. But stronger. The girl’s mouth opens slightly, 
as she eagerly gulps water from the bottle. The water sparkles on her lips. “Where do 
they come from?” 


“Tt’s maths, right?” Jesper sits with his hand on his cheek. “Some sort of mathematical 
formula explains it, right?” 


10(Finnish orig.) “That what? What did he say?” 


96 


“Exactly!” answers Khan. “Nonlinear effect. I’m not even going to pretend I know what it 
is, but anyway! It turns out that a killer wave can form from any number of smaller waves, 
based on a certain formula. If they move on a large body of water, like the ocean, there’s 
a chance that at some point an almost vertical, extremely unstable monster wave will be 
born from them. It sucks in the movement energy of the other waves, the water becomes 
calmer around it. Regular waves turn into ripples, and the killer wave collapses under 
its abnormal weight. But before that, it can, I don’t know, sow enormous destruction if 
you'll allow me...” Khan finishes with a grand gesture: “And you know where they occur 
most frequently in the world? Here. The phenomenon is called the North Sea Autumn 
Wave.” 


“Holy shit,” Anni bursts out laughing, her foul mouth showing. The girl’s pupils have 
long since turned black with mydriasis. She looks out at the water through the reeds, 
where - to little Anni’s mind - a totally screwed up killer wave could rise at any moment. 
But then Tereesz comes, with Charlotte. 


“And you know what’s most screwed up about it?” Khan asks slyly. He wipes his glasses 
and then puts them back on. His almond-shaped eyes are squinting in the magnifying 
glass, up to the point of pop-science mystery: “The same effect - don’t ask me how, I 
don’t know - but the same nonlinear effect explains the Pale. They use it in entroponetics. 
This is how the Pale behaves when it sweeps over the world.” 


“Like carriage wheels,” says Charlotte, looking into the boy’s eyes. “You’ve got it. By 
the way, Khan, if I may say?” 


“Yes, you may say,” nods young Inayat. 


“You're extremely smart for your age.” Charlotte’s voice is genuinely sincere. Khan feels 
crowned by her compliment. 


“And you have a very, very good posture,” he replies and she laughs heartily. 


The crossfire of respect and affection roars like an ocean, everything wavers, and flickers 
like a flame, and in the middle of it, Anni suddenly raises her head. Nimble like an otter, 
she moves, neck craned, as if searching for something. “Wait, wait,” she says, “is there 
no more water?” Jesper doesn’t notice how Anni’s gaze hints at him, and how everyone 
waits for him. He is still staring out at the sea, enchanted, his white sailor’s hat on his 
head. He doesn’t feel anything special, he’s relatively sober, just hot. It’s all a slight 
disappointment for Jesper. Didn’t even get to make out. But killer waves - not too 
shabby. 


A man in a wetsuit gasps for breath as he surfaces. He spits out the icy water from his 
mouth and rolls onto his stomach on the surfboard. A solitary black dot named Jesper 
bobs half a kilometre from the shore, at the mercy of the waves. He checks the stopwatch 
on his wrist. Another fifteen minutes and he will reach his critical body temperature. 
He needs to rest. Jesper tries to relax his muscles trembling from lactic acid. He looks 
behind him where the strip of pine trees marking Charlottesjal is visible, and above, the 
giant clouds in the fading sky slowly converge. The board rises and falls with the rhythm 
of the water and his breath. Everything suddenly becomes so quiet. Where have all my 
waves gone? 


“Still and always those five famous, terrible, last words: 
Why did you leave me here? 


I'll stick to myself, I’ll cry, to every god like a wave: 


97 


Will you stay this time? Will you stay this time? 
Will you stay this time, or what?” 


A terrible roar is approaching. Jesper stands up on the surfboard, pulls the rubber mask 
to the back of his head, and looks with a blond strand of hair on his face. Against the 
backdrop of the tiny point of his surfboard, a huge wave rises, a dark grey frothy wall. 
Like a cell membrane. It rises vertically, the crest of foam obscuring the sky from Jesper’s 
view, and droplets flying. The swelling cliff of the wave lifts the surfboard on its foam. 
The famous interior designer paddles with all his might on it. He tries to turn himself 
and go with the wave. 


But the halderdingr moves at an enormous speed. 


“Too bad,” sighs Anni generously. “You deserve to feel good too.” They stand on the 
asphalt road under a streetlamp, and from where the asphalt crumbles into the sand, 
the large Charlottesjal beach begins. Forty-five minutes of forest darkness and eager 
chatter are behind them. It was so nice to talk, just the two of them. 


Jesper holds a dark red water pump and pumps it. The water sings as the container fills. 
“Well, I don’t feel bad, it’s nice to talk to you, and the others look very happy too. And 
there’s something there, I guess. But Khan talks like he’s got some heavenly peace and 
Malin...” 


“Malin is grilling,” interrupts Anni. 


“Right. That’s probably the right word,” Jesper puts a cork on the two water bottles. 
After putting them in his pocket, he looks at Anni questioningly. Bugs are desperately 
throwing themselves at the streetlight, and the girl’s bare feet are rubbing together 
underneath it. She holds a gas lantern in her hand. The electric light makes the fine hairs 
on her bare legs shine. Jesper is prompted to ask by that smile, like an idea spreading 
across Anni’s face. 


“T know!” she says. “You’re more like a nose boy anyway. With all your talk about 
perfumes.” 


Jesper squats in front of the girl on the asphalt, and a single tablet sparkles in the mirror 
of her wallet. 


“We're going to need a mortar, some hard stuff,” the girl says, and when Jesper returns 
excitedly with his stone, she already has an eyeshadow palette in her hand. 


“Thank you so much anyway!” Anni carefully breaks the pill’s powdery surface with a 
mirror and grinds the pieces into a soft raspberry-coloured powder. She licks the edge 
of the container with her tongue and then cautiously takes out a five-real bill from her 
wallet. Jesper watches this ritual with fascination. He watches as Anni folds the black 
banknote in the middle and uses it to separate the powder into lines on the mirror. There 
they run, parallel like rails. The five-real bill rolls into a small tube between the girl’s 
fingers. 


“Now, you close one nostril - like this - with your finger and put the other one in,” she 
demonstrates the little tube to Jesper. “And then, take a deep breath and snort the entire 
line into your nose. Let me show you!” Anni-Elin Lund is kneeling in front of a water 
pump under a street lamp. The asphalt sparkles and the petite girl bends over the mirror. 
Jesper, dressed in a white sailor suit, watches as she snorts the line into her nostril with 
determination. The entire powder disappears into the paper roll in one quick moment. 


98 


It all seems absolutely magical to Jesper. Anni shakes her head, moaning, and hands 
him the banknote. “It stings a little, but it feels good. It kicks in faster too. But it lasts 
less. Do it!” 


And Jesper does it. The drug powder rushes through the black tube of the banknote 
and curves. The crystals crush capillaries, and his nostrils itch and tingle. And then, 
when Jesper stands up, everything is so quiet and beautiful. They go down to the forest 
together, the gas lamp rustling in Anni’s hand and casting long, moving shadows on the 
tree trunks in the dark of the dunes. 


Jesper pushes himself up from his stomach onto the board with a fluid motion. The sound 
of water is roaring behind him and the interior designer kicks the board keel with his 
heel. In one moment, the obstacle becomes minimal, everything is perfect, and he glides 
through the water. The board no longer touches the water, it hovers on a vibrating air 
cushion. Zigzagging, Jesper surfs down and up the steep slope, back to the crest of 
the wave. Behind him, he can hear the wave breaking, collapsing under its own weight. 
A huge shimmering curtain of water falls and pulls him inside. Jesper allows it, falls 
behind, and enters the dimness of the tube, where the world, which exists only for a 
short period of time, achieves stability in its collapse. The wave collapse is a permanent 
environment, a murky almond-shaped cavity in the raging whirlpool of water. Inside, it 
is smooth and quiet. If only this could last forever, it would be the summer of fifty-two. 


The summer of fifty-two is an object collapsing forever, eating him alive. Something is 
terribly wrong with this cluster of memories. Terribly wrong. It seems impossible to 
go on, the world does not support him. But here, for ten seconds, everything stabilises. 
Jesper strokes the wall of water and his mouth, red from the cold, always says, “Please!” 


In the courtyard where the wheels of the car have drawn a loop in the snow, Inayat Khan 
looks back with his head up and the farmhouse hovers over him like a ghost. The entrails 
of electric wires hang out of the rotating object, black against the expanse of the starry 
sky. He drifts towards the Pale with a self-evident calmness. High above, the trail of 
furniture and fallen foundation remains behind him. In front of him in the courtyard, 
Khan sees Tereesz and Kenni stumbling after the object, heads down, until they reach 
the wooden fence. 


In a strange panic-free worry, they all look towards Ulv’s shack. It seems like any slight 
creak comes from there, from its limestone foundation. It’s about to rise. But nothing 
happens. The Pale freezes in place far away behind the house, the sound of the forest 
subsides, and the music inside the farmhouse falls silent. Somewhere in the perceived 
distance, on the frozen edge of the Pale, the farmhouse falls apart and disappears. Ulv, 
sweating profusely, comes to the door and lights a menthol cigarette. He’s taken off his 
sweatshirt. The young man stands there, framed by the doorway, in his sweatpants and 
silver tank top, exhaling steam and sweat droplets flying off him. Then, as Tereesz and 
Khan hurry towards him, the man suddenly looks back and startles. 


“Take it!” Ulv shouts, running towards them with envelopes in his hand. He waves his 
hand in an approximate direction towards the Pale and hands the papers to Khan: “You 
have to go! Now!” 


The sound of the engine starting can be heard and the wheels of the car spin in the snow. 
The massive structure can no longer bear its phantom weight. It breaks. The expanse of 
the logging area sinks beneath it ina moment, exploding in powder snow, and a landslide 


99 


as a shock wave passes over the world. Spruces bend under the impact, the Pale slams 
open the windows of the old dilapidated manor house. It curves around the edges of 
the house, as if hesitating for a moment, and then collapses around it. The Pale engulfs 
the manor in its bosom, and somewhere inside, in a low-ceilinged hall, a young man 
puts on his headphones. He reads the sweeping Pale like a magnetic tape in a Stereo 8. 
The only sign of life in the lifeless tableau of the Lund children is the eerie, impossible 
memory of someone named Jesper. The Pale sweeps over the fields on either side of the 
village road. Its avalanche crashes into the gravel, a bubbling wall approaching, turning 
raspberry-red in the glow of the motor car’s taillights. 


The chained wheels squeal on the gravel. “Menee-menee-menee-menee!”'' screams 
the crazy rally driver to the machine as if commanding a horse. He already has his 
foot heavily on the gas pedal, as if the cart would go faster from it. And looking at the 
speedometer, it seems that it does! Tereesz watches the arrow in the yellowish light of 
the speedometer, which jumps to two hundred. Khan next to him sees the Pale. It moves 
slowly, but surely over the windows. The interior electric lighting dims because of it. 
The man’s glasses get foggy, he has sunk deep into the leather seat from the speed and 
presses two envelopes against his heart. His eyes become moist with joy from behind 
his foggy glasses, but Tereesz cannot hear him over the loud engine roar. 


“T was right, Tereesz, I was always right,” he says, but Tereesz doesn’t hear him. The 
engine is too loud. 


Jesper and Anni are coming through the tall grass with a gas lantern. Jesper is holding 
both the lantern and a water bottle, while Anni is only holding her shirt. In the glow 
of the flickering flame, Jesper is examining the birthmarks on her back. Only the thin 
straps of Anni’s bra still hide them. As the rustling grass brushes against their legs, 
Jesper enjoys the sensation on his bare skin. Thirsty, he takes a sip of water from the 
bottle and exclaims, “This is divine! Divine water! They should bottle it up and sell it!” 


Joyful shouts from the beach greet them as they approach. Everyone embraces each 
other. Anni wipes off the lipstick from Jesper’s lips under the light of the gas lantern 
and laughs. Khan is riding piggyback on Tereesz, pretending that Tereesz is a robot. He 
turns his friend’s head, making robot noises and guiding him wherever he wants. Then, 
when robot-Tereesz has been led knee-deep into the water, Khan drops down. He lingers 
for a moment admiring the jellyfish, but the others have already started running towards 
the water in their swimsuits. 


The little glowing bodies disappear into the darkness of the water. The sand shifts be- 
neath their bare feet, while the soft water washes around their ankles. Their hypersen- 
sitive bodies react to every touch. Sand explosions burst between Anni’s toes, making 
her curl them up in pleasure and step forward cautiously. They all move very slowly, 
their hands hovering over the cool surface of the water. They shriek occasionally, spar- 
ing every moment of their sneaking ecstasy. And the salve itself receives them, flowing 
around their hips and bellies. It is cool and perfectly viscous. Malin can’t take it. When 
the water moistens her breasts and armpits, the girl sinks entirely into it. Only the hymn 
of surrender remains on the surface of the sea. She digs her nails into her palms, feeling 
how they snap immediately. It doesn’t fit inside her. Hormones are already distorting 
her sliding body, the pelvic basin has expanded into a birth canal, and unbearable well- 
being throbs deep in her hips. In the grave of her body fluids, a tiny homunculus closes 
its needle-sized eyes. The creature curled up in a half-circle, opens its mouth to scream. 


"(Finnish orig.) “Go-go-go-go!” 


100 


But nothing is heard, not a single sound, it has never been here. Malin relaxes, every- 
thing is impossibly good, everything blackens and echoes there, in the depths of the 
water. Charlotte’s glowing white shadow slides past her, she feels someone’s soft hands 
on her shoulders. It’s Khan. He lifts the girl to the surface. Malin inhales salty air and 
remains floating there. Water drips from her hair and above, in the black sky, stars 
shimmer infinitely detailed with milk splashes. 


All six of them bow their heads and sway like that, in a semicircle. And in the black 
mirror of the water, stars shine back at them. They shimmer weakly, widely. Only Inayat 
Khan’s glasses reflect all their brilliant sharpness. 


“They’re not there anymore,” Khan hears the voice weakening in his hands. He looks 
down, the stars slip off his glasses. In the place of the stars, Malin Lund’s eyes shift, and 
the darkness of her open mouth moves in every word: “But I still see them.” 


And then, when they woke up in the reeds in the morning, like kittens in a nest, they 
picked up the garbage properly. They put on the clothes that had dried in the sun, in 
its dazzling bright light. Their eyes hurt and the world around them seemed friendly 
yet strange. Everything had been said yesterday, in the darkness of the night, there 
was no need to repeat it in the daylight. They awkwardly smiled and exchanged tired 
bits of conversation as they walked to the tram stop. There, they agreed to meet in the 
last week of August when the girls would be back from their family trip to Graad. They 
couldn’t specify the exact day, they would call and send postcards. At the end-of-August 
meeting, they planned to discuss what the changed situation at school would look like 
and generally about the real world. 


They didn’t kiss or anything like that at the stop. However, there were many looks loaded 
with farewell regret and physical secret messages exchanged. The girls got on the tram 
and the boys went to Tereesz’s father’s summer cottage. That was the last time they saw 
each other. 


101 


14. LIST OF ABSENTEES 


Twenty years later, near Vaasa, a crowd of refugees stands in a traffic jam. The sixty 
million square kilometres of the land mass of Katla isola has just lost six per cent of its 
total area, a lit-up billboard above the motor carriage announces “All lines for entry”. 
The red river of taillights shimmers in the autumn night, and somewhere in the middle 
of it, in a giant traffic jam, stands the machine in which Tereesz Machejek has long been 
sleeping. Steam rises from under the hood, and the radial splatters of mud curve around 
the car’s body; the nickel tips of motor components gleam from under the black plates 
of the casing. Even Inayat Khan has curled up in the cabin, but he’s not yet asleep. He 
savours every passing moment, precisely because he’s dead tired. The seat’s leather 
creaks under his weight and the sound of news-gathering airships can be heard in the 
sweet slumber. The rotors beat safely in the distance, and the dark vortex of sleep 
invites and swirls. Khan moves in and out of consciousness as he pleases. Sometimes 
the machine jolts and moves a few meters. Then he opens his eyes from his daze and 
sees Kenni passing by. The crazy Suru rally driver talks to other drivers and scrapes frost 
from the windshield. At this moment, Khan knows that he will miss it all. He already 
misses it - the headlights’ diamonds, the taillights’ bloody glow in the exhaust fumes, 
the knowledge that everything will be all right. 


It was twenty years ago when he last felt like this. Full of possibilities. Back when they 
were waiting together for the girls to return from Graad. Outside in the world, behind 
his pinned-shut eyelids, the kingdom of God begins. He presses his hand to his chest 
and embraces his invisible partner. All those spaces, the expanses out there in the boggy 
fields and by the roadside, are possibilities. Opportunities for gatherings. Conversations 
branch out, as they always do, in the darkness of Khan’s mind’s office. Malin Lund walks 
there with him, nodding, listening, and asking questions. Laughs at his jokes, for the 
twentieth year. They sit down on the side of the highway, she doesn’t mind. The girl’s 
body is untouched by time, she still looks like a child, but her spirit has moved on with 
Khan. Grown-up, become an adult. She is poised now, mysterious and sad. 


Two months went by, but the meeting at the end of August never happened. Even though 
the girls returned to Vaasa on the fifteenth of August, they never called. Why this was, 
and why they went to Charlottesjal beach three times in that period, remains a mystery. 


The afternoon sun painted the curtain’s stripes on the walls. In the big room of Tereesz’s 
father’s cottage, the air was still, something was rising, stifling his breathing. The vac- 
uum, it was a sense of loss, a terrible, terrible worry. After weeks of waiting by the 
phone, they finally decided to call the girls themselves. The three of them were stand- 
ing in a large room. Tereesz put the phone down. Khan beside him was impervious: 
“What happened? They weren’t at home or...?” 


“The mother picked up,” Tereesz slumps back in the armchair. “She said they were at 
the beach.” 


“Where at the beach?” 
“In Charlottesjal.” 
“What? So why didn’t they call?” 


“T don’t know, something’s wrong... 


102 


And that’s when the argument happened. The one Tereesz fought Jesper for two days 
later. He wanted to run down to the beach, Khan already tied his shoelaces, but only 
Jesper still thought that this way wasn’t cool enough. They should wait, let them call 
first. And so it was, and fifteen minutes later, at one o’clock, Agnetha, the ice cream 
saleswoman, was the last living person to see the Lund children. It was the twenty- 
eighth of August - International Day of the Missing. 


Since that day, they weren’t “cool” anymore. He tries not to use the word, it sounds like 
an accusation. Drenched and gasping for air, the interior designer sinks back into the 
sand. Hypothermia. It smells like rotting reeds; rushes and grass lie against the ground 
in the breeze. He is thirty-four years old. He hits the wet sand with his heels. How and 
why he endured, he does not know. If his joints were cramped from the cold, why didn’t 
he roll himself off the board into the sea? Or when the wave crashed on itself, why didn’t 
he stay? 


Above, in the dark sky of an autumn night, masses of clouds sink into each other. Slowly. 
He grabs the top of his head with both hands and squeezes. The mouth, blue with cold, 
opens slowly, the airways shudder, and the stomach ripples in contractions. His heels 
dig into the sand and his fists twitch, but nothing changes. He remembers everything. 
A fifty-second year stands still inside his skull, a haunting, impossible museum exhibit, 
a replica of a lost world. The smell is ever sweeter and always the same, an irrefutable 
fact whose seriousness cannot be overstated: there is no going back. 


In his dream, he hears the sound of hooves approaching, they are coming, on the black 
asphalt. Jesper! Khan wants to call him and tell him to get ready! This is the real 
deal. But there is no phone booth here, and in the kingdom of heaven it is dark, and 
mounted police are checking the rows between the machines. A nightmare silhouette 
stops behind the window glass. Khan opens his eyes. Steam rises from the horse’s 
nostrils as it snorts, its wet black eyes gleaming in half-sleep against the man. An officer 
on horseback directs a beam of light through the frosty window glass into the cabin and 
then moves on. The sound of iron echoes on the asphalt, the horse recedes, and Khan 
closes his eyes and falls asleep again. His hands are frozen in an embrace on his chest. 


When they finally fell asleep, Khan heard a terrible voice in his sleep. It was on the night 
of the twenty-eighth of August, the same day, and with that voice, terror descended upon 
the land. At first, he heard it in his dream, how it moved closer and closer and cried out, 
at regular intervals: 


“Maj! 

Anni! 
Malin! 
Charlotte!” 


The boy woke up in the second-floor bedroom. He looked into Tereesz’s eyes wide with 
fear, his friend standing over him and shaking him. Khan was fully awake now, but the 
world’s most feared list of absentees was still being shouted. It continued outside, in 
Charlottesjal. Not in his dream, but in the real world. The blood clotted in Khan’s veins. 
“Can you hear it too?” 


“Yes,” Tereesz replied. 


They woke Jesper up. They put on their jackets and ran outside. It was cold, and for the 
first time this year, the smell of autumn floated in the air. They stopped in the garden 


103 


and listened. The names echoed in the woods with the barking of the dogs. They ran 
through the apple orchard, past the gooseberry bushes, on into the darkness of the pines. 
Flashlights and flares flickered there. 


They were search parties. 


By the end of the fourth day, the volunteers were dispersed. Hundreds of people had 
come to help in some way, to share the concern. Thousands of calls came in to the 
special hotline. Appeals were made and programmes were initiated. The press and 
radio jumped into action, and the next morning the girls’ pictures were on the front 
pages. Headlines used the most horrendous sentimentality: “Mother in distress: chil- 
dren, please come home!” Opinion columns discussed the possibility of restoring the 
death penalty, as paranoia mixed with the desire for revenge: “Who abducted the chil- 
dren from their mother?” This outpouring of compassion in which the boys’ own loss 
was completely lost - all the wailing and gnashing of teeth - they felt powerless in the 
midst of it, it humiliated them. At first, it was just a hunch, now Jesper can put his in- 
dignation into words. A tantalising curiosity. Somewhere underneath all that frothing, 
the salacious bourgeois saw, with his own sweet horror, all the things that were done to 
the girls. Behind the blinds, where Per-Jonas dared not look directly, he peeped through 
a newspaper article. He saw himself there, he was the Man, he was eating a meat pie 
in oil batter and he liked what he saw. But then, as the pre-teen Jesper looked at his 
classmates, it was an indescribable mystery, an alien realm of bodies. The arch of the 
back, an exposed arm, the smallest bit was enough. To this day, he hates adult sexuality. 
For him, it is a debauched fastidiousness. Realistically, and paradoxically, it makes him 
a paedophile. 


Just as the epitome of good taste enters the lobby of Havsanglar in a wetsuit, the re- 
ceptionist puts the phone down. The renowned interior designer arrives in the middle 
of the night, dripping, leaving sandy footprints on the carpet. The gentleman looks so 
miserable, frozen half to death, that the woman forgets the phone call and rushes to 
wrap him in a towel. 


“No, I don’t need an ambulance,” Jesper waves his hand and grits his teeth. “Don’t want 
tea, don’t want tea! I don’t want the blackcurrant tea either!” He calls for the elevator 
and presses the button with a numb, frozen finger, even though it’s long since on fire. 
“No, I don’t want to, I’m going for a bath, a hot bath.” 


“Monsieur de la Guardie,” the woman remembers at the last moment. She sticks a shoe 
between the closing elevator doors, “You had a phone call, someone called Olle...” 


“At night? What about?” 


“A newspaper ad.” 


Volunteers were sent home and, after the search parties, so went the rest. The pine 
forests remained quiet in autumn, the boys lumbered through them. The bloodhounds 
barked no more, and no border patrol boats wandered the bay. And everywhere they 
went, it was as if the void itself, its spirit, had been released. Everything hung still, 
useless: the changing cabins, the sparse half-empty beach. At the tram stop, the trams 
rolled empty, then half empty again, the doors slamming shut and opening. The last to 
go were the ill-fated divers, three weeks later. And so they saw the long surrender begin 
all around them. What it meant they knew very well, though they never dared to say 


104 


the word to each other. Together they thought up the most fantastic plans. Thrilling 
triumphs, comebacks together. 


The school year had officially begun a month ago, and it was the parents’ joint decision 
to send them back to school. There, waiting for them, were photos of the girls, flowers 
and storm lanterns on the stairs. In the school corridor, too, the fake sorrow waved. 
Everyone had somehow known them, everyone fought for attention and compared their 
losses. There, too, they disappeared. They didn’t dare tell anyone what had happened 
over the summer. Finally, they poured their hearts out to the female officer when she 
was at school, and as a result, Zygismunt Berg - a boy who by then was a “well-known 
figure” to the youth police - was among the more than 200 people interrogated. The 
treachery bore no fruit and when the female officer went to talk to the headmaster at 
the end of November, the three of them broke out of class. The corridor echoed with the 
sound of their shoes. She was their only link to the investigation, that heartless instance. 
They stopped her at the door and begged until the poor woman had no choice. 


“We have to get used to the idea that the girls are dead,” she said. 


Pictures and storm lanterns were collected from the school stairs, the death penalty was 
not reintroduced. Even Vidkun Hird was sentenced to life. A year after the disappear- 
ance, he was arrested on suspicion of similar crimes and the press rushed to link it all 
to the Lund children. The old master himself also dropped hints to that effect. About 
puppies who wandered too far from their mother and other such heraldic references. 
When the three of them got together, that was all they could talk about. That, or some 
other topic that the media had fed them; if not the Hird or the recently released list of 
sex offenders, then the letter sent to Karl and Ann-Margret Lund two years after their 
disappearance, the details of the handwriting analysis, or, for example, the psychic who 
claimed that the girls’ bodies were buried under the foundations of the Ringhalle ice 
hockey stadium. As the articles became less frequent, the meetings became so hopeless 
that each of the boys tried to avoid them in his own way. Jesper secretly went surfing and 
played sports. In tenth grade, Khan failed for the first time and dropped out of school; 
at the beginning of eleventh, Tereesz went back to Graad. 


The media had lost all interest in the Lund girls fifteen years later. The investigation had 
long since been stalled, and the lead inspectors had retired. There was no reason to meet 
again, they retreated to their personal lives. Jesper found himself an underage lingerie 
model and pretended not to recognise Khan, who was sitting behind a restaurant table 
wearing a bright blue tie. Tereesz visited Charlottesjal alone every year. He didn’t call 
anyone else. And Khan completely sunk into the world of disappearance cases, sitting 
in his mother’s basement toggling on the lights of an airship that had gone missing a 
century and a half ago. Endlessly. 


“Get used to your own fucking thoughts.” 


The End of the World. The dark arches of the mast stations loom over the city entrance. 
Barriers rise. Customs officers’ vests and stripes glow lemon-yellow on the barriers. 
The motor carriage starts, and everything moves evenly, and smoothly. In the leather- 
seat-scented rustle of the radio, they talk about an atomic weapon that was dropped 
on Revachol three hours ago. Khan feels warm, and the female announcer’s voice is 
calm and beautiful. The rows of streetlights rise above the road, crowned with frost, 
they glide under the dark blue sky of the morning. He drifts along with them to his 
hometown, where he will leave tomorrow night. One task remains. The lanterns fade. 
Khan watches as the ghosts of the buildings come out into the light of dawn. 


105 


The bedroom smells of lilies. Outside, beyond the window of the country house, the 
bare chestnut trees sway their bony branches in the breeze. She wakes up early in the 
morning and leaves her husband, who is wearing an eye mask, sleeping in bed. She is 
fifty-two years old, with fine facial features and laugh lines that look like tired chicken 
feet; her dark green eyes under her eyelids give no hint. She goes downstairs in her 
morning gown, holding onto the wooden handrail, and makes herself coffee. In the cool 
rooms of the wooden house, the lights are out in the spacious kitchen. She likes these 
blue hours, when the house is quiet, so you can hear the field mice scratching under the 
floor. Her delicate, sharp fingers push down on the button of the French press. Even the 
smell of mould rising from the floorboards has come to please her over time, although it 
scared her so much at first - seventeen years ago when she came to live here. And the 
silence! Everything is so quiet in the countryside, but over time, even the absence of 
noise became a kind of blessing. She crosses the large room, over the cold floorboards, 
and around it the furniture shines in the dim light; the elegance of the fifties, the colour 
peeling from the wood. Next to the door, she pulls her husband’s coat over her shoulders 
and steps into his shoes. Like this, with her grey hair swept up in a simple manner, she 
comes out onto the porch. 


The autumn chilly air makes the coffee cup steam in the woman’s hand, she pauses for 
a moment, takes a breath, and then takes a seat on the wooden garden furniture she 
chose herself. And then, with her leg over her knee, Ann-Margret Lund smokes her first 
cigarette of the day. She watches the light, the sun rising through the morning mist. 
In the well-tended garden in front of her, details emerge from the mist, the glass of the 
greenhouse gleams, and the lawn needs tidying. This will be her first duty of the day. She 
extinguishes her cigarette in an upside-down flowerpot ashtray and heads back inside. 


Children of beautiful parents are beautiful, children of ugly parents are ugly. In the 
shower downstairs, Ann-Margret moisturises her still-beautiful body. It wasn’t always 
like this, at first she was thin and bony like a scarecrow. She was still a tomboy then, 
climbing over planks and up trees with the boys. Then the female sex hormones kicked 
in and wove a new body around her. An object of admiration of adipose tissue and curves. 
Slowly, she mastered its subtleties; graduated, taught, fell in love, and gave birth to three 
daughters. Three years in a row, one every year. They left her like beads on a string. 
And the body recovered, young as she was. It made her girlfriends envious, the way she 
slept in her husband’s arms, unashamed. But later, when she joined the party, another 
came, the youngest. The man loved her, and so he was not dismayed when the last one 
permanently disfigured her. While the force of gravity prevailed in its domain, reason 
rose high - in the ministry, in the office. But now Ann-Margret Lund stands in front 
of the mirror, and although her skin has lost some of its elasticity and colour, her hips 
are narrow and her thighs slim once again. Everything has tightened up again, but this 
time she feels a sense of unease rather than relief in her body. Even though the feeling 
of absence, silence, peace, and the smell of mould in her new hideaway overcame her, 
it secretly became a part of her. She is emptiness. But then, when she faces it, Ann- 
Margret still feels afraid. As if all this womanhood has somehow disappeared. She tries 
not to think about it, quickly dries herself off, covers herself in beige day clothes, and 
goes. 


The woman is raking dried leaves in the garden. When she came to school at the end 
of the first term, the boys watched her in secret. It was the first term without them and 
Ann-Margret came to empty her daughters’ lockers. A circle of respect surrounded her, 
the children moved away. Only Tereesz, Jesper and little Inayat watched from around 
the corner as she loaded her daughters’ trinkets from the previous year into cardboard 
boxes. She rolled up the pop star’s poster and golden stars fell from her hands. None of 


106 


the boys told each other why they had come to spy. But secretly they wanted pats from 
her, to go home with her, and see the girls’ rooms. And then make plans to find them. It 
was a childish longing. They wanted to be important in these matters, and if anyone had 
the power to sanctify them as such, it was the girls’ beautiful mother. It didn’t happen, 
but later they all came anyway, one by one, though they kept it a secret from each other. 
They scouted out the location of her country home and awkwardly expressed sympathy 
for the woman. Then they exchanged news, too, about the investigation, and slowly 
Ann-Margret remembered their names. Although the last time this happened was eight 
years ago. Later, when Tereesz and Khan confessed, Jesper still lied that he had done 
nothing of the sort. 


“It’s a shame,” he said sarcastically. 


Ann-Margret comes back from the bare gooseberry bushes, puts her gardening gloves 
on a nail in the shed and sends her husband to work. Karl Lund still toils away like a 
passionate industrial magnate, even though political instability and the resulting inter- 
national economic crisis are devastating his business; never mind that he actually has 
enough money to retire to wherever he wants, even Stella Maris. The chauffeur picks 
him up at half past eleven, the luxury car wrapped in grey haze on the village road. In 
the yard, Ann-Margret watches the raspberry red of the taillights fade as the man moves 
away from her. 


Along with her husband and the morning ritual, all signs that she once had four blonde, 
green-eyed daughters recede. One had auburn hair and the other rainbow eyes, but 
when she plays the music softly and moves her shoulders to the rhythm, she can’t tell 
which. Then, as the guilt dissolves and daylight comes in through the white lace curtains, 
Ann-Margret Lund feels light, she floats. As if her whole life had been unlived, and all 
the impressions, small dents that a person leaves in the world, had been tapped out to 
the rhythm of music. She moves modestly in the shade of her family tree, from which 
all of the leaves have fallen. She no longer knows that the way she places her upper lip 
on her lower lip, forgetting herself and laughing along with the music, is exactly how 
Charlotte did it. She sweeps the floors, straightens the tablecloths, and makes the rows 
of books on the shelf even. She doesn’t listen to the radio, it means nothing to her. As 
far as Ann-Margret is concerned, the world ended a long time ago and left her here to 
do her domestic chores. 


She sits at the kitchen table, hands in her lap, and watches as the house sparkles. It’s 
half past four, the rooms are quiet and clean. She dozes off occasionally like a cat, her 
greying head nodding at the table. It happened overnight, like Dolores Dei. Twenty 
years ago, on the morning of August 29", she woke up and turned silver. She hears 
music in her dream, light pouring onto her hair through the kitchen window, and in that 
surge of light, it seems golden again for a moment. There’s a knock at the door. Maybe 
Karl left something behind or is coming home early... but then why knock? It just seems 
unlikely that someone would come to visit her. Almost no one comes here anymore and 
she likes it that way. Ann-Margret Lund adjusts her costume, smooths out the wrinkled 
skirt on her lap, puts on a smile, and opens the door. 


“Hello, madam.” 


Three men are standing there, awkward smiles on their faces: one is wearing very ex- 
pensive clothes and smells of a five hundred real aftershave, unable to hide the fever 
that makes his forehead flush; another is standing next to him in a dark orange filmy 
robe, wearing a scarf with an lilmara tricolour; and a third, tall and dashing, is hurrying 
to put out his cigarette. Though the connections are hard to make, she invites the men 
in and watches them standing there in their coats. It is only when he sees the boyish 


107 


timidity with which they stagger from one foot to the other and draw shapes on the floor 
with their shoe tips, that she remembers who they are. It reminds her of the behaviour 
of a young admirer. 


“We've got news,” says Inayat Khan. “I know, no need to get your hopes up, okay? But 
it’s good news, madam.” 


And as the madam leads them into the kitchen, her heart feels pewter-heavy again, and 
her hair gleams in the dim half-light of the kitchen. 


“Coffee? Tea?” 


Five hours ago, Jesper was sitting in the café “Cinema”. In the bright midday light, he 
feels slightly less projected into the space between the glass walls and cube furniture 
than usual. His head and his eyelids are strangely heavy. He wipes his sweating forehead 
with a handkerchief with initials. The interior designer looks worse than usual, pulling 
his sweater over his head. He begins to feel cold again in his dress shirt. Late autumn 
cold seeps through the floor-to-ceiling windows, and a crowd passes by outside. He 
orders himself a green tea with lemon and honey. 


“T think I have a bit of a cold,” he says across the table to a man a few years younger 
than himself. He remembers him well, it’s little Olle. He was four grades below them. 
Jesper mainly remembers him for Olle’s brilliant forging skills. The older boys used his 
golden hand for all sorts of signatures, and the little guy made good money that way. All 
those certificates filled with terrible grades and notebooks full of red marks that needed 
signatures. Now little Olle has grown a big brown moustache, and Jesper draws his own 
conclusions. Olle is a copywriter, and moustaches are back in style. In certain circles. 
Circles where the innocence of nihilism and Saint-Miro’s exotic poetry is appreciated. 
Or at least it was two days ago when the land where both Saint-Miro and old-fashioned 
moustache madness come from had not yet used an atomic bomb on another land. 


“T guess the nihilism trend is over now,” Jesper mentions bluntly. 


Olle agrees vehemently, “I should get rid of the moustache, I know, it came as a total 
bombshell to all of us. Sorry for the expression, we didn’t...” 


“Yeah, yeah, that’s terrible,” Jesper interrupts him halfway through the sentence. “A 
total tragedy. Why did you call me, Olle?” 


“T read the ad and thought for a long time. It wasn’t until the bang went off, you know, 
that I finally felt sorry.” 


“What’s the fuck, Olle? What’s going on? What are you sorry about?” 


The moustached copywriter flinches in front of the suddenly beet-red Jesper. He stares 
him down across the table. As Olle tries to hide his gaze, an albino tiger in the distance 
takes over Jesper’s role. Although the copywriter often comes here to make friends, he 
has never liked the ghastly taxidermy. 


“Wait, I didn’t kill them, I just wrote the letters.” 
“Why in the name of the Lord would you do something like that?” 


“T don’t know,” Olle stutters. “I was young then, I really don’t know why I did that. 
Everyone at school talked about them after it happened. Maybe I just wanted to see 
what would happen. Could they understand that it wasn’t really Malin? One guy, this 


108 


Zigi, brought me Malin’s old notebook and asked me if I could copy the handwriting. It 
looked easy enough and, well, I thought I’d give it a try.” 


“And did you send the letters or did someone else?” 


“Zigi sent them, I just wrote. You know, I’m really embarrassed about it, you have to 
understand that I was young at the time and, well, I thought I was a bit of a nihilist...” 


“And you have nothing else to tell me about it? You don’t know anything about them? 
Even if, for example, I went to the police with this story, you’d have nothing more to 
say?” 


“Unfortunately, no.” It seems that Olle is genuinely sorry as he nervously smoothes his 
moustache, and Jesper stares out of the window to Ostermalm, his eyes glazed with 
fever. A group of people in dark clothes stomps past the window. His mouth reddening, 
he pulls his sweater back on and grabs his coat. 


“Idiot,” he says and leaves. Olle stays behind to pay the bill. When the cheque is brought 
to the table, the albino tiger is still glaring at him. 


“And this is good news?” asks Ann-Margret and shakes the ash off her cigarette, six 
hours later, outside. Plumes of smoke rise from her and Tereesz Machejek’s mouths, 
and a steady light grey light seeps from the sky. She sits with three men on a veranda 
around a wooden table and the breeze blows dark brown leaves to the floor. Jesper, 
having finished his story, feels uncomfortable. But then Khan jumps in: “No, that’s not 
all! But look, what’s remarkable about this is that twenty years later, in the place where 
the world is now, something new is still coming out. Meaning - there’s still time. And I 
have a feeling that right now, that’s why everything is coming out. That something is in 
the air.” 


The former minister sits with her back arched, her leg femininely over her knee. She 
remains dismissively silent, which cools Khan’s enthusiasm. The man takes a sip of his 
coffee. Or rather, pretends to. There’s nothing in it but stretchy sugar. 


Khan continues: “Now I don’t know what you can make of this. I don’t know what to 
make of it.” 


“I, for one, don’t take it very seriously,” Jesper interjects. 


“Anyway,” Khan continues, a little grumpily, “I’ll say it myself right up front that I take it. 
Seriously, Imean. We’ve just come from Lemminkainen, right, a private consultant. He’s 
quite well known, although he keeps a low profile. Self...” Tereesz gives him a warning 
look and Khan continues:” Ulv is his name. Have you heard of him?” 


“T don’t think I have.” 


“People go to him with things they can’t get information about anywhere else. Stuck 
things. He’s been involved in at least twelve death investigations. And he’s always 
helped in some way. Generally, the police don’t exactly boast about it, but Tereesz can 
assure you it’s true.” 


Former agent Machejek nods his head. He can feel her eyes on him, and though he tries 
to behave as one would on the job, trying to be rigidly respectful, and trustworthy, it 
doesn’t work out well. We love the girls, we love them more... He’s so embarrassed by 
his thoughts, before. At first, he tries not to look, then he looks up. For a moment, his 
eyes, of random colour, cross with Ann-Margret’s tired emeralds. “His methods are the 
kind that will not be mentioned later in an official investigation,” Tereesz begins. “It’s a 


109 


tacit agreement. With the prosecutor’s office. Such a thing would give the defence too 
much to grasp.” 


“It’s a kind of para detective, I understand?” Under pressure from the media, the police, 
together with the municipality, finally excavated the entire west wing of Ringhalle. The 
psychic rolled his eyes and kept pointing, but all that came out of the concrete foundation 
was even more concrete foundation. And that’s just one specific case. “I’ve seen my fair 
share of necromancers,” she allows herself a trace of bitterness. 


Tereesz signals Khan to wait. “When I do my job, I don’t do it for the state. I do it for the 
victim.” Talking like this, he forgets himself. His confidence returns, he is again an agent 
of the Collaboration Police, not the leaf in the wind he has made himself out to be. “And 
so, I don’t care where and how the information comes from, as long as it’s productive. 
Admittedly, I haven’t been to this particular private consultant. Unfortunately, he only 
deals with cases where the victim is already dead. But he has an undeniable gift in this 
case. For example, Ulv himself has been a suspect. In eight different cases, he has 
advised. If that sounds authoritative to you - and it does to me, frankly. Completely 
unconnected cases and no evidence has ever been found against him. You understand?” 


The woman thoughtfully puts on a cigarette and then, when Tereesz offers her a light, 
Khan takes the opportunity. He leans across the table and blurts out, “He doesn’t know 
anything about the girls!” 


“And what does that mean?” she’s stumped. 


Khan looks back at her with a broad smile, “He doesn’t know anything about them. He 
has no information about them. A blank page: he doesn’t know where they are, he knows 
nothing about their past, no secrets. But that’s the point! He doesn’t know anything 
because they’re not dead.” 


The woman is secretly horrified, her ladylike posture unchanged. Tereesz notices some- 
thing suspicious in her reaction, but out of great respect, he cannot yet tell what it is. 
“And the same consultant says that?” Ann-Margret looks at him questioningly. Khan 
places a pad of paper in front of her. “These are my notes. About the girls. This is the 
summary I gave him. His notes are at the end. You'll see that these are the exact words 
he uses: ‘Not dead’.” 


Ann-Margret is browsing the papers. All the misery of the world flashes before her eyes 
again, photocopies and dates, a chronology of events. Khan continues: “It’s customary 
to give another envelope for such an occasion. If the accuracy of the first can’t be verified 
- at the moment it’s the girls’, we wouldn’t have a clue on that alone - the accuracy of 
the second proves it. And guess who’s not dead yet?” Khan pulls his second envelope 
out of his pocket and places it on the table. It was only when Tereesz finally saw it that 
he began to seriously consider Khan’s strange experiment. “Zygismunt Berg” is written 
on it. Jesper doesn’t know anything about it yet. He watches, his neck craning curiously. 


“T gave him Zigi.” Khan is on a roll, losing himself, speaking directly to Jesper. The 
connections he draws in the air become increasingly fantastical. How one assertion 
from a para-specialist proves another, dotted lines leading to chaos, a label proudly 
proclaiming, “Axiom!” And then the letters! How they absolutely must figure out what 
became of the slouch in the leather jacket, an arrow jumping to indicate what all could 
come out of it! 


Only Tereesz, who has already heard it, is still watching Ann-Margret’s reaction. There is 
none. The woman is just staring at a page in the girls’ folder. Outside, it is slowly getting 
dark and it’s cold. She has pulled up the collar of her coat and when Tereesz catches 


110 


her eye, she doesn’t respond. She hasn’t been reading for a while, just zoning out, her 
familiar dark green irises standing still. What is that barely perceptible feeling deep 
inside? Tereesz thinks he knows. How her eyes are slightly squinted, the unfamiliarity. 
She remembers. But what? 


The evening is approaching, it’s getting dark, and Khan is burning like a light bulb in the 
middle. All around, in the quiet village, the air is crystal cold. The man leans back on a 
folding chair and wipes his glasses with a triumphant expression. Beside him, Tereesz 
decides to go for the easiest solution, reaches out his hand and takes hold of the edge 
of the folder. She still holds it in her hand, not having managed to turn the page yet. 


“May I?” he asks. 


“Yes, of course,” nods Ann-Margret. As if waking up, she adds, “It’s all very confusing, 
I have to admit...” Meanwhile, as Khan explains how the mother of the children should 
now turn to the police, Tereesz looks at the four photos of the Lund children in the folder. 
Khan has arranged them in a row by age, like beads on a string. 


Ann-Margret closes the garden gates after the departing guests. She waves gently at 
the back window. The taxi rolls along the gravel road, it’s no longer Kenni at the wheel. 
Kenni has long gone to his own Kenni world, to do Kenni things. They’re forty kilometres 
from Vaasa, and the white country house among the chestnut trees can’t be left behind 
fast enough. Secretly, they all feel a sense of relief when they leave. Somehow embar- 
rassed too. No one can say anything, the gravel crunches under the wheels. In the end, 
Khan tries anyway: “She, like... didn’t seem very happy. Or so.” 


Jesper blows his nose: “I had this daft idea myself.” 


“So what do you think we should have done? Not tell her, let her figure it out for herself, 
like what was up with those letters?” 


“Yeah, yeah! They’re not dead, Mrs. Lund, your children are alive, alive children! You 
couldn’t just let her guess at that, could you? She had to have the mystery solved.” 


For a little while longer, they sit quietly and stare out of the window. Village roads pass 
by, the machine rattles and Tereesz asks the driver if it’s OK to smoke inside. The match 
flickers in the dim light and the cigarette paper crackles in the flame. “Astra” fumes 
waft around the cabin, it smells bitter. After so long in Kenni’s machine, it somehow 
feels treacherous to sit here. 


Khan’s conscience begins to sting: “But maybe we really shouldn’t have done it. What 
if she’s reconciled, and we’ve just irritated her for nothing? What if nothing comes of 
oN 


“You think?” Jesper says sarcastically. “Maybe it was our duty! Rushing into a stranger’s 
home and telling her about her children.” He thinks for a moment, then starts again: “I 
don’t really think so, Khan. I don’t think she’s reconciled or anything. Maybe she’s just 
trying to get on with her life. I’m not a parent, of course.” 


Tereesz pulls an ashtray out of the door. He smokes, in silence. They avoid the network 
of motor carriages and the congestion there. That’s why they drive along village lanes 
between evening fields and forest thickets. Halfway through, he’s on his sixth smoke 
and the cabin is getting stuffy. The former agent is polite, he rolls down the window 
and fresh air comes in, along with a few snowflakes. They float to the edge of the ditch 
outside. The bare bushes whizz by and snow begins to fall over the fields in the distance. 


“She has not reconciled,” says Tereesz. “She has forgotten. I didn’t see any pictures of 
them in that whole house. She was looking at them in that folder of yours, too, as if she 


111 


was trying to remember who they were.” 


Khan shivers from the cold. No one says anything. That means acceptance. There is 
another long pause before Jesper flinches. This is how they let each other know how 
it makes them feel. Rarely do they talk to each other about what they really think. All 
because of the disappearance. It’s because they talked too much in the beginning. So 
much that talking no longer helped. Everything has been said, they have nothing to 
console each other with. That’s why it’s so strange for everyone to hear Jesper say: 
“Sometimes it seems to me that the whole world has forgotten them.” 


“They have,” says Tereesz. 

And Khan says: “Let’s go and find that cocksucker.” 
“Let’s do it today,” says Tereesz. 

Khan then asks, “Where do we go?” 

“To Graad,” says Tereesz. 

And they both look in Jesper’s direction. 


“Davai,” says Jesper. 


With darkness comes a snowstorm. They are driving through the streets of Saalem and 
the city around them freezes. It’s the first time this year. The cold, sweet smell of snow 
permeates the cabin with Khan as he enters with a large suitcase in each hand. Trails 
are left behind in front of the house. His old mother stands in the doorway, shouting 
something, but no one can hear what it is. The machine is already speeding and the 
snow is whirling in the street tunnel outside. It’s snowing the whole time they wait for 
Jesper in front of his house. Two hours. Already it looks as if they might not get on their 
nightly magnet train. White streaks drift into the wind from the fir trees, and a black 
motor carriage is buried under the snow. Finally, Jesper arrives, white suitcase in hand. 


“How did it go?” 
“Well, let’s just say it didn’t go very well,” he replies. “Drive.” 


They drive. Fast. They ask the taxi driver to go faster, but that would be dangerous. The 
wind drives stripes into the headlights, its chaos flying everywhere, on the roads, in the 
orange halos of the streetlights. Tereesz throws money at the driver and leads the way, 
glancing at his watch. He runs across the snowy square, the sound of taxi doors being 
shut behind him. He doesn’t care that Jesper left his things behind at his house. 


Jesper’s only regret is that he didn’t find his hair scrunchie when he left the lingerie 
model. He could have been better. That’s a pity too. He’s running, suitcase in hand, 
snow in his eyes, and all sorts of remarks come to mind: “This fashion thing, with this 
fashion thing, you see, it’s no good any more. This model thing has no future. You’re 
going to take my house, you’re going to live in Vaasa, it’s not safe to travel. It’s time to 
go to work for real.” 


It’s night, but there’s a crowd in front of the elevators. They are shouting, Tereesz flashes 
his fake documents: “Collaboration Police, get out of here!” He’s no longer Somerset 
Ulrich, he’s now Kosmo KontSalovsky. Kosmo is not a missing agent, he is Tereesz’s own 
brainchild. To confuse the trail - no one can follow it. 


Only then, when the jam-packed elevator cabin lifts them up above the city, do the boys 
sit down on their suitcases and catch their breath. The city is buried in snow, and its 


112 


gleam seeps into the exhaust fumes of motor carriages, turning them saturnine green, 
golden, orange... until the darkness of the train station swallows them up. The elevator 
doors open, and they run under the high steel arches of the station building. There, 
too, a night-time crowd awaits them. It is packed everywhere, in the waiting room, in 
front of the ticket counters, even though the display boards show that there are no avail- 
able seats, and the girl with a baby voice from a speaker confirms it. Even the flight to 
Samara, to the SRV, the day after tomorrow, is sold out. Yes! This is the degenerate 
bureaucratic worker state where you want to be. Not to mention that at that very mo- 
ment, in Graad, the irrigation grid disappears, and a tidal wave rises threateningly over 
Yekokataa. Where are you running, stay home, join the army! 


They squeeze themselves out onto the platform. It is snowing under the high night sky, 
and when the conductor stops them there in front of the five-fold slatted door of the 
magnet train carriage, Tereesz does something he never does. Kosmo KontSalovsky’s 
authoritative flashes no longer have any effect on the conductor, numbed by the frenzy of 
the people. The girl with the baby voice announces the imminent departure of the flight 
and asks everyone to step behind the yellow line. Already they can hear the hissing of 
the trains’ hydraulics. Tereesz puts his hand under his jacket and reveals a pistol. The 
leather pouch of the holster hangs under his arm. Mahogany handle firmly in hand, he 
steps through the doors into the luxurious dimness of the train, gun barrel gleaming, and 
the conductor retreats before the service weapon. Behind Tereesz, Khan and Jesper slip 
through the doors. The doors slam shut, the magnets roar, and one of Khan’s suitcases 
is left on the platform. 


Tereesz puts the pistol back in its holster and apologises to the frightened conductor. 
They are not used to such things here in Katla. The ex-agent thanks the woman for her 
cooperation and returns to diplomacy. Outside on the platform, the huge buffers are 
detached from the train. The umbilical cord is cut and, released from the coupling links, 
the train sinks onto the magnets with all its weight. They hum at full power beneath the 
carriages. And then the flight begins. 


The force of the magnet pad makes the North Sea beneath them split in two. It’s quiet 
inside, the generators humming as the train rushes 50 meters above the water. They 
stand together, laughing. Tereesz extinguishes his cigarette in a bronze ashtray, and 
they turn their backs to the windows and leave. Ahead lies the Pale, and beyond that, 
the big world begins. Somewhere there, in its cities, on its streets, in its steppe expanses, 
is Zygismunt Berg, the only person in this world who knows what happened to the Lund 
children. In the windows behind them, in the city, only light pollution remains, a golden 
glow in the distance in the midst of the snowy stormy darkness. 


113 


15. MOULD 


Deerek Trentmoller lies in a catatonic state. The retirement home around him is mute. 
He can’t remember the name of any of the things and none of the connections means 
anything to him. Everything is forgotten. Everything is forgotten. He looks at the whole 
world with the blissful question mark of a child. After two months, a caretaker comes 
into his room and breathes a sigh of relief at the door. He unhooks the cannula from 
the old man’s wrist. The lace from the tree branches slides on the walls, while a motor 
carriage rushes by on the snow-covered street outside. 


The wheels crunch on the snow and inside the warm salon, a well-known minimalist and 
deaf music critic Are Akerlund, Jesper’s colleague from the office days, is roving about. 
His prospects do not seem brilliant. It becomes almost impossible to copy record re- 
views from the West if no new records are made. But Are Akerlund does a lot of cocaine 
and that, as we know, makes you very intelligent. The social climate is different now, 
but consumption as such remains. It means there is still room for advertising. Are Aker- 
lund lays the foundations for what later became the world-famous Ideas Lab in Vaasa, an 
advertising agency that produces ideas for advertisements instead of real advertising. 
Somebody else makes them later. After a few months, the Ideas Lab becomes a mas- 
terpiece of apocalyptic advertising. In the Nordic countries, too, transportation giant 
ZAMM launches an interisolar campaign with the slogan “Escape! It’s not too late.” 


Around that time, or a little later, around the winter solstice, Konrad Gessle’s new docu- 
mentary will go unnoticed by the wider public. Winter is coming, dark and long, and the 
panic-stricken masses are demanding lighter entertainment. Never mind that the direc- 
tor is an eight-time Oscar Zorn nominee. But then, the ecumenical aggressor Mesque 
brings its fleet out of the Pale, manoeuvring far north over the boreal plateau. Black 
smoke rises from it to the sky, under the auroras, in the Graad Holodnaja Zemlja oblast. 
Arda, Vaasa and Suru join Graad, who had declared war on Mesque two months earlier. 
With that, Katla, the world’s frontier land, is caught in the centrifuge. 


The audience numbers for the movie “Vidkun Hird: ‘Vidkun Hird’” are improving. To his 
great sadness, however, Konrad Gessle sees in the cinemas the exact kind of audience he 
feared the most when starting his controversial project. Bad times give a nationalistic 
colour to dissatisfaction, and there sit military youth, fascinated, together with senile 
Nazi grandfathers. None of them understands Gessle’s delicate symbolism, his irony, 
his sense of absurdity. The stupid warriors admire Hird’s blackshirt posing seriously, 
without a hint of irony. What impresses them the most is how the great figure eventually 
collapses under his own superhuman maxims. It seems poetic to them how he talks 
nonsense in his last interviews. The shots of the vegetable-like Hird in his cell move 
them to tears. Finally, it turns out that even his heroic mind could not live by these 
ancient truths. They were too honest, too genuine. As a warrior, Hird pushed himself 
to the limit, without succumbing to diluted cultural influences. That was his triumph, 
hubris, and downfall: truth - it’s just too powerful. 


This is just one of many end-of-the-world absurdities, but it’s the one that makes Sven von 
Fersen think it’s time to come out of the closet. Sven is slowly phasing out of the witty 
management articles, replacing them with “statements of support for the government 
and the armed forces”. Then, as Graad and its Northern allies find themselves on the 
losing side of the world war, the only real confrontation is organised in lilmaraa. Sven 
von Fersen doesn’t want a helping hand from the camel shits: “Before you know it, they'll 
be stabbing you in the back with a scimitar.” 


114 


But in the end, fascism remains where it always has been, on the margins of society, 
between cryptozoology and psionics. The predominant mass of public life is not like Sven 
von Fersen. Their Northern sense of style is too clearly established, and extremes do not 
find resonance. The editor’s delicate hand roots out racially sensitive vocabulary from 
such writings. They cannot leave them unpublished - that would be against freedom of 
speech. And so, this patch of land in the Pale enters the stage of geopolitical apocalypse 
along with the rest of the world, but instead of collapsing, it just drifts apart. Still as 
social democrats. Still generously handing out aid to those who do nothing. Cruisers 
perish in the gunfire of the North Sea, but the unemployed artist is still offered retraining 
opportunities in their field by the state. Graad loses the Boreal Plateau up north, Jelinka 
burns in a three-month winter night and no one survives, but unemployed Per-Jonas is 
still talking about the book he’s writing. Graad abandons the insignificant war theatre 
in Katla to concentrate forces on the defence of their home isola, the road to Arda is now 
open to the aggressor, and the front is shifting closer day by day, but there is still no word 
about Per-Jonas’s book. Thus, despite the objections of extremists, Vaasa fades behind 
the curtains of history, along with its three-year paid paternity leave and impeccably 
functioning public transport. 


Nothing seems to stop future projects with an ecological conscience there either. In the 
very last months, when the Pale creeps over the ocean towards Vaasa, the great dream 
of anti-light pollution lobbying groups comes true. Industrial and commercial buildings 
turn off their artificial lighting at the end of the working day, and street lamps are fitted 
with special filters. Vaasa, the first and last metropolis in world history, completely 
eliminates light pollution. This is not only a measure against bombing raids, but it also 
saves birds that might otherwise get lost in the city’s maze of lights and seals whose 
mating rhythms are disrupted by a too long day. You may laugh at this, but in the evening, 
when the great world beyond becomes a bloody whirlpool, families come out into the 
streets in Vaasa and are together, insignificant. Only distant explosions disturb the deep 
peace of the winter night and its perfect starry sky. Everyone looks up, heads tilted back. 


Khan’s old mum is watching, too, in Saalem. Her eyes are coloured an iridescent dark 
as they do in Iilmaraa. A golden headscarf covers her hair. It is cold and the woman’s 
breath steams through the streets of the wooden city. Aliyah Khan last saw her son that 
night, four years ago. It wasn’t much later - no more than a month - when he called to 
say goodbye to his mother. Families are walking around, among them men of service age. 
Inayat said that he will not come back, but they, from the northern front, come all the 
time. Soldiers. Somehow, the war has been neglected too. It is all a kind of stagnation, 
a surrender, but it also reflects a deviance that is associated precisely with moralism, a 
movement that also has social democracy as a daughter cell. It reads like this: “For a 
moment, it seemed as if there was hope for humanity.” 


Then, as the stars curve overhead in descending devastation, many will no longer be able 
to take the slogan “end of the world” in all its seriousness. The panic has cooled down. 
In the strange indifference of the evacuation, whole families stay behind in Vaasa. There 
they play board games, in private houses, in spacious apartments. They love vitamin-rich 
food, and then, when the Pale is just days away, there’s always a beautiful event to mark 
the occasion. Fruit goes mouldy. It thrives in them morbidly. Children listen to oranges 
crunching on the table. Spores sprout in the flesh of the fruit, the apples are hairy from 
them. If you try to touch them, they open with a crack. Nobody knows why it’s like that. 
But few can start to feel scared by then, and that’s why I say it’s beautiful. 


Khan’s mother is one of those who decides to stay behind in Vaasa when the Pale comes. 
Many also flee. They head up to Arda, closer to the front, away from the Pale. Anita 
Lundqvist takes her fine hands there, in winter’s orbit, and goes to the ammunition 


115 


factory to polish cartridges. In these last years, especially after the evacuation, the 
lingerie model seems extremely strong. All the frivolity and joie de vivre that made the 
girl a model in a functioning world is translated into something else entirely at the end of 
the world. These are leadership qualities and Anita Lundqvist is the queen of the refugee 
camp. When Are Akerlund meets her there, he doesn’t recognise her at all. Who is this 
Valkyrie? But then Anita comes up to him, greets him by name and brings him some 
medicine to soothe Akerlund’s withdrawal symptoms. The well-known minimalist and 
deaf music critic is grateful. He tells her about an international drug business that no 
longer works. And about how the black banknote IIR - the interisolar real - has been 
devalued and the world economy collapsed. Finally, Akerlund tells her about the un- 
world - everything he experienced on his way to the refugee camp. He came to Arda 
on foot. Having missed the evacuation, the man trekked across frozen fjords for two 
months. He came through abandoned ghost towns, he was alone, and the Pale followed 
him. He crawled across the permafrost, where the wreckage of the downed airships 
sank into the mounds around him. Akerlund also tells of the horse that pulled his sleigh 
and which he finally ate. And Anita tells him about Jesper. She only tells good things. 


The factory where Anita works is a strategic resource. Although it is hidden deep in the 
fjords, the recently launched Mesque reconnaissance satellite “Mosaic” finds it there. 
The ecumenical aggressor wipes out the munitions factory with a hail of bombs, and the 
lingerie model is lost in the whirlwind of war. It is six years after the blizzard night when 
Khan, Jesper and Tereesz drove away. 


Over the southern coast of Katla, the enemy of matter, the great transition buries the 
former isola. There was Vaasa and Charlottesjal beach. Now, no one comes from there 
anymore, although those left behind - friends and family members - are constantly ex- 
pected in the camps. Somewhere there, Ann-Margret Lund sits in her kitchen, amidst 
the Pale, her rooms quiet and clean. The former teacher wears a beige jacket and a knee- 
length skirt, watching the apricots mould. It would probably be too much to say that she 
hasn’t called the police in the meantime. Like everyone else, she doesn’t know what to 
do during this prolonged stay, where the feeling of the present slowly drifts away. But 
while others dissolve into their memories, she just disappears. Her life seems to have 
never existed. The past does not wait for her to come back. She wanders around the 
rooms, adjusting grandma’s lace doilies and bedspreads, rearranging curtains on rails. 
And thus, tastefully, she refuses to succumb to the ecstasies that visit the human spirit 
as the world disintegrates. Nothing weakens from her grasp, nothing returns. When 
Katla isola finally sinks into the Pale, Ann-Margret Lund becomes a protein without the 
slightest pleasure. 


116 


16. ENTROPONAUT 


Six years earlier, somewhere far away, on the edge of another isola, a man wakes up. 
The year is ’72. He is alone. It’s cold and dark in the tent and the man is curled up in his 
sleeping bag. He rubs his sides for warmth, his plaid sweater scratches his skin. It gets 
the blood pumping, and so the man finally ventures to put his hand out of the warmth of 
his sleeping bag. He wears woollen fingerless gloves in his sleep. It’s a common thing in 
his line of work. He scrambles around the floor, finds a torch in the dark and fiddles with 
its frozen switch for half a minute. Finally, the bulb lights up, the electric light so poor 
it barely illuminates a single person. The man sits with his legs crossed in his sleeping 
bag and warms his hands. He breathes on his fingers, his toothless mouth agape. In 
the beam of the flashlight, on the inside of the tent, is a stamp with the manufacturer’s 


mn 


name, “Cooperative ‘Microcosmos’ ”. 


The man puts his hand against the tent, it’s cold. The tent is sinking under the weight 
of the snow, insulated. There is not the slightest light from outside, nor can he hear the 
wind, the storm has died down during the night. The electron watch shows that today 
is his birthday, he is thirty-nine years old. It is 7:15 in the morning. Crouching in his 
microcosmos, he crawls out of his sleeping bag, pulls on his anorak jacket and tucks his 
feet into his drawstring boots. The lock chirps open and like that, bare-legged, he steps 
out of the tent straight into the Pale. 


Twenty kilometres from the edge of the world, snow is falling softly. It’s a dim morning 
and a shadow of a man trudges a few steps forward from the snow-covered tent, beneath 
a bare tree. Around him, the black-and-white dream of the taiga landscape emerges from 
the rocky teeth and ghostly robes of the fir trees. Through the snow and fog, barely 
perceptible blue seeps into the colourless world from where visibility doesn’t extend. 
It’s morning and it won’t get any brighter here. And in the midst of it all, standing in 
front of the bare tree is a completely destroyed human being. He is an entroponaut. He 
is an ageing rock musician. His name is Zygismunt Berg and he is wearing dark blue 
underwear with a white stripe. He is pissing. 


The camp is located on a mountain slope, on a terrace surrounded by fir trees. Even 
in the misty distance below the valley, the sound of a snow shovel can be heard as the 
entroponaut digs out his tent entrance. And then, the sound of an axe. Holding branches 
from the bare tree, Zygismunt Berg returns to his tent across the open field. Thick 
snowflakes float in the air, and the man has pulled on worn jeans. The flaps of his anorak 
jacket are undone and his hood is on his shoulders as he stands there. Something moves 
in the Pale directly in front of him. 


Silence. This is the silence from which all other silences are derived. The entroponaut 
inhales sharply, his breathing loud enough to drown out the sound of his own blood 
rushing in his ears. The firewood creaks on his lap. He stands motionless, his back 
slightly hunched as always. The snowfall stops, and the Pale remains still with him. 
Minutes pass, and the electron watch on his wrist freezes at “07:48”. 


The footsteps of hooves on granite can be heard. Directly in front of him, on a rocky 
outcrop, a mountain goat steps out of the Pale. Zygismunt looks at him sharply and 
the mountain goat looks back at Zygismunt. They both have dark eyes, wet because of 
the cold. Zygismunt Berg has a receding hairline and the ponytail of an ageing rocker, 
and the alpha male has a huge crown of horns. Behind the beast, in the Pale, his herd 
glides by, painted silhouettes, straight legs flexing on hooves; they stamp uphill. The 
capricorns’ horns are wrapped in the Pale like the spears of a passing army, and puffs 


117 


of steam rise from the lambs’ nostrils. They walk with the females, and last goes the 
king himself. The mountain goat moves his crowned head and retreats into the Pale. He 
leaves the entroponaut there alone. 


“Don’t go,” sounds Zygismunt’s husky drunkard voice. “Please don’t go!” He throws 
down the firewood and scrambles up the snowy stone wall. His fingerless gloves slide 
on the granite, his feet can’t find a foothold. Groaning, he scrambles through the grey, 
dwarf fir trees. There’s no one left, everyone’s gone, what are you looking for, you fool? 


“Don’t go, please don’t go... You’re just like the old man! You know, the one who goes 
to the park looking for companionship in squirrels: ‘Little Miki, come here Miki!’ The 
need for closeness is just so deadly. He can’t.” 


“But I’m so alone.” 


“You're never alone, Zigi. You have you!” 


Twenty-one years ago, on a winter break evening, Zigi stands at the horse tram stop. In 
two days, the year will turn fifty-one from fifty. The Vaasa suburb sleeps around him, it’s 
already late and it’s dark outside, but he’s not in a hurry to go anywhere. His mother 
is not waiting for him at home. The boy lounges back and forth on the wooden bench 
at the stop, the zippers on his leather jacket jingling. In the background is a high fence 
surrounding a plot of land, a constant reminder of private property. This annoys him. 


He has just finished selling stuff to rich kids. And just before that, he performed his 
famous sprechgesang at the winter solstice party. The elementary school boys, in any 
case, laughed heartily, they loved it. Some of the high school boys thought, “Look at that 
idiot, he won’t make it to twenty.” But Zigi doesn’t care about those high school kids 
anyway. They are established. “Little punks,” as Zigi affectionately calls them - only 
they still have hope. 


Zigi is also drunk and certainly in the mood for trouble. But at the Fahlu stop, there 
is no one at this time of day, so he has to settle for an inanimate object. Look at how 
he challenges the schedule, but the schedule is too stubborn. Disappointed with the 
schedule’s lack of aggressiveness, the boy tries to pry it off the post, but the metal 
just bends on him. And since Zigi is the worst bastard in the whole country - the one 
who steals schedules so others don’t know if the last tram has already left or not - he 
crumples up the necessary information into a ball and throws it away. The stop is still 
empty and Zigi is in a mood for mischief, the weltanschauung of the garbage can is no 
longer acceptable to him. 


“What did you say?!” Zigi pushes the filthy garbage can with both hands, but it’s too full 
and satisfied with itself to defend its honour. “I heard what you said there. ‘Rioting mob,’ 
your tone was so condescending, ‘daring to raise a hand against private property.’ You 
think you’re a pretty cool guy, huh? ‘Mob’, ‘daring to raise a hand.’ What’s the problem, 
let’s argue, we’re all educated people... But you know what?” 


The garbage can doesn’t know what Zigi is talking about. It has a snow cap on its head, 
and cigarette butts have been put out in it - that’s all. Wouldn’t it still be possible to 
reach a peaceful agreement? 


“You'd like that, wouldn’t you? Aah? You would, would you? Eat an egg, bourgeois!” 
Zigi slams his foot into the bin and almost loses his balance. The garbage can is finally 
subdued, and the silent force of nature turns his attention to the stop sign. Flapping in 
the wind, it reads “Fahlu”. The sign begins to spin like a water mill as Zigi kicks it. But 


118 


when he lands, he slips and falls backwards. A cloud of snow rises into the air and for a 
moment as Zigi lies there, flakes of snow falling on his face, he laughs. Lanterns shine 
in the dark blue winter night sky above him, and snowflakes float. Somewhere up there, 
in the invisible blackness, orbits a forgotten communications satellite of a bygone age. 
Everything goes around so sweetly, a beautiful, dark world, wavering under the swings. 


But Zigi hasn’t partied enough. He pushes himself up. Since he dismantled the timetable, 
he now doesn’t know whether the last tram has gone or not. Fortunately, the young man 
is still in the mood to change the world, and so we see him coming on foot, the knees 
of his jeans white with snow, his leather jacket front open and his pop idol hair flapping 
in the wind... He’s coming down the suburb street, he’s going home on foot. And on 
two sides of the road, behind the picket fences, the wooden houses huddle. He casts 
disdainful glances, the cosiness is bourgeois. He’s looking for the right one, the dearest 
one of them all. 


He has a brick in his hand. 
He has a pimple on his forehead. 


Karl Lund, a young paper manufacturer, reads a newspaper in the downstairs living 
room. The newspaper’s headline features a silhouette of a centaur with a top hat, and in 
a dignified serif font, it reads “Kapitalist”. This is not just some self-proclaimed specula- 
tor’s journal, but rather a newspaper that was founded five hundred years ago during the 
dawn of the market economy and is one of the oldest in the world. It does not provide tips 
for quick enrichment; instead, Kapitalist examines the entire political reality through an 
economic prism. Just as it really is, on the other side of turn-of-the-century pipe dreams. 
Karl Lund is concerned about the world, he reads to understand, to help. Sincerely. You 
would read it yourself too, gladly - and would be a more substantial person for it - but 
unfortunately, you cannot understand Kapitalist. 


Zigi can’t understand it either. He has tried, but he can’t. He didn’t really make much 
of an effort either. The famine in Yeesut, the Tzaraath epidemic in Saramiriza - these 
things don’t concern Zigi. He doesn’t feel moved by them. To him, they are just criticism, 
and negativity. Zigi is not concerned about the world, he doesn’t want to understand or 
help. He wants something completely different, and now he’ll show you what it is. The 
boy tightens his shoelaces, thanks to the alcohol buzz he doesn’t feel cold. He stands in 
front of the white wooden house holding a brick in his hand and takes aim. 


The brick is released from his hand, and Zigi grins like a wild animal. The rock flies 
into the darkness of the winter night, at the end of which there is a caricature waiting 
to be smashed - the thing that is even a little bit normal in the life of young Zygismunt 
Berg: leather-bound books, the scent of mahogany. The window shatters into thousands 
of small pieces, and the paper manufacturer jumps up from his armchair. Upstairs, like 
a bad omen, dark green eyes open. 


“T can’t wait any longer!” Zigi bellows, his elbows bent at his sides and his back arched. 
“End, world, en d!” Spit and vapour shoot out from his mouth. It’s the liquor-scented 
flame of his breath, he’s a dragon. Karl Lund is still a young man in ’51, in his mid-thirties, 
he flies like a bullet from a rifle to the front door and pulls on his trainers. During the 
last month, he has found garbage bags in his garden with the label “BURGEOIS”. In the 
morning, everything is full of trash, disgusting canned food boxes hang in the quince 
bushes. He rushes out, slams the garden gate open and stops for a moment. Barely fifty 
meters away, in the middle of the street, a figure in a black leather jacket dashes with 
all his might. The paper industrialist explodes from his place, racing after the boy. 


Zigi’s black pop star hair flutters in the wind, wavy and slightly greasy. The cold halos of 


119 


the lanterns behind him contract and unfold into auras as Zigi rushes past them. Snow 
flies from under his sneakers, the back flaps flutter in the wind. Here, fuelled by alcohol, 
Zigi runs through the best days of his life. But his sneakers slip on the snow, and he’s 
been smoking since he was nine years old. And he doesn’t like gym class. 


Karl Lund often goes running with colleagues. And of course, he doesn’t smoke. No, not 
even cigarettes. Although Zigi - with a garbage bag with the word “BURGEOIS” written 
on the side - thought he saw him smoking one big and penis-shaped just the other day. 
Somewhere there, behind the glass of a tasteful wooden house. By the way, he doesn’t 
drink brandy out of carafes and he doesn’t belong to Les Morts. Nor does he engage in 
sex tourism in developing countries. 


Aman speeds along, wearing a black high-necked jersey, the white leather of his trainers 
gleaming on the snow. The distance shrinks, Zigi slips on the corner, and he starts 
again on his hands. Thirty metres, he hears Karl Lund shouting behind him: “Stop, you 
bastard!” His palms sting and his lungs bleed, but Zigi’s superhuman pain tolerance is 
back because of the alcohol. In fact, he’s already torn his leg muscles to shreds, and 
after years of just hanging around, the sudden sprints come as a surprise. But Zigi feels 
nothing. He could run forever. 


This is, of course, an illusion, the reality is that his body has its limits and after eight 
minutes of pushing it, it’s making itself felt. At a railway crossing, two men run barely 
ten metres apart. Zigi makes a sharp turn and runs up the stairs to the platform. In 
the silence of the suburbs, the pounding of feet on concrete, and the increasingly gaspy 
breathing of the two can be heard far away. Two dark shapes move along the platform 
in the beams of lantern light, the distance shrinking. One glance behind and Zigi sees 
the bourgeois gentleman approaching with swift, controlled movements, like a robot 
sent from the future. At the end of the platform, the boy jumps off, heading for the 
railway-industrial paddocks of the suburbs - the place where he goes to loiter around. 
He maintains his balance as he lands and races on over the snow. In the darkness of 
the railway embankment, he thinks, he can finally shake off the robot. It doesn’t give 
up! Normally, people like him don’t dare come out of the house. They call their beloved 
police and then they huddle together there. 


Along the snowy strip between the picket fence and the wall, and the railroad embank- 
ment, Zigi arrives first. The magic of the vodka is wearing off, he runs with small hops 
like a wounded animal. He feels his right leg cramping. Go on! But before that, he needs 
to make one last effort. Don’t give up now, you leg-waster! He really wants a cigarette. 


Behind him, Karl Lund feels the boy’s sweat in his nostrils. He comes from the future 
where the world didn’t end. Everyone there is a bourgeois and the working class is 
almost destroyed. One wild glance around and Karl Lund sees a dead end of garages 
waiting ahead. He squeezes out his last strength, and prepares for impact, with the 
intention of nailing Zigi against the wall. To hit full force. Just one look at that buffoon 
and he knows he can take him. The man reaches out and touches the boy’s coat. Only 
a meter or so remains to the garage wall. Zigi pushes himself off from his right leg, 
directly against the brick wall, but his cramped other leg doesn’t hook properly onto the 
crevice in the wall that he had in mind. The plan is executed halfway, he doesn’t run up 
the wall like a seraphim’s ensign. He slips but manages to grab the roof edge with both 
hands. Zigi flails up the wall, but Karl Lund grabs his leg. 


“Damn it, boy, give up!” 


But above him, on the garage roof, Zigi’s friend towers over him and encourages him 
from behind. Zigi’s friend is proud and powerful, although battered by time. He waves 


120 


in the dark like a grey flag and beckons. 


A completely destroyed human being is smoking in the newly fallen taiga of Northeastern 
Samara, in the Nad-Umai eco-region. Twenty kilometres to the south, the world begins, 
with the People’s Republic of Samara. Four thousand kilometres further, to the northeast, 
is Katla isola, and what lies between the two, no one knows. 


“Don’t be naive, of course, it’s not some kind of afterlife,” Zygismunt ends the pointless 
argument. He pulls tobacco rolls from an aluminium pickle jar and places them on paper. 
He stocked up on smoking material before leaving Sapurmat Ulan. Rations should be 
enough. At the central market, only dried-out jar bottoms were offered in exchange for 
buckwheat rolls, paper doesn’t work, and glue tape doesn’t stick properly. The paper 
sticks to the lips, and glowing tobacco falls from the cigarette onto the chest. The entro- 
ponaut pats his coat with his hand, and the glowing sparkles are the only colour around 
him in the Pale. He sits in the triangular entrance of the tent, his legs sticking out, and 
in front of him, in a hole dug into the snow, the fire smokes. On the other side of the 
fire, Ignus Nielsen, a friend from the Kras Mazov school and an apocalyptic blood-thirsty 
ghostly cytoplasm, crouches. The spooky defect of the film strip is framed by fir trees in 
the background in the mist, it is black and white and utterly unnatural. 


“Happy birthday,” says the ghostly cytoplasm. 
“Thirty-nine,” Zygismunt Berg replies. “Well, how did that happen?” 


“You can easily round it up to forty now. There’s no difference anymore. Get ready, tell 
yourself now that you’re forty.” 


“Tam forty.” 


“Forty! What happened? Wasn’t it said that you couldn’t live to be over twenty? You 
don’t have a plan by now. What are you doing here?” 


“You know, Ignus, I’d like to disappear...” the man dozes off and tidies the fire with a log. 
The dark orange flame in the heart of the fire comes to life. 

“Again? Haven’t we faded enough already?” 

“You can always fade more, Ignus. You can leave less behind: scraps of paper, dentists...” 
Zigi puts the kettle on the fire, fresh snow melting there. 


“They'll get you with that dentist thing! You should have done it yourself, back then in 
Graad, you should have used a screwdriver to pull out the scraps!” 


“T tried, but it was too painful.” 


“T don’t know what you’re talking about, man, don’t bother! And besides, if it’s not a 
doctor, you’re overestimating the bourgeois justice system. Discretionary leagues, like 
the hole, they only have pakazuuha. Remember Mazov?” 


Zigi puts the prostheses in his mouth from the pocket of his anorak jacket. “You’re 
always babbling. What Mazov? And besides - look where I am! Who’s going to find me 
here anymore? Not even the Institute of Entroponautics can find me here.” 


“You think so?” 


Zigi sticks his hand in an oven mitten and waits for the water to boil. “I think so. And 
what’s more! This time I don’t want to go just like that, out of the country.” 


“Well then, where from, Zigi? Countries are huge.” 


121 


“From the world.” 


The Pale darkens, snowfields beneath it. The water in the kettle shivers. “My God...” 
sighs Ignus Nilsen, lumbered from the censor of time. The ghost leaves his backwards 
voice hollow, echoless. “Lord God, how sick I am of this fading nonsense.” 


Zigi manages to get his leg free of Karl Lund’s grip after a big scramble. He steps on 
the family man’s shoulder and kicks his way up to the garage roof. There he stands, 
triumphant under the winter sky, so young and so free. The bourgeois cowers in defeat 
before him. 


“Hmm? What are you going to do now?” Zigi exclaims, gesticulating wildly with his 
hands as if to “put down” this industrialist. “What will you do, hm? Trying to climb up? 
I’ll beat your fingers to shreds!” He stomps his foot on the edge of the garage roof to 
demonstrate what happens when you climb up after him. “Youlos e! I win! You just 
fucking lost!” 


“Well done,” whispers Ignus Nilsen from the shadows. “I did that to middle-class like that 
too. Together with Mazov, we killed them, you understand, in the hundreds of thousands. 
Almost a million bourgeois we killed, we would have killed more, but time ran out.” 


“T'll kill you!” Zigi roars. On the garage roof, the apocalypse blacksmith’s feeling has 
come again, nothing is forbidden. “You hold the world together, I’ll kill you. I’ll kill your 
family.” 


“Boy, go to the doctor,” Karl Lund gives up and turns to leave, but Zigi makes a snowball 
in his hands. When it hits Karl Lund in the back of his head, he turns around in a fiery 
rage and scurries back. “Fucker, I remember your face!” 


“T remember your face,” Zigi says mockingly. “I remember your face too, I know where 
you live!” The snow floats around Zigi, snowflakes melting in his black hair. 


“Come on down, you wanker, come on down if you’re such a big man!” 


“Oh, I’m coming!” Zigi throws a snowball down, but the man dodges it. “I’m com- 
ing down with the angels of death, they’re wearing leather coats, your family is dead! 
Homo!” 


“Very classy,” praises Ignus Nilsen from the shadows behind him, “well done for putting 
that clue in the Special Committee. You are a poet. But a poet of deeds, not words!” 


“T’ll rape your wife!” 
“You're on fire, boy, you’re on fire! Go on!” 
“You're going to settle in Yekokataa, I’ll nationalise your companies!” 


“Now it’s getting too theoretical, don’t go there, it’s slippery ice. You know you don’t 
really know anything about this stuff. Tell him he’s a fag!” 


“Faggot!” 


An enraged Karl Lund tries to climb up, but Zigi hits him in the face with more snow and 
is ready to jump on his fingers when he falls back down. 


“Okay, now’s a good time to get lost, but before you do, say something fierce to him!” 


“Faggot!” 


122 


“That'll do,” says Ignus Nilsen, and Zigi’s leather-clad figure disappears into the dark- 
ness of the garage. 


A silhouette emerges from the blue-grey, snow-covered hillside, next to the big wheels of 
a tipped lorry. Nad-Umai is still half-light and grey. Zygismunt Berg comes alone along 
the road on the mountainside, with a huge backpack on his back, and an ageing rocker’s 
ponytail hidden deep under his hood. The furry-edged hood of his anorak jacket smokes 
like a chimney. The man trudges with two ski poles in hand and a cigarette in his mouth, 
through the entroponetic catastrophe. 


“When Mazov couldn’t wait for the world revolution anymore...” 


“You mean when he shot himself in the head because he had turned into a monster? Or 
because he was losing?” 


“It’s not like that,” Ignus Nilsen waves like a grey flag on his left. “Mazov had a tender 
soul, reaction was rampant everywhere, no matter how many we killed, there were al- 
ways more. And then those setbacks, everything collapsed in Revachol. He was just sad, 
he didn’t think he was a monster.” 


Zygismunt’s footprints run on the road between the fir trees, next to the ski pole punc- 
tures. “Tell me - how much did it cost for you to take power? How many comrades did it 
cost? Tell me, how it really was this time. ‘I knew that Mazov’s idea was working again 
when other communists came to kill me!’ Was it so? Or wasn’t it?” 


“Of course not, you want to assume the worst of us, Zygismunt. So that you don’t have 
to believe in anything anymore. So that you can do what you came here to do. Tell me, 
when can we expect a purge of the cadre? Both of us. When are you going alone?” 


“Honestly, I’ve thought about it, Ignus.” 


“Think about it then, but know that it wasn’t all murder and mayhem. When I took over, 
when it was all finally in my hands, it was a heady feeling. Can you imagine, the whole 
country is yours? It was just out of kindness, that feeling. I held Graad gently, like an 
architect holding a panel line...” The grey boxes glint in Ignus’s chest, a window into 
history, “like a matchstick in hand. And I promised that now, given the chance - I would 
do anything for men. And you know, I didn’t disappoint myself.” 


“Tt all slipped away, only one extraisolar colony remained, some kind of mountain goat 
shit!” 


“Don’t be so petty. Be sceptical, but don’t underestimate Samara. My heart is buried in 
Samara. When we retreated here...” 


“That’s right, you retreated! Why did you retreat again? Why do my guys always re- 
treat?” 


“It was inevitable. And I wasn’t going to become a fatalist. Giving up. I gave it all for 
this colony. My Revolutionary Republic of Samara!” 


“Right, yes, ‘People’s Republic’ is senile.” 


“T will never forgive them for what they did. After they messed it all up for me. What 
senility! I will never forgive it!” the ghostly grey cytoplasm is indignant. 


The entroponaut crosses a mountain bridge with open barriers. The guard shacks doze 
in the snow, empty on both sides of the road. At the end of the bridge, a sign reads 
“Nemengi Uul - 36 kilometres.” And further on, through the snowy Pale, is the taiga 


123 


of the Umai Mountains. Just two weeks ago, some of the world’s largest reserves of 
fluorite, tungsten, zinc, and rare samarskite were extracted from the ground here... the 
smelters were smouldering, and industrial waste turned the crisp silver streams of the 
eco-region into rusty foam. But not anymore, now there is silence and peace. And along 
the inclined lorry road, the entroponaut goes down into the dark crevice of the valley, 
where the fir forest darkens around him. And in front of him, on the snowy road, a trail 
of hoof prints runs amok. 


“It was magnificent! It was self-sacrifice, complete dedication to the people. I was a rul- 
ing machine on amphetamines, and I never slept. None of us slept. We built everything 
from scratch. With the help of the Yakuts, it was a brotherhood among nations. They 
respected our weapons, and we respected their happy spirit and dance. In six years, a 
country rose from nothing. The workers worked themselves to death, literally dying on 
the construction site, working on the fifth day in a row, heart attacks, exhaustion...” 


“With a gun to their head?” 


“You think so, but you’re wrong. That would be the case now, of course, but not then. 
You can’t imagine what happened here, how it was. It went through the world like a 
euphoria!” 


“Euphoria? Amphetamine was widespread then, still medically untested.” 


But Ignus is not listening. “I said terrible things, yes! I stood on a white horse, ina 
snow tower, and made speeches. In the hills, on the building site... I swung my sword, 
the sword had silver sunbeams on the hilt. And all around me waved white flags, crown- 
horned banners, silvered, pentacles between the horned arms, the branches to the sky. 
All who came with me here were happy, Zigi! Communism is mighty! Believe in commu- 
nism, it’s a blast! I promise! It’s beautiful if you believe in men, but without it...!” 


“Without it, there is nothing.” 


“Nothing. There was a snowstorm, but it was white, it was morning. Communism is 
white, it’s glistening! Communism is the morning, it’s jubilation!” 


The Pale begins to recede dangerously around the entroponaut. The world whitens, 
and ray wreaths seep from Ignus’s chest into the twilight of the fir trees. Falling snow 
sparkles in their hands like silver confetti, the colour creeping into the world as a threat. 
Zygismunt stomps the ground with his foot. He covers his ears with his hands and 
screams: “Enough! Stop it!” 


“Enough, stop it...” rolls across the forest like a sword sliced through the air. 


“I’m really sorry, Zygismunt, my friend,” the distortion’s voice sounds. The man is pant- 
ing in the middle of the forest road, it’s dusk and half-light again. The Pale returns and 
the entroponaut breathes a sigh of relief. “You want me... to lose my mind?” 


“No, I just wanted you to realise how good everything was then. What a time it was. 
What a beautiful time! I’m sorry...” 


“That time is over. It’s buried in your punched cards and your shit. Nobody can tell you 
what was there anymore. Nobody knows what it really was. It’s shifted out of place. 
What really was, is gone, only the Pale remains. It’s a mirage. You know that. I know 
it.” 

“It’s your girls who talk like that,” the cytoplasm whispers softly in Zygismunt’s ear. The 
fir trees sway, and the Pale is dim but seductively soft. “These are your girls, girls don’t 
believe in anything, all girls are bourgeois, Zigi.” 


124 


“They weren’t bourgeois.” 


“They were bourgeois, every last one of them. They read their girls’ magazines. Reva- 
chol’s fashions and perfumes, tales of the loss of virginity. It’s all bourgeoisie. Every 
girl is, in fact, a weapon of the bourgeoisie.” 


“You didn’t know them, you don’t know what they were thinking. Nobody knows what 
they were thinking. I don’t know either, but it wasn’t bourgeoisie, Ignus. It was some- 
thing else.” 


“Tf that’s the way you want it, please. But you’d better believe in men, not in them, 
believe in communism.” 


“T tried, but I can’t! It doesn’t work for me... I’m not the communist type.” 


“Then why are you talking to me? I’m communism itself, the phantom that walks the 
earth. So why have you been with me all these years if you don’t believe in communism?” 


“Out of hatred for those who are better off in life, Ignus. And besides - you’re a monster, 
grotesque. Who wouldn’t love the company of monsters?” 


“T’m not a monster.” 


“You're a monster, they call you the ‘Apocalyptic Shrike’. Who else do you know who is 
called that? Nobody! All this carnage in Graad was by your hands, your signature is 
everywhere. And when you retreated, even when Mazov was no longer giving orders, 
you had the enemy soldiers impaled on poles. Twelve thousand of them. You cut down 
the fir trees for poles, you made a pole forest, it was gross, Ignus!” 


“Tt was so they would let me build my country! My future country. You see, they would 
never have left us alone... They would have hunted us to death like game!” 


“That may be so, but still: a bit excessive. “The Shrike’ - look what you’ve become!” 


Human speech sounds out of place in the silence of the Pale. It echoes in the twilight 
of the trees as Zygismunt comes through the snow. It’s a trick of K. Voronikin, an old 
entroponaut, that in the Pale you must be loud. Otherwise, it gets dull and the past 
comes up. But Zygismunt need not fear it. Even when he first came to the Pale, he 
discovered to his great dismay that he couldn’t disappear like everyone else. Or rather, 
he can, but not to where he really wants to be. This makes him need Mazov’s idea. The 
disappearance of the Lund children has literally given Zigi special entroponetic powers. 


The morning is over, it’s getting dark. A few dozen kilometres further on, the deep Pale 
begins, and the times of day no longer register there at all. Batteries must be conserved 
by then. He thinks for a second but then turns on the torch anyway. The snow shimmers 
in the beam of the torch, and Zygismunt directs it at his poor friend. Ignus’ defect shines 
through. 


“Look at yourself! You’re pathetic. Everyone would be better off if they had done a clean 
job. Just a bunch of amateurs! I would have burned all your film rolls. It’s so cruel, 
hanging here...” 


“But then you wouldn’t have known me, Zigi. Think about all the times we’ve spent 
together. It hasn’t all been bad.” 


“What about me? I’m talking about you. Wouldn’t it have been better if you weren’t 
here? No pole forest and no amphetamines, cytoplasmic stumps. Who needed that?” 


“Tt doesn’t matter anymore,” Ignus drawls. “You know that. It doesn’t matter how much 
we killed. The world is ending. Soon no one will remember me. Not to mention you. 
Even the mighty of this world will not be remembered.” 


“That’s better. That’s right. And the mighty of this world? You’re a disgusting monster, 
rampaging around in this world!” 


“You were rampaging too! Look at your hand, Zigi! Let’s not forget...” 


“One more word! Say it and you’re gone!” the entroponaut yells. “Compared to you, I 
haven’t done anything! And anyway! Which one of us is the Revolutionary Commissar? 
Is it you?” 


“No!” Ignus trembles, he is afraid. “Forgive me, friend, ten thousand apologies! You 
alone are the Revolutionary Commissar - Zygismunt Berg - the pinnacle of your Party 
of Reason. I have no authority. All I have is the humble critique that I have written of 
myself. Take it. But don’t kill me. On the other side of me is nothingness. I will do 
anything to stay. Anything. I am hope.” 


“You know what I want. This is the last thing. Start talking!” 


But Ignus is unable to speak. He has no mouth. The film strip defect crackles in the 
darkness, illuminated by a flashlight beam, it is the height of cruelty. The impossible is 
demanded. Uncomfortable silence surrounds him in the forest air. Everyone is embar- 
rassed. “Why, Ignus?” the entroponaut repeats, leaning in closer with his flashlight to 
peer into the heart of history. “Why did you do it, it didn’t cost anything. I understand 
you emptied the banks, that was necessary. You even took the symphony orchestra with 
you on your retreat. By force. People like music, after all. But why this? Who did it 
bring joy to? Why ‘Harnankur’, that model didn’t cost anything! Tell me that and you 
can stay.” 


“But I don’t know,” the backwards voice responds sadly, the audio track slowing down. 
“T don’t know anything that you don’t know.” 


Nothing else is said. The entroponaut shakes himself. Snow falls from his shoulders, 
from his anorak jacket. He continues alone. Frozen machine tracks run there, hoof 
prints in the snow, in the beam of his flashlight. And then, when the herd of mountain 
goats finally emerges from the darkness, they freeze in place in the middle of the road. 
Like a natural history museum exhibit. Occasionally, a female goat shifts in place and 
snorts; it’s a nerve impulse, a muscle spasm. The tops of their backs are already covered 
in snow, but their nostrils still steam; they are still breathing - some for a few days, 
some for a few weeks. The figure in the anorak jacket moves through the herd with the 
indifference of a professional, until the flashlight beam casts the alpha male’s horns as 
a shadow on the wall of fir trees. Zygismunt looks into the animal’s glassy eyes. Time 
has disintegrated there. The primitive brainstems of the automatons fall into the Pale 
before humans do. This is how the hunters of the outback hunt their entrecote. Of 
course, they eventually go insane themselves and never come back. But not Zigi, he 
has special powers. He takes the switchblade from his belt and slits the throat of the 
protein. 


126 


17. HARNANKUR 


One hundred and fifty years ago, it is snowing on another isola, the isola of Graad, in the 
town of Mirova. It’s a mid-winter evening, but thousands of people have gathered in the 
harbour. The pier bustles with them, the imperial Graad sprawling in the background - 
church towers and chimneys. The crowds wave goodbye to the airship rising into the sky. 
From its balcony baskets, a wooden and nickel swan greets the world’s first interisolar 
flight passengers, dressed in splendid attire, embarking on an unprecedented adventure. 
It is a grey, frightening, but at the same time, cheerful and unforgettable experience. 
Today’s technology, in the form of a luxuriously upholstered airship, makes it possible 
for an ordinary citizen, if perhaps a slightly better-off one, to experience it. And on the 
other side of the Pale - oh, mystical Pale! - awaits Katla and its royal capital Vaasa. 


It’s a monumental moment, journalists flock and camera flashes flicker. The small light 
bulbs in the cameras burn out, and their light makes the snowflakes freeze in the air. 
This is how the shutter speed captures Nadja Harnankur as well. The operetta star is 
captured in a photo with the chief engineer, her long, beautiful neck stretched out and a 
fur hat on her head. She smiles and waves her handkerchief to her namesake in the sky. 
The old Graad script spells “Harnankur” on the departing airship. This is the height of 
Nadja’s fame. 


Two days later, the interisolar flight enters the Pale, and then, barely six hours later, 
there is a deviation in the airship’s course. “Harnankur’” is lost without a trace, with one 
thousand five hundred passengers on board. It is believed that the flight veered into an 
uncharted entroponetical mass, the ultra-deep Pale. 


But who believes this? Para-historians. Dissenters and a couple of crazy SRV Pale fa- 
natics. Men like K. Voronikin, an entroponaut who has lost his mind and a communist 
from the People’s Republic of Samara, and Inayat Khan, an internationally unrecognised 
authority in the field of history, who probably no longer lives in his mother’s basement. 
Nevertheless, this part of historical science, which men like Khan and Voronikin dismis- 
sively call mainstream, does not acknowledge the existence of an airship named “Har- 
nankur.” The first interisolar civil flight was “Anastasia Lux,” and that was in the next 
decade. 


Seventy-five years later, with the revolution of the turn of the century subsiding, “Har- 
nankur” had been mostly forgotten. Documentation in newspaper archives may have 
been lost, for example in the fires of the Graadian Revolution, but still - the event was 
too massive for that. If the historical memory proves itself, albeit retroactively, even for 
a disappearing commissar like Julius Kuznitski, then where did the world’s first inter- 
isolar flight with 1,500 people on board disappear? In the post-revolutionary century, 
“Harnankur” finally sank into historical obscurity. Until the ’50s, when interest into dis- 
appearance cases suddenly took on subcultural dimensions in the developed world’s mid- 
dle class - certainly not a less inexplicable phenomenon. These men, mostly young, with 
little success with the opposite sex, were named desaparecidos after the genre’s best- 
seller “Los Desaparecidos”, and they became interested in one photo: someone named 
Nadja Harnankur, a marginally interesting disappearance case, standing in a port. She 
waves, wearing a fur hat, at the arm of a chief engineer. In the background, there are 
unearthly crowds of people and they all wave at something in the sky. But there’s a 
mysterious emptiness in the sky. 


That emptiness is the holy grail of the desaparecidos. According to them, the most 
convincing evidence for their cause is the industrial presentation model of the airship 


127 


with the same name that the Communists took with them from Graad to Samara when 
they retreated from their then-Revolutionary, now People’s Republic. The original is on 
display at the Sapurmat Ulan Entroponetics Museum and the Communists take it very 
seriously. Unfortunately, nobody takes the Communists seriously. SRV entroponaut K. 
Saronovich Voronikin argues in his memoirs that the ship must exist because the model 
is technically feasible. In other words, over a thousand people could have been taken 
on a commercial trip through the Pale in all comfort with this industrial project. Making 
such a project would have been a splendid scientific achievement of its time. Why leave 
all this work unfulfilled as a commercially attractive venture? This is not at all dialectical 
materialism. 


Critics say that over two hundred field trips to the Pale have left their mark. According to 
Voronikin, - again, in his own words - this project was forever lost on its maiden voyage. 
So would the model actually work? Could “Harnankur” be some sort of failed prototype 
for “Anastasia Lux”? Why is there no documentation? 


K. Voronikin, however, claims that the model was made into a ship, the ship veered off 
course and encountered an unknown phenomenon in the Pale. 


128 


18. THREE MEAT PIES IN OIL BATTER 


From the windows of the high-rise building, the glow of Mirova, the capital of Graad, can 
be seen on the wall, one hundred and forty-eight years later. During the feverish nights of 
history, all of the imperial architecture was destroyed. The revolutionaries were driven 
out, and now the city has been recreated by democracy as a glowing spirit of light. It is 
a terrifying, out-of-control environment, in constant motion on the surface of skyscraper 
glass reflections. Even Mirova can only be viewed in a mirror, like some mythological 
horror. Its movement is the unstoppable economic growth of Graad, now made physical; 
a true thermodynamic impossibility establishes itself in this way. The metros glide, and 
traffic streams swirl day and night. From this sixtieth floor, the nerve centre Noo comes 
into view. Noo is the pinnacle of one nation’s arrogance - the financial peninsula of 
Graad. Local scientists claim that the earth was once covered by the geosphere, then by 
the biosphere, and now it is the era of the noosphere. The mind covers the earth, and 
the skyscrapers of Noo are the throne of this network. The throne of the mind. Here, 
it carries out its operations through long-distance calls and invisible transmissions. Its 
thoughts are incomprehensible financial instruments. No one knows what they are or 
how much they cost. The glass mirror is black - an interisolar real - but what is man? 
Man is light. 


The scientific community of the republic, the third generation of expelled revolutionaries, 
laughs at this. In Samara, a fourth term has been introduced: the entroposphere. The 
wave equations and Samara’s calculations are promising. This beautiful thing could 
sweep away Graad at any moment. In that barely perceptible place where commu- 
nism becomes nihilism (certainly a finer transition than from a child’s friend to a child’s 
abuser), the party’s top leaders seem to think: why not? Our idea no longer wins hearts 
among you - and let’s be honest - it never will. We like this idea, but the world no longer 
does. Let it disappear if it’s already like this. 


So when Sarjan Ambartsumjan turns his back to the window on the top floor of his Noo 
house, there are only two years left until that day. The class reunion is coming, and 
when it collapses on the North Road, it will become apparent in the chain of events that 
what is shining behind Ambartsumjan’s back is nothing less than the final stage of the 
element. 


All the light comes from outside. Snow floats outside the window, evaporating long 
before it reaches the street level sixty floors below, amidst Noo’s thoughts. In Mirova, it’s 
never winter again. Only here under the sky, it lasts. The room is cold, and the support 
columns emerge from the darkness. The phone rings. Ambartsumjan walks barefoot, in 
his suit. Around him, the shadows of snowflakes dance on glass display cases, where 
the world’s largest collection of disappearing memorabilia rests. Before Ambartsumjan 
became a fifty-year-old mazut!” billionaire, he was an unsuccessful young man among 
the opposite sex. One of the first. The ringing of the phone breaks the dignified silence 
of the room. The man takes a seat behind the desk and toggles on the speaker. He places 
his free hand on Ramout Karzai’s skull on the desk. It is authentic. 


“T’m listening.” 


“A man from Katla, with Vaasa area code,” reports the faithful secretary. “He says he got 
the number from a private collection auction, but I think he probably wants a loan.” 


“ Why ? ” 


'2Mazut is a Russian term for low-quality, heavy fuel oil, used in power plants and similar applications. 


129 


“Well, it’s a long-distance call, at the receiver’s expense.” 


Ambartsumjan chuckles. “At the receiver’s expense! Well, all right, connect him. But a 
loan...” the man waits, one hand on Ramout Karzai’s skull, the other on his grey beard. 
He is of gigantic stature. 


“You won't give a loan,” says the secretary. 
“Exactly. In principle, I won’t. Connect him.” 


The speaker switches to the long-distance call, and the Pale seeping through the cloth of 
the receiver fills the room air. The signal runs through the Great Unknown, from Katla 
to Graad. Relay stations cleanse the call of historical noise on its way, but something 
always creeps and sneaks into the wires - a ghost radio station. Its silent voice in an in- 
comprehensible language reminds why it is here. To end life. “Azimuth-Boreas-Sector...” 
runs through the hidden radio frequency and disappears. Ambartsumjan is used to it. In 
the middle of it all, a distorted human voice from three thousand kilometres away can 
be heard. It says, “Hello, my name is Inayat Khan.” 


“Who?” 
“Inayat Khan.” 
“Okay, Yat Khan, how did you get my number?” 


“Ina-yat Khan. Norrkoping fair, from an auction. Asked to call about your... hobby. Are 
you Mr....” the man pauses, “Mr. Ambartsumjan?” 


“Yes, that’s me.” 
“And you collect things of people who have disappeared?” 
“Disappeared,” whispers the Pale on the speaker. 


“Yes, I collect them,” replies Ambartsumjan, “and no, that’s not my hobby. I put my heart 
into what I do. I take it seriously.” 


“T do too. You can be sure of that.” 


“Can I? ‘The things of disappeared people’ - what are we talking about! The correct 
term is ‘disappearance memorabilia’. 


Ambartsumjan sinks contentedly into an armchair, in the dimness of the hall. Well said. 
The armchair is made of expensive leather. 


“Look, I know what the correct term is, okay.” Khan is starting to get anxious. Meetings 
between desaparecidos are seldom cordial, tending towards a scuffle. “This isn’t exactly 
the first purchase I’ve called about. And no, I didn’t buy it for myself as a paperweight. 
If that’s what you’re afraid of.” 


“So you have a professional collection?” 


“You wouldn’t ask me that if you’d give me a chance to tell about you the thing I just 
bought!” 


“How extensive is your collection?” 
“Well, you see! You won’t let me!” 


“T will let you. I’d like to know who I’m talking to first.” Ambartsumjan doesn’t raise his 
voice, only a faint shudder remains of the nerd’s whining. After years of training. The 


130 


pimples are also rather psychological. His grey beard is authoritative. The man strokes 
Ramout Karzai’s skull like a pet. 


“T consider the technical model of ‘Harnankur’ to be my crown jewel,” Khan blurts out, 
a whining tone in his voice. 


“Who are you talking to there?” A woman’s voice in the background ruins the drama 
of the moment. “Come and eat, the food’s getting cold!” Even though Khan mutes the 
phone with his hand, the air in the room still resounds, “Mother, let me talk! Don’t 
interrupt!” 


“Mum,” the Pale echoes back, “it’s my mum.” 


Ambartsumjan shakes his head. He moves closer to the table. “And you have ‘Har- 
nankur’?” 


“Yes, I have it,” Khan announces. 
“A copy?” 


“No, I went and stole it there in Sapurmat Ulan. Of course I don’t have the original. And 
neither do you!” Khan collects himself fora moment. “I understand you have another 
copy in your possession then, yes? That’s what I’m calling for. It’s in the contract, the 
owner’s responsibility. I was supposed to get a maintenance manual from you.” 


“Do you know what it is?” Ambartsumjan is deadly serious. “Do you know how important 
it is?” 
“There’s nothing left except that.” 


Ambartsumjan nods slowly. “Right, you have to... devote time to it. Hold it. You have 
to think about it, like a girl, you understand? Like a beautiful girl. Have you ever seen 
one? You have to be responsible, it’s not a toy.” 


“Think about it in what way?” 


“That’s the care instructions. You didn’t think I was going to tell you about the switch, 
did you? For example - did you know there was a third copy?” 


“A third copy?” Khan doesn’t understand. 


“Of course you didn’t know...” Ambartsumjan folds his arms across his chest. “So now 
you know - there was a third copy. All that was left of it was an empty showcase. You 
must look at it. All the time. Don’t let it out of your sight. Don’t leave it alone. And if 
you do, think about it. Do you think it’s a coincidence that they keep the original in a 
museum? Think about it, hundreds of people pass by, every day. They look at it. And 
then, when the museum is closed, the night watchmen look.” 


Khan says nothing, a ghost-like hum of the Pale echoes on the phone. 


“It’s an impossible object,” summarises Ambartsumjan. “The world no longer supports 
it.” 


The Pale is frozen in the valley two years later. There is not a soul on the forest road. A 
trail of blood droplets runs in the snow, racing with the footprints along the dark tunnel 
of the road. It goes past the giant fir trees, crouching under the snow until it reaches the 
intersection with the main road. There is a red puddle on the ground at the intersection, 
and an abandoned fire smoulders next to it. A homemade frame is set up on the fire. Two 


131 


branches hold the third one horizontally above the extinguished flames. Bones gnawed 
completely clean lie on the snow. 


And on it goes! Along the road where machines no longer drive. Frozen electric wires 
twist in the darkness. Drops of water fall one by one onto the snow, alongside the foot- 
prints. With a terrible determination. The wreckage of crawler machines sleeps in the 
ditch by the side of the road, and the dark shape of a petrol station squats in the distance 
where the road bends. 


“Orbit-Laudanum-Ultra-Tricolor-Ellipsis...” 


Something rises. There is a screech of metal. 


“Tell me you understand what I’m talking about and start doing it!” commands Ambart- 
sumjan. 


“I think I do. I’ll try.” 


“Don’t try, do it! You’ll eventually understand. After the third one disappeared, I became, 
to put it mildly, paranoid. To this day, when I step into a room and turn on the lights, 
I’m afraid it will happen again. That there is an empty showcase in the middle of the 
room. Or that there is nothing in that room at all. You’ll be the same way. Then you’ll 
understand what I’m talking about.” 


“What do you mean you’re afraid it will happen again?” Khan doesn’t miss this detail. 
Ambartsumjan is silent. He is drumming with his fingers on the skull. 


“What do you mean again?” repeats Khan. 


“T lost it. That’s what happened. It was also mine, the third one. But you know, it wasn’t 
like usual when something disappears. Keys, for example, or something expensive. Have 
you felt that? Have you come across this phenomenon? A feeling like that?” 


The professional arrogance in Khan’s voice is as if swept away. “I have,” he says. 


“Then you know what I’m talking about.” The man’s hand slips from Ramout Karzai’s 
skull. Projector beams from a long airship glide outside the hall window, and shadows 
of pillars creep across the floor. “When did it start for you?” Ambartsumjan asks. 


“Eighteen years ago. That was the first time. From then on...” Khan remains silent. 
“From then on it comes more and more often, doesn’t it?” 
“Yes,” replies Khan. “And other things too.” 


“What things?” Ambartsumjan’s ear is now pressed against the speaker, chest up on the 
table. “All things?” 


“Yes. Back alleys, a girl riding a bike, and the light, or when some horse is looking. 
Especially animals...” 


“The whole world?” 


“Yes. The whole world.” 


On either side of the road rise crawler machines, iron relics in shades of the Pale. They 
spin, helpless bodies, snow falling from rusted frames. The material degrades, drop by 
drop, like an analogue rhythm running red through a colourless world. The international 


132 


alphabet is hidden in low frequencies “...Nadir-Ellipsis-Gamut-Azimuth...” and so on until 
the edge of the settlement. 


Nemengi Uul is a ghost town. The streets are empty, with triple concrete buildings rising 
on either side of the valley. A lone bicycle hangs in the air next to a swing, otherwise, 
everything is completely normal. The windows of the grocery store pass by, followed by 
the community centre. Footprints run up the stairs to the hospital entrance, where the 
lock has been broken. He will escape... he will get away! In the dark corridor, rustling 
can be heard. “...Tricolor-Icon-Orbit-Nadir.” 


End of transmission. 


” 


“And that’s how it’s been for you for eighteen years? Twelve for me.” Ambartsumjan 


sinks back in his chair, deep into the leather. 


“Then it gets worse. But in the end...” Khan’s voice crackles in the curve of the Pale, “In 
the end, it somehow becomes... it’s somehow good, this feeling.” 


“Good?” 
“Yeah. Like everything is going to be alright.” 


“Like everything’s going to be alright,” sighs Ambartsumjan. “I don’t have it anymore. 
And that’s better. I sold mine. The remaining model. It’s gone. The endless looking, the 
obligation...” the man collects himself, “it wore me out.” 


“So you sold it?” 


“Yes, I did, cheaply too, to the first bidder. The man seemed right. That’s what he wanted 
too, it was important. That’s the kind of man you’d have to be to take care of things. 
Someone who'd look after it a lot and not let it disappear. Like me. Still a thousand and 
five hundred people...” 


“But the register still says it’s yours!” 
“What register?” 


“The auction register,” comes Khan’s increasingly sharp voice. “Otherwise I wouldn’t be 
talking to you! I’d be talking to the new owner.” 


“No, I don’t understand, the man had to register it himself. Are you sure?” Ambartsum- 
jan gets up and walks around on the table, skull still in hand, “Maybe...” 


“Who did you sell it to? If you still remember.” 


“Of course, I remember, okay,” Ambartsumjan mutters, “Berg was his name. A private 
collector.” 


“Zygismunt Berg?” blares from the speaker. “Black hair, skinny?” 
“About like that yes. It was... what was it? Ten years ago, but yes. Zygismunt Berg.” 


“Are you absolutely sure? Did he have a potty mouth? No, better tell me, did he speak 
with an accent? Like he had lived in Vaasa?” 


“God, I don’t remember such details... It could have been an accent. Why is that so 
important?” 


“And you said ten years ago? What year was thate xactly?” 
“’59. Or ’60. Why?” 


133 


“And in any case, it was after ’57?” 


“Absolutely sure, listen, I’ve got the papers here! But, please,” Ambartsumjan commands 
with the skull in the direction of the speaker, “why is it so important all of a sudden?” 


“Because...” the voice in the ziggurat might explode with excitement at any moment, 
“because in ’57 this man died!” 


The giant mazut billionaire stoops over the table: “Say again, w ha t?” 


But Khan on the other side of the phone is no longer listening. “A lead!” he blurts out. 
And the last thing Ambartsumjan hears is the man’s receding voice in the ever-growing 
din: “Mother, mother!” he says. I’ve found a lead!” 


Two years later. 


The Mirova sky station platform is empty for the night. The remaining passengers have 
long gone home. A buffeted magnet train rests above the city on the side of the platform. 
The five-story carriages tower, and through the snowstorm, a robot steps forward. 


A voice approaches. “Tzuut-tzuut-tzuut,” says the robot with each step. The large, thick 
pilot on its back, in the cockpit, turns the robot’s head. “Ti-diri-diit,” replies the control 
system. The machinery corrects its course and the fish-tailed patterned coat flutters in 
the wind. 


“Hey, seriously! Maybe that’s enough already,” grumbles a skinny blond man next to the 
robot. His head is pounding. Behind him lies a six-day train journey, full of the incessant 
disappearance talk of Ambartsumjan and Zigi, Ramout Karzai’s skull, and an airship 
that had “qualities” that reminded Khan of the girls. But this hobby-entroponetics had 
become so morbid that no one wanted to know much about it. And then they were 
already on stage at the “Panorama” bar singing karaoke. All three of them: “Now I’m 
so happy I found you!” 


“Tzut-tzut-tzut,” the robot accelerates instead. The pilot has pulled his head back, so 
it means acceleration. The robot approaches, and the fat man squeals on its back, his 
turquoise-orange-violet scarf fluttering in the wind. 


“Hydrauliczny operatywny, rozpoczynajq: diagnostykow,”'? 


voice and staggers. 


says the robot in a robot 


“Weapon systems, check!” commands the pilot and snaps his fingers at the skinny one. 


“Systemy broni operatywny,”!* replies the robot. The skinny blonde reluctantly hands 


the pilot a bottle. He pours fuel in the machine’s mouth. The machine gobbles it down 
and red liquid drips onto the snow: “Paliwo rezerwuje przy: jedzicie setka procent.”'® 


“Go on!” the fat man points to the blizzard. 
“Wait!” The robot says and adjusts his load. 
“Are you ready?” 


“Ready. Rozpoczynajq: szukajq i ratunkowe protokoly!”!® says the robot. But he only 
manages to take three steps -”tzuut-tzuuttzuut...” - when, far away on the other side 


13(Polish orig.) Hydraulics operational, start: diagnostics. 
14(Polish orig.) Weapon systems operational. 

15 (Polish orig.) Reserve fuel at: hundred percent. 

16 (Polish orig.) Initialising: search and rescue protocols! 


134 


of the platform, someone steps out of the blizzard. The robot startles, the fat man falls 
off its back, and the blonde instinctively jumps to the side. The wanted agent, Tereesz 
Machejek, pulls a pistol from his pocket, and the man from Internal Affairs on the other 
side of the platform does the same. From behind him, two more Collaboration agents 
emerge from the bushes, pistols cocked. They take aim, and the wanted agent Machejek 
takes aim at them. 


“It’s sad to see,” says the Man from Internal Affairs, “how far he has fallen. Just think, 
twenty-two solved cases. But now - a compulsive desaparecido.” 


The sky station hangs in the air like a black ghost above Mirova’s glow. There on the 
platform, in the icy street under the sky, stands former agent Tereesz Machejek. The man 
from Internal Affairs can still see his unshaven beard, the tie thrown over his shoulder 
and the face of a drunkard. Flavoured berry wine freezes on his chin, and tobacco- 
capped teeth contort into a grinning expression. Two friends gesticulate at someone 
crouching in the snow. They’re panicking. 


The man from Internal Affairs wears a neat black coat and a black suit. “Did you think 
you could just disappear from CoPo?!” he shouts into the wind. “You put the gun down, 
come in calmly and nobody gets hurt. There are twenty men down there. There’s no 
way out!” 


The mad agent shouts something back, but it can’t be heard in the rising wind. The 
bloodhound of Internal Affairs perks up his ears: “What?!” 


“Franticek the Brave!!!” comes from the other side of the platform, with a pistol shot. 
“No!” yells Khan. 


Zigi kicks the door open with his foot. In slow motion. Splinters fly, and the lock’s spine 
gives up with a crack. The door comes off its hinges and hangs there, miserable. A bare- 
chested boy, a wine bottle in his right hand, hangs between the frames. He’s high on 
amphetamines, longing for caresses and beauty. He is seventeen years old, three years 
left until his expiration date. The boy slides his left hand into his trousers. 


“Which one of you bourgeois bimbos wants to fuck?” 


A neatly decorated living room opens in front of Zigi. About twenty middle-class youths 
are sitting there, it’s a house party. Half of them are girls, but none of them wants to 
sleep with Zigi. It’s the next day’s evening - New Year’s Eve. In two hours, ’51 will be 
’52, and these young people are Zigi’s new schoolmates. It’s about now when they think 
that maybe they shouldn’t have invited Zigi. “Enough!” Handsome Alexander jumps up 
from the sofa. But he never gets to say the words: “Get out, you wanker!” He doesn’t 
have time to betray his friend Zigi, because to be honest - Zigi doesn’t have any friends. 
Zigi is a flaming deterrent, he screams: “Zigi, strike first!!!” 


And then a bottle of red wine flies into the face of Handsome Alexander. The young man, 
beautiful as Absolom, puts his hands to his face. “My God, my face!” he looks at the 
wine in his hands and thinks it’s blood pouring. 


“His face!” yells Alexander’s girl, one of many, jumping behind the sofa. 


“Broke Alex’s face...” is heard in the room full of people. Handsome Alexander himself 
is blinded by grief. His wine-stained face contorts into an impossibly beautiful war cry. 
“Aaahhbh...” escapes his lips. The boy leaps to Zigi’s feet: “My face! I’ll kill you!” 


135 


The sweaty junkie and the male beauty in a skimpy shirt are on the floor. Zigi tries to 
get up, but Handsome Alexander won’t let him. He beats him as hard as he can with his 
fists. And it’s very hard. It seems that a miscalculation has taken place. Zigi forgot that 
Handsome Alexander goes to the gym after class, giving equal attention to all muscle 
groups. Zigiis in pain. The floor lamp falls. And somebody’s drinking cup. Middle-class 
youth hovers in the shallow underwater hits of punches inside Zigi’s skull. There are 
voices, girls’ voices. They say: “Junkie, loser!” 


The boy’s hand digs around, but no weapon falls between his fingers. Ah, if only there 
were a sword, a beautiful sword! A backwards pentacle in the hilt. Like the rays of the 
sun. 


“Damn it, let’s go help Alex...” the brave boys approach. And leg hooks straight to the 
belly. Zigi writhes, in the grip of tough muscle. 


“Beast. Always a beast,” whispers the cytoplasm. 


The coattail of the Internal Affairs Investigator is fluttering. There is a tiny bullet hole 
in the black fabric - useless, foolish resistance. Three gunpowder bursts fly in response 
to the blizzard. The former Collaboration Police agent’s knee pad explodes from the hit. 
The first shot knocks Tereesz off his feet, the second hit his shoulder. A mess of tendons 
and blood clots in the snowstorm. 


“Ffran...ti...” Khan hears his friend groaning. He lifts his head from the snow. Tereesz’s 
potato-coloured hair is waving in the wind, stained with blood. His eyes of random 
colours are moist in the blizzard. So the kojko raises himself on his knees. The pistol 
trembles and gunpowder falls into the barrel. Ammunition bearings fall from his coat 
pocket, but Tereesz cannot find them in the snowy puddle of blood. His wounded hand 
cannot handle the delicate work of reloading. Everything gets messed up. 


Three figures in coats approach the platform. Carefully, hunched backs like jackals. 
Tereesz falls on his back, retreating by crawling. He drags the wet rag of his clothes 
into the snow, leaving a trail of blood. The pistol and gunpowder are left behind in a 
steaming pool in front of Khan. Coattails fluttering like wings, three Collaboration Police 
agents brush past Khan. The Internal Affairs Investigator kneels. He gains momentum, 
pistol in hand. Khan looks stupidly as Tereesz takes a pistol handle blow from the angel 
of death and twitches. 


So, no one notices Jesper reaching for his friend’s service weapon. He doesn’t know why, 
but he hides it in his pocket. Like memorabilia. 


Zigi flies out of the garden gate. Two boys throw him like a potato sack by his arms and 
legs. The boy lands on a street, curled into a ball. A white picket fence glows beside 
him, in the dark. The gate stays ajar, and the boys go. Before the door of the house is 
pulled shut, music can be heard from inside. The party is back on. But then - silence. 


Snowflakes sparkle. The winter night in Katla is icy clear, and Zigi is lying down under- 
neath it. His body does not obey his commands. Still bare-chested, he plods through 
the snow. The dear world, doomed to perish, circles around. In his black eyes, as big as 
carriage wheels, the street-lamps’ rushing beams gleam. The boy starts to laugh, and 
the dogs bark. And their barking makes all the dogs in the neighbourhood bark. 


“Beautiful beast,” whispers the cytoplasm, “communism loves you. Get yourself up on 
your lump, go back and slaughter the whole house!” 


136 


Zigi grabs a handful of cold snow and rubs it on his face. The snow turns into a red berry 
biscuit on his nose. He smacks the snowball into his swollen eye socket. In the darkness, 
a dog’s bark echoes in the curve of his ears. 


“Throw it in a window then! Tell them they’re bourgeois!” 


“They don’t understand!” Zigi yells. “They don’t know what a bourgeois is! Don’t you 
understand that it doesn’t offend them any more? They don’t know what it means!” 


“What do you mean they don’t know what ‘bourgeois’ means?” 


“Exactly that,” Zigi grunts and whacks his hand in the snow. “It’s a random historical 
word, romantic even. Like ‘cuirass’ or ‘coquette’...” He tries to push himself up on his 
elbows, but can’t, he collapses. The crunch of snow under someone’s shoe can be heard 
from the garden. 


“It’s coming to kill you! Run, beast!” 
“Shut up!” Zigi whispers. 


All the dogs fall silent at once. Somewhere a light coat rustles. The smell of winter 
wafts up his nose, so sweet that the boy dares not breathe. He holds his breath, and in 
the darkness far away the snow crunches. He knows what those footsteps are. Those 
steps are destruction. His destruction and Iilmaraa’s. It is where the original civilisation 
gathered, fifteen hundred years ago, where it faded from history, with all its pillars and 
ancient stringed instruments. So no one really knows where these nations came from. 
All these people. The garden gate slides open with a crunch. Sounds like a memory, 
gone now, as it happens. Zigi can’t understand why it’s such a terrible feeling. It must 
be the Samara amph. The boy can’t take it anymore, he breathes out. Silvery breath 
rises from his smashed mouth. 


Doom stands over him and breathes. 


Twenty-one years later, an entroponaut paces the empty hospital corridors of Nemengi 
Uul. Two freshly skinned goat hooves on his back drip blood onto the linoleum, and 
he has a fuel canister in each hand. The man kicks open the door with his foot. He 
strides up the fire escape stairs to a large steel door. There he stops at last and puts the 
canisters down. The mazut rattles in them. 


The entroponaut pulls out the cutting tongs like a sword from his backpack. The iron 
snaps. The sound of steel echoes in the abandoned hospital staircase. And back through 
the deep Pale, abandoned ghost town areas, to the road, to the gas stations, to the 
intersection it echoes. Along the blood trail to the bonfire site. And into the dark forest, 
the natural history museum, where mouldy fungi grow on the antlers of males and steam 
no longer rises from the nostrils of the calves. They still breathe, but not oxygen, instead 
pure Pale. 


The door flies open and the entroponaut steps onto the hospital roof. Pale swirls into a 
vortex there. A man in an anorak jacket steps through it, with cans in hand and goat 
legs on his back. He throws the containers down and kicks them forward, the cans slide 
on the roof, on the snow. Mazut splashes. The entroponaut runs his hand through his 
receding hairline and ageing rockstar ponytail. In front of him, on the landing platform, 
under the tarpaulin, floats a shape the size of a small house. 


The backpack falls into the snow. He grabs the cable holding the cover taut. The thin 
steel slips between his gloves. The man tightens the cable and the mass wobbles in the 


137 


Pale. The carabiner clicks loose from its mooring and Zygismunt lets the cable go with 
a grin. The dark tarpaulin rises like a bird up into the Pale, and from beneath it a small 
airship comes into view; the sturdy iron lump floats like an armoured apricot pit and 
cables keep it attached to the ground. Stencil lettering runs along the ship’s armour 
plates: “Roo 501”, the Samara small airship brand. 


The tarpaulin cover flag flutters high above the hospital. Zygismunt Berg watches from 
the landing platform as it is wrapped up in Pale. He starts climbing up the cable. 


Only in about half an hour, a hermetic door opens inward. With a hiss. Oxygen flows out 
of the cockpit, and the illuminator and instrument panels become hazy from the change 
in atmosphere. Sweaty Zygismunt Berg climbs in through the door. The room, about the 
size of a small bedroom, trembles from his effort, and the ship sways. He angrily throws 
his anorak jacket to the floor and never puts it on again. It’s practical, sure. And even 
a uniform for an entroponaut. But to him, the jacket is associated with a fashion craze 
he should never have seen - disco. The man starts winding the ropes around his waist. 
He still doesn’t say anything, not a word, even though he’s covered in bruises from falls. 
He doesn’t even curse. First comes the backpack, then the goat legs. And lastly, the two 
mazut canisters clatter against the ship’s hull. 


He collapses against the wall, exhausted, and rests for a moment. He prepares a 
cigarette behind his ear and pulls out the rolled-up maps. With a matchbox in his teeth, 
the man lines up the maps on a wall lined with cockpit instruments. Aerial photos 
are displayed in a row: the dark green taiga of Nad-Umai, and the cluster of concrete 
boxes of Nemengi Uul. And on the edge of this, the former border of the world, drawn 
with grey watercolours. A vast blank space full of azimuths, ellipses, and sine waves 
begins where the world ends. And far away from this geometric maze, in the loneliest 
of solitudes, in the centre of a cycle where no destination leads, a line of tiny dots runs, 
a distant constellation, a superposition. This is the end. 


The Rodionov Deep is located in the heart of the Pale, four thousand kilometres from the 
edge of the world. The flight there could take years. The man looks at his hand, and on 
each of his white knuckles there’s a tattoo, numbers like beads on a string together: “5; 
12; 13; 14.” 


Zygismunt Berg turns the ignition key. The lights come on in the cockpit, golden fog 
lamps in the middle of the Pale. The electric hum runs through the airship like a purr, 
and the little arrows jump behind the indicator glass. Welcome, entroponaut. 


The man presses the START button on the ship’s Stereo 8 player. The tape is labelled 
with a girl’s cursive handwriting: “Zigi’s Drive to the End of the World Mix-tape.” When 
the disc starts spinning, the little heart over on the last “i” of the name “Zigi” stays in 
the middle of everything. The speakers play rock music from the ’50s, by a band of now- 
dead drunks from the north. It’s a beautiful song that the bourgeoisie, unfortunately, 
couldn’t understand. Track #1 - “Helvetti” - was too complex, too dark, and too edgy 
in its established womb-shaped musical taste. Let them rot in hell. By the time the Pale 
infiltrates their kitchen corners and turns them into proteins, the members of the band, 
who had been without a larger audience despite their best efforts, will have already 
drunk themselves to death in front of the Lemminkainen village store. 


Zigi lights a cigarette. He nods his head to the beat, wearing a rugged sweater in the 
middle of the cockpit. This music is real. It says it like it is. But something is still 
missing. 


138 


“You forgot your leather jacket, Zigi!” Doom says in the dark, with a girl’s voice. But 
Zigi doesn’t dare open his swollen eyes. He knows what’s really waiting out there. The 
snow smells all around him, in his broken capillaries. O, bourgeois perfume! 


“Uuu-uu!” sings Doom, “thy jacket.” 
“Tell me... Doom...” croaks Zigi in the darkroom of winter, “is it a cool leather jacket?” 
“Pretty cool leather jacket, yeah.” 


Locks ring above him. Blood rushes to his mouth, a snowball melts in his eye socket. He 
coughs: “Doom... so you... like leather jackets?” 


“T do.” 
“And you know who I am?” 


“Of course!” Doom exclaims happily. “You’re Zigi - the worst boy in school.” 


Twenty-one years later, Zygismunt Berg opens the ship’s toolbox. There, on top of the 
wrenches, is a black leather jacket. It’s his leather jacket. He pulls it on. His shoulders 
no longer fit properly, and his back is hunched. The lock won’t fasten around his beer 
belly, but never mind. That’s the way it is. He leaves the front open. There are seven 
white stripes running down his back, still looking heavily evil. Like this, the entroponaut 
stands at the cockpit door of his small airship and throws his ponytail over his shoulder. 


Suru rock can be heard in the frozen Pale. The harmonica howls. You could say Zigi is 
self-chilling there at the door. 


J] Mutta mikd on maa? 
Se on Helvetti!’ 


... he sings along and smacks the emergency button with his palm. Thus, the clatter of 
the iron contraption booms into the beginning of the beat, and the propeller bogies fall 
down. The ship begins to sway to the music, its wings unfolding inside the Pale like lush 
steel petals, blades hanging down. And what approaches is the song’s most fierce lyric: 


J) Se ei ole mikddn kauhupaikka...18 


... he sings and is joined by a familiar upturned choir. Together they are mighty for the 
last time: 


JQ Enneminkin siinné on surullista!® 


Ignus Nilsen’s ghostly grey cytoplasm stands below on the landing platform, between 
unfolding wings. 


Zygismunt stays looking at him, and Ignus looks back at Zygismunt. The Pale flows in 
and out of the cytoplasm’s bubbling heart. Only a slightly lighter clump is in Ignus’ heart. 
The enemy of matter drifts through him, like wings. 


“Communism forgives you,” he says, “Communism understands.” 


“Ignus,” mumbles the entroponaut, “forgive me.” 


17(Finnish orig.) But what is a country? / It’s Hell 
18(Finnish orig.) It’s not a place of horror... 
19 (Finnish orig.) That’s what’s sad about it 


139 


“Already forgiven. We had a man like you in Graad too. Ion Rodionov was his nom de 
guerre. I also considered him a friend. You know that name, don’t you?” 


“Only the name.” 


“But you don’t know who he was? He was a mathematician of the Revolution, at the top 
of the party, with me and Mazov. Nobody knows that. Nor why he took the model of the 
‘Harnankur’ from Graad.” 


“But I don’t know that!” Zygismunt drops a cigarette from his mouth. 


“Of course you don’t. Only the Commissar of the Revolution and a handful of close 
relatives know. The man is a real non-entity. His whole life’s work is like that. If they al- 
ready couldn’t accept dialectical materialism, how could we have explained the nihilmat 
to them?” 


Zygismunt is silent. The song ends. 


“He wanted to use it as a weapon of mass rejection. Against bourgeoisie. It would have 
been our answer to an atomic weapon. You know there is no uranium in Samara. But he 
couldn’t find the place.” 


“We did,” says the SRV entroponaut. The cables holding the airship to the ground snap 
loose like whips. 


“Too bad. I’ve never minded this wing of materialism. Terrible if they should be right. I 
love the world, every last atom of it. But ifthe world stops loving our ideas, you and Rodi- 
onov are second best. After all, my name is also a war name,” says Ignus Nilsen, “and at 
least this way we are no longer beasts.” From the speakers comes the world’s saddest 
screech, track #2: “Grave”, from the disappeared dodecaphonic composer, comte de 
Perouse-Mittrecie. 


“Farewell, Zygismunt.” 


“Farewell, Ignus,” says the entroponaut, pulling the airship door shut behind him. Ignus 
is left alone on the roof of the hospital. “Enneminkin siinnd on surullista,” the ghost is 
still muttering, as the wings begin to twirl silently through his cytoplasm. But the blades 
are moving faster and faster. 


Zygismunt Berg stands in front of the illuminated panel, his hands on levers. Cranks 
rise from the floor, from the gearboxes, like two horns. The man turns on the transis- 
tor radio. He cranks the gadget to the hidden radio station, the computer half the size 
of the wall calculating the ship’s course from its transmission. The signal comes from 
countless points, from a constellation of superpositions four thousand kilometres away. 
The vibration of the strings echoes its speech. The girl with a baby voice repeats there 
in an infinite circle, through all time, which for her - looking from the depths of Rodi- 
onov Deep - is one and the same, a simultaneous and immeasurably complex event. A 
perfect closed system. “Azimuth-Boreas-Sector-Orbit-Laudanum-Ultra-Tricolor-Ellipsis- 
Nadir-Ellipsis-Gamut-Azimuth-Tricolor-Icon-Orbit-Nadir’” . 


The entroponaut pulls the levers down and back. His eyes are red. The small airship 
takes off from the hospital roof’s landing platform. The Pale is pulled into spirals and 
the blades sweep Ignus Nilsen apart. 


Two men wave in the blizzard, coloured blue and red from the lights of the ambulance. 
They slowly move further, and the sky station platform is left behind in a snowstorm. 
Tereesz opens his eyes in the sky, he can’t feel his legs. Everything is whirling, and the 


140 


noise of the ambulance airship’s wings bounces around. Above him stands a man ina 
black suit, illuminated by a cardiac monitor screen. This man is the Man from Internal 
Affairs. He is the Angel of Death. 


“T can’t feel my legs,” Tereesz coughs. 

“That’s what happens when you open fire on CoPo.” 

“You!” Tereesz tries to sit up, but he’s got his wrists stuck to the first aid frame: “How?” 
“Unfortunately, I can’t answer that question.” 


“KontSalovski...” The former agent sinks back into the frame. “Ulrich I gave you, but... 
There’s no such thing as a KontSalovski, how did you... who gave you...” He starts to pull 
his right wrist free from the bandage. 


“You're a junkie, Machejek, that’s why. People like you are always careless. How many 
years had you been doing it before that man had a heart attack? Two, five?” The in- 
vestigator rises up from above Tereesz, but the bandage snaps loose and the man’s 
cannulated hand grabs his tie. 


“You,” Tereesz coughs in his face, fist clenched, “you have to help me!” The partner is 
already approaching with a pistol, but the agent signals to him with his hand: “Wait!” 


“T found things! In Vaasa! About a closed investigation. His name is Deerek Trentmoller, 
he has killed children, twenty, maybe more, and maybe the Lund children too, please...” 


“Let go!” The fallen agent releases his grip and collapses: “I have a notebook, everything 
is there, promise me! I wouldn’t have run otherwise, you have to check them out...” The 
Angel of Death stands over him, wiping his lip clean of blood. The kojko flails below, 
searching for the notebook: “You can get a medal for this! Definitely a promotion...” 
The Internal Affairs man turns his back on him, and the partner rushes to tie Tereesz’s 
hand back to the frame. “Please,” the broken voice says amid the roar of the engine. 
With his tie flapping in the wind, the Internal Affairs investigator looks down from the 
belly of the airship at the lights of the city. “Forget it, Machejek. Deerek Trentmoller 
has nothing to do with this, no disappearances have been reported.” A hint of humanity 
shades his voice: “It’s the only good thing about this story.” 


Ahead, the flashing lights of the hospital’s landing platform rush towards them, while in 
the distance, the spiky throne made of Noo skyscrapers rises above the city’s lights. 


There, the mazut billionaire watches as the tiny dot of the ambulance airship disappears 
into the storm on the other side of the Veera River. Noo’s thoughts cool before him, the 
courses drop, and Graad goes to war. General mobilisation begins tomorrow. Not much 
remains. Over three thousand pieces of disappearance memorabilia lie behind the man, 
but Sarjan Ambartsumjan now considers this view here the jewel in his collection. Under 
his arm rests a magnetic mail dispatch, a glass case that arrived on the evening train 
from Vaasa. It is empty. 


141 


19. TAM NOT A JOKE 


Forty-six hours later, sixty floors below. The hotel lobby is empty at night, gleaming like 
a tomb of black marble. A radio plays in the reception area, the girl listens anxiously as 
Mesque’s atomic crusaders spy from the deep Pale, while industrial espionage creeps 
in here. They’re everywhere. So the war news echoes back from the hall, as a man 
in a plastic jacket comes through the automatic doors. A cloud of snow accompanies 
him, he rushes in and the glowing white lettering “HOTEL INTERGRAAD” runs in the 
background. The girl doesn’t notice him, the security guard is also gripped by fear, and 
so the guest steps right past them, into the residents’ private elevator. The doors close 
behind him. Left alone in the golden light of the elevator, he turns his backpack over his 
chest, the loops still on his shoulders, as he was taught to do in sixth grade. 


“Do it like this, Khan, it’s really cool.” 


Khan rummages through the side pockets of his bag. A metallic sound and a bunch of 
keys come into view. There hangs the key of his Saalem wooden house, a rusty ham- 
mer from the hallway, and an aluminium monster for locking the cellar floor, all useless, 
turned into scrap metal; all but one - a golden key, whose teeth seem so technologically 
sophisticated, as if turning such keys simultaneously would trigger a self-destruct proto- 
col, a dead-hand type of perimeter defence, ensuring a counterstrike even in the event 
of the destruction of the high command in a preemptive nuclear attack. 


Khan sticks his Doomsday key in the lock and turns as instructed: twice left, then right, 
then left again. “Ambartsumjan, Sarjan Asaturovits” is engraved on the copper plate, 
next to the keyhole. The hiss of the loudspeaker cuts through the silence of the elevator: 
“Mr. Ambartsumjan, I was worried...” 


“Tam not Mr. Ambartsumjan. I am Inayat Khan.” The man demonstrates the key, unable 
to decide where to point it. Only he looks back at himself in the mirror, his tutu hat 
askew on his head and the snow melting on the shoulders of his jacket. He’s bearded, 
he looks terrible. “I was given this, in case of emergency. Which is now. Why don’t you 
answer my Calls?” 


“You sound like Ishmael.” 

“Sorry, what?” 

“You're talking exactly like Ishmael.” 
“Oh yes... do you remember Ishmael?” 


“Tam Ishmael,” replies the faithful secretary, and the lift lurches out of its place. The 
acceleration passes through Khan. 


“You were worried? Why? Why didn’t you pick up?” 


“T...” the secretary hesitates. “I haven’t been in touch with Mister for two days. The last 
instructions were to stop all calls and to not let anyone in.” 


“That was the day before yesterday?” 
“Yes, when Mister received your dispatch, Inayat Khan.” 


“Fine.” Khan nods in the mirror, sleet melting on the glasses. He takes his glasses off 
his head and wipes them on the sleeve of his plastic jacket. “And nothing else has come? 
Meanwhile? From the Collaboration Police?” 


142 


“As I said, I haven’t heard from Mister.” 


“Right, yes...” The elevator cube slides on silently, up towards the sky. Khan’s ears want 
to lock from the pressure change. Khan swallows, gives the lift a once-over and then 
stands facing the door, backpack still on his chest. 


“Mr. Khan,” the speaker suddenly hisses. 
“Yes?” 
“Please see that everything is in order with Mister. Tell him I asked to be contacted.” 


“Why shouldn’t it be?” The elevator slows, hands rising from the sides as if in a weight- 
less state. “Why wouldn’t everything be fine with him?” he asks. But the secretary 
doesn’t answer. The elevator doors open in front of Khan: “Ding...” A beam of light 
cuts through the hall to the dark, sixtieth floor. The wind howls there, its gusts blowing 
shrouds from the display cases like ghosts. And the snow is falling. And so, the world’s 
largest private collection of disappearance memorabilia is slowly buried in piles of snow. 


The sound of shoes tapping on linoleum can be heard. A Man from Internal Affairs comes 
along a hospital corridor at night, a suitcase phone hanging from his hand, locked to his 
wrist with a chain. A tiny reminder shines on his lapel, a light blue enamel badge. Two 
policemen guard the doors of the intensive care unit. One of them is sleeping. 


“Why are you sleeping?” The investigator leans over him. “I am an infiltrator from 
Mesque and there is a five-ton explosive device in this suitcase.” The officer opens his 
eyes and rubs them in bewilderment, his partner watches in horror. “We have just lost an 
irreplaceable strategic resource in the Mirova Central Hospital. Three thousand Graad 
citizens have perished. Because you didn’t fulfil your duties!” 


The officer jumps up and straightens his shirt, his gaze still sleepy. The investigator 
is unforgiving. “What are you standing here for? Does it make it better if you sleep 
standing up? Who am I? Where is my work ID? Why haven’t I submitted my guest name 
tag?” 


Double-sided metal doors swing behind the investigator, he goes into the dark room and 
the officers breathe a sigh of relief in the corridor. Cubicles separated by plastic curtains 
pass on both sides of him, and the last one on the window side glows with medical 
equipment. The man turns on his heel, and pulls the plastic curtains open: “Machejek, 
I need you to call your friends. I need you to call them back. Now.” 


There is a morphine drip on the bedhead, dripping morphine. That’s not a good sign, it 
should have been cut off long ago. The broken agent looks out of the window, thick snow 
is falling: “You have nothing to give me.” 


“T don’t have to have anything to give you.” 


“T know your story.” It’s not reported...“. You don’t know anything about the investigation. 
You’re a duch, sjawa”°. People like you can only haunt.” 


Duch, sjawa. Usually, it’s the unemployed citizens who entertain their minds with all 
sorts of ghosts and goblins that slither into the state apparatus and weave a web of 
lies against them. “The likes of us, Machejek. The likes of us are the agents of the 
Collaboration Police. The purpose of the Collaboration Police is not to investigate. The 
Collaboration Police aims to keep the world as it is.” 


20(Polish orig.) Ghost, apparition 


143 


Machejek glances away from the window: “This world of yours as it is now is a real 
shithole.” 


“Oh!” The Internal Affairs investigator feigns surprise. “Such philosophy. So you like 
Saint-Miro’s plan for humanity?” 


“The only nihilist here is you, duch.” 


“So you don’t like Saint-Miro and his plan for humanity?” The internal investigator’s 
features sharpen, and he steps to the side of the bed, into the green glow of the heart 
monitor. “But you like even more abnormal things? Or don’t you know what company 
your friend keeps? Your abnormal friend. I didn’t know either. What is this hobby of 
theirs, what do they do...” 


Machejek sits up, his shoulder bandage turning red with defiance. “Khan? Khan is a 
genius. You can’t stop him.” 


“Yes,” the internal investigator shrugs, “he knows what he’s doing. Unlike you. Let’s 
call him back now.” 


This concession to the likes of Machejek is enough. “You know what, no, old man. Stop 
asking. Better increase the morph. I can’t reach.” He sinks into the hospital bed, luckily 
the laughing spasms hurt him and the whistle stops. 


“T think you’ve had enough drugs.” 
“Drugs...” mocks Machejek. 


The internal investigator looks at him with resentment. Down on the hospital bed, a 
sweaty man’s body lays, his bare torso bleeding, oozing sweat. “So you like it here, do 
you? Are you happy with your lot, KontSalovski?” 


Tereesz is swimming in morphine solution. Dark waves wash over him, and snowflakes 
fall into the water. He burns cold. Chance! The child’s hands hold him afloat, by his 
shoulders. Tiny strong hands... he is a soldier of love. “Yes,” he replies, watching the 
green speck on the heart monitor bounce. Soothingly, rhythmically. “It’s okay here. They 
say I can’t walk normally anymore, but you know what? I wasn’t going anywhere. I hate 
this country. I hate Graad. I hate the Collaboration Police and I hate the Moralintern. 
It’s just a tool to me, I’m just a tool myself. I know that... why I’m here. Who gave me 
up. Don’t waste your breath, I’m not an idiot. I know my job is done.” 


The bright green light lingers in the darkness. 
“What did he get for me? Khan? What did you give him?” 


The howling of the wind can be heard, and the vapour trail runs through the snowdrifts 
on the rooftop. The world’s leading expert in disappearing cautiously steps forward as 
snowflakes dance in and out of focus. And there behind them, his dialectical materialist 
glasses. His sharp, dark eyes watch as the snowflakes stick to the glass. The man slowly 
crouches down, and the rustling of his plastic jacket can be heard. His hand reaches out 
and picks something up from the snowdrift. 


The wind dies down around him, and the curtains fall lifelessly. The dark cloth takes 
on the form of the display case again, and Inayat Khan is there in the middle, on one 
knee, holding a human skull in his hand. He gazes deeply into the blackness of the eye 
sockets. Sixty thousand reals are scattered around here - far away in the Erg desert, 
where the epic hero went to seek an audience with the gods. Sixty thousand deep holes 


144 


have been dug. In vain. Khan blows, and the snow flies from Ramout Karzai’s eyes, his 
jaw locked with clasps, and his mouth silent. The spear is broken, and the banner is a 
funeral shroud. 


“Mr. Ambartsumjan!” Khan stands up. A tattered flag waves on the wall, taut with ropes. 
It is enormous, in the colours of the Iilmaraa tricolour. A gust of wind rises, and a scarf 
of the same colour flutters around the man’s neck, and he wears a hat of the same colour. 
“Ambartsumjan!” Khan goes over and runs his hand over the glass display case. From 
under the snowdrift, the shaft of a spear can be seen, an antique head with a rusted tip. 
“We need to talk!” 


The ominous shadow of the tutu hat shifts onto the desk, papers fluttering around, the 
speaker pyramid buried in snow. A hand stretched out into the light of the elevator, 
suddenly trembles like a ghost. There is a strained groan, then whoosh! The skull 
shatters into a thousand pieces against the speaker. 


“Where are my things?! Where are they?!” 


The man approaches, turning around the display cases. Glass shatters. “I don’t like 
it when my things are missing! I don’t like it one bit!” He stops, both hands on the 
mahogany, sweeping the desk clean of papers and writing supplies with a single motion. 
“How am I supposed to know where you put it now?” He looks around. “There was talk, 
wasn’t there? You get the ship, you facilitate, and everyone gets their things. Where are 
my things?!” he yells, looking from the corner of his eye at a row of windows from floor 
to ceiling. The middle, the largest of the windows, has been shattered from the inside, 
with triangular shards of glass pointing outwards and snow blowing in. And Mirova’s 
glowing gold light. In front of the window, a large display case sparkles upside-down. 
Bare wires, a switch. 


Khan turns his head and rushes from his position, leaving the paper painting behind. 
Onto the wall, above the desk. The snow-damp paper undulates there, the watercolour 
Gon-Tzu slowly spilling out: the black millipede of dragon veins into striped sacks, the 
reeded turquoise into a rainbow. Soon he will be gone, but you can still see how Gon-Tzu 
distributes - one for you, one for you, and one for you - immortal peaches to his men. 
But Khan has no eyes for that. 


He digs, the wind whistling in his ears. He has put on his mittens. The display case 
emerges from the snow, and the man turns it right-side up, pulling out papers. Expensive 
papers. A Collaboration Police folder with X-ray pictures of someone’s bared teeth, an 
identity photo flies out of the folder into the wind. A silvery tattoo, an impossible memory 
on finger knuckles: 5, 12, 13, 14. Khan catches the photo, and stuffs it into the backpack 
on his chest, along with the rest. Along with the transit permit to Kukushkin, in the Graad 
Samara Oblast, along with fake papers for the People’s Republic. These are on top, the 
upside-down pentagram printed in white on the passport cover. 


At the bottom of the display case gleams the grand prize, Rodionov’s Deep. Khan’s mouth 
opens, and he reaches out his hand. The perforated dark blue metal sheet sings like a 
saw blade between his fingers, the city’s light shining through thousands of dots. After 
the dots, there is the map legend, in Voronikin’s handwriting. He reads, and the starry 
sky shines on his dark face. 


Machejek smiles sadly. “Was it good?” 


No answer from the investigator, and the suitcase phone opens on Tereesz’s lap. The 
lights come on inside, and his notebook with a dove on it slides off the keys, photo paper 


145 


shining in between. A stranger. 


“This was supposed to be something very good.” The man thinks fora moment. “Now 
you have a Vaasa citizen whose comings and goings you can’t control, right? You can’t 
do anything to him, he’s a collaborator... but he played you. You didn’t even know what 
things you gave him!” 


“They weren’t good, Machejek,” the investigator snaps, “I was wrong! I was wrong much 
more than you think and you won’t like it. Your suspect is a victim.” He picks up the 
notebook. “What do you think, why haven’t your cases been reported? You saw them, 
Machejek! Let’s talk about it. Or don’t you want to anymore? Don’t you want to talk 
about Deerek Trentmoller? It’s not funny anymore?” 


The investigator puts his hand on the man’s steaming forehead. “These things happened, 
you saw them with your own eyes. And now they haven’t happened. How is that possi- 
ble?” 


“That has nothing to do with it,” Tereesz gasps, pupils covering his randomly coloured 
irises. “You said so yourself. Only Khan’s plan is important now.” 


“Khan’s plan is the height of abnormality. Rodionov’s Deep! The mentally ill communists, 
damn them, are dying and you all live in such a world. You think about such things, you 
deal with them... You like all kinds of objects, yes? I have one. It came to me today, from 
Vaasa. I had it re-telefaxed to me five times.” The man shakes his head angrily. “Didn’t 
come in any other way, only this one all the time. Let me show you one of the photos, 
Machejek, because you can’t behave like a grown-up otherwise, and you obviously don’t 
care about your friends after your great sacrifice.” He takes the photographic paper 
from his notebook. “This here is the only artefact from Deerek Trentmoller’s assets that 
corroborates your story. He developed it himself in his private chambers. You saw it 
too, with your machine. The date of development is August 29", ’52. Two days later, 
he sent it, with the negative, to the photo lab in Vaasa.” The negative is not spoiled, the 
development is the same”. A month later, the Central Photographic Laboratory confirms 
this after a follow-up enquiry: “The negative is not spoiled, the print is the same”. Zeul 
confirms that there are no defects in the lens and Trigat takes three hundred test shots 
with the camera equipment. No anomalies appear. This man studied the apparatus for 
six years until memory disease set in. I think he would have studied it for life. Like you.” 


Tereesz holds a piece of photographic paper with unevenly cut edges, dates and stamps 
on the back. 29 August. Year 52. 


“Turn it over!” 
Sweat leaves a stain on the paper. Photographic lab stamps. “Zeul”. “Trigat”. 


“You don’t dare look at it, do you? You shouldn’t dare. No one should, you shouldn’t be 
doing this sort of thing. They must be forgotten. But Machejek - I’m sorry. I need you 
to call back your friends. You have to do it.” 


Light slides across the surface of the photo in a glossy sheen as Tereesz turns it. It’s a 
yellow-hour summer day, frozen in place. The rain is pouring down on the hillside, and 
the three of them, small, in front of the rose hip bushes, smiling triumphantly. Khan 
is explaining about peaches and Gon-Tzu, he and Jesper look ahead, beach umbrella in 
hand. The three boys hold them above nothing. 


“What is it?” The dot on the heart monitor pauses. 


“That’s where your friends are going. It’s your Rodionov’s Deep.” 


146 


“You've retouched this...” Tereesz turns the photo, panicked as if he’s searching for them 
on the other side. “Why are you doing this? Why are you doing this to me?!” 


“We do nothing. There are no such things as duch’s and sjawa’s, junkie. We are friends 
of humanity. When will you understand? It’s not a person who retouched it. You just 
don’t want to think about it. Nobody else wants to. That’s right. Let’s leave it.” The 
man from Internal Affairs lifts the phone from the hook and presses the redial key. Call 
tone. Tereesz turns his head away, but the Man from Internal Affairs takes him by the 
chin: “Don’t stop now! You’ve done more than harm. You did them both in: Hird and 
Trentmoller. You cleaned the horror from their heads. We’re almost there.” A woman’s 
voice comes over the phone: “Hotel ‘Intergraad’...” 


A photo falls from Tereesz’s fingers: “But that’s not possible!” 


“That’s not possible,” sighs the Angel of Death, “only the world as it is is possible. We 
don’t study these things, we don’t poke at them. We are at peace. We forget. We wait 
and we are protected.” 


“Hotel ‘Intergraad’, I’m listening.” 


“Please connect me to suite number 4001.” 


“Ishmael.” 
“Can you hear me?” 


Khan’s voice comes from the switchboard. The loyal secretary stands in front of a wire 
bundle, thousands of metal plugs running into the analogue sockets. A light bulb flashes. 
He wears a pink shirt, click-click, the young man switches wires on the desk, with his 
usual agility, “I hear you.” 


“Mister has jumped to his death. I hope you realise I could have left that unsaid. I could 
have just left the building. I hope that you will understand and that you will not call 
the authorities for ten minutes. Mister would have wanted it that way. That I would not 
be stopped, that the investigation would not waste my time.” So dictates Khan, to the 
howling of the wind. “Time I don’t have. Do you understand? Say you understand me 
and you will do so.” 


From the speaker behind his back comes a broken rasp, like a cry. 


“ 


“Do you understand me?” he repeats, and the speaker hisses: “... ten minutes...” 


“Fine.” 


Khan turns his head and looks. An expanse shimmers beneath his feet. A man who 
feared the world was fading threw himself there, but he no longer fears anything. Noo 
stands before him and behind his glasses and irises, thoughts race. Ordered, strategic 
thoughts. It’s a wide-ranging rescue operation, and he’s now fully made up of it, not 
a single thought left. They still call him Khan, but in fact, he’s a tactical leader who’s 
perfected himself in a twenty-year positional war, an adaptable manoeuvre whose author 
and executor is himself - a tyrant of love, a total worldview in the service of a single 
person. There are others, but he can’t be stopped. Horrors visit him, and lately, he no 
longer even remembers their names, their ages are mixed up. Before going to bed, his 
beloved looks at him with a tired face instead of her eyes. A horror-mnemotour. And 
something even more ugly, late-night calls from the abyss: “You know who I am. Fat 
man, I’m not your plaything. Leave us!” How he cried when he woke up, but it doesn’t 


147 


happen anymore. Countermeasures have been deployed; he knows what happened. And 
he remembers. Forever. 


So the man stands at the broken window of the building’s sixtieth floor, a turquoise- 
orange-violet shroud fluttering over his shoulders. He’s a superhero. Girls - he’s coming 
to save you. 


He walks over the snowy floor with his backpack and down the fire escape. There, he 
takes the guests’ elevator instead of the residents’ private one. He descends nineteen 
floors with a Vesper businessman and his escorts, conjures up a smile, steps off on the 
fortieth, and wipes it from his face. Thirty minutes before the electronics technician 
would break the elevator doors on the lower floor - and forty-five minutes before Khan 
emerges from the snowy parking lot onto the street - he enters a suite rented under his 
friend’s name without taking off his shoes. 


The hallway is dim, Khan doesn’t turn on the lights. He knows what that means. On the 
shoe rack, there are three-thousand-real-worth smooth, worn leather shoes and a beige 
Perseus Black overcoat stained with blood hangs on a hook - it has become too morbid 
for Jesper. The phone rings in the empty rooms. Khan walks to the bedroom to answer 
it. The bed is made, the air is fresh, and in the middle of the room on a white cube- 
shaped table, there is a black pyramid made of stacks of coal-black banknotes. Khan 
opens his backpack, puts the shroud in a sports bag, and begins to stack the banknotes 
into his wallet with a cold ring. One hundred, one thousand, ten thousand, one hundred 
thousand, five hundred thousand real. Eight hundred thousand real. At the very bottom, 
like in a tomb, rests Tereesz’s service weapon. The nickel gleams in the dim light, and 
Khan places it on top of everything, then rises. 


Khan looks at the phone on the empty table. The red light goes out and comes back on 
with aring. It stops fora moment, half a minute passes, and then it starts again. He puts 
his hand on the receiver and thinks. His fingers become sweaty. He picks up the phone 
and puts it back on the cradle. Then he picks it up again, this time to his ear. Dark yellow 
fingers move over the buttons. When the sixteen-digit series is over, there is silence on 
the line, then an intermittent calling tone, a signal to the other world. And when the 
phone is finally picked up on the other end, the Pale fills the whole room. Connection. 
Like a distant ocean. A barely audible voice in the breaking waves: “Hello?” 


“Mum, I’m not coming home anymore.” 


Two months later, four thousand kilometres to the north, on the other side of the Yakut 
Reserve. The former taiga of Northeast Graad spreads out to the curve of the horizon, 
and the Pale shimmers in the immeasurable distance. And before him, eight hundred 
million hectares of forest undulate in the wind. The world. A snow-starred expanse 
exhales oxygen into the winter evening atmosphere. Even the indigenous people are 
forbidden to enter here. These icy cubic tons are breathed in by all of Graad, they are 
its lungs - Graad’s lungs. A hydrometeorological protected area, an oxygen park. A 
storm-grey motor carriage stands on a forest path, at the edge of a large field, with its 
salon lights fading. The lead-acid battery is slowly running out. The glass domes of the 
headlights go out into the dimness of late December. A pump hose winds out of the 
machine’s fuel tank, and a thirty-four-year-old man holds an empty canister in his hands. 
The snow-white interior in front of him smells of fuel, the white seats drip with it, and 
so does the white leather steering wheel and dashboard. 


He strikes a match, it goes out in his cold, red fingers, and the wind blows. The man 
shields the matchbox with his palm and strikes another match, the first one does nothing. 


148 


The second one ignites the motor carriage in flames. A single candle is lit in the midst 
of a darkening world. The white leather crackles and turns black, and flakes of soot 
peel off and rise up. A white suitcase in the back seat catches fire. There, his passport 
crumples up like a dying spider, and Malin’s letters float up as pale ash. And all the rest 
of the memorabilia that hasn’t already disappeared. A drawing appears before his eyes, 
and the birthmarks on Anni’s back disappear. Heat rises on the man’s face, he closes 
his eyes. Dots dance there for a moment; and the eyes, the exact colour of which he 
can no longer recall; a face that he can no longer remember. A kiss with the teacher’s 
daughter, in the dim forest, which the tongue doesn’t remember, but without which he 
himself would be inconceivable. All of it fades away. 


A former interior designer opens his mouth, rubs his bleeding gums with powder, and 
throws the rest of the nose candy into the burning motor carriage. It sparkles when it 
ignites. Then he gathers momentum and jumps over a frozen river. Cattail tufts protrude 
from the ice below, and a forest road winds in the distance. In front of him lies ameadow 
of hay, snow falling above it. And beyond the zigzagging trees, a sawtooth wall of firs, a 
dreamlike sight. Snowflakes flutter from the branches like wedding ribbons. 


He goes, a blonde lock of hair trembling on his forehead, his eyes moist and light blue 
from the wind. He wears a snow-white cloak, with white suede shoes on his feet; the 
corners of the mantle’s collar are adorned with silver anchors, a nautical motif. His 
silhouette glows in the dim light, slender like a surfboard, water bottles clinking in his 
shoulder bag. No one knows where he is going. No one knows where he is - a tiny 
shimmering dot on a vast frosty field. And on the other side of the field, the forest 
beckons, darkness under the trees filled with oxygen, calling out to his entire conscious 
life. He enters, the ground softening beneath his feet, prickly with pine needles, the 
wind subsiding, and not a single bell ringing there. No one’s voice. This way, it’s better, 
it’s right. 


The charred motor carriage remains on the roadside. 


A month later, six thousand kilometres south. A metro train speeds underground in a 
tunnel. The carriages are empty at night and the steel creaks. Khan leans against the 
door, backpack on his back. He gazes down the swaying carriage track, the steel worm 
belly of the metro. A few lonely people sit there, lights on in economy mode. Graad is 
at war, and going out at night without a special permit is forbidden. One night, when 
officers came to poke him with rubber truncheons at the train station, Khan bought 
one for himself. He now sleeps on station benches and behind the tables of open cafes, 
avoiding hotels. People have a habit of getting lost there. The yellow light of industry 
shines in window after window, the metro train exits the tunnel and climbs up to the 
bridge. Below, the downstream of the Peremennaja Veera blackens, rainbow-coloured 
ice layer on it and in front, giant cylinders of gas storage tanks rise on the river banks, a 
row of cucumber plantation floodlights. And the hydroelectric power station. This is the 
Polyfactory, the tyrannopolis, the post-megapolis, the penultimate development of the 
human settlement. The part of the city Khan has come to was once Lenka, the capital 
of Ziemsk. Here Franti¢ek the Brave was born. And Tereesz Machejek, but by then the 
tumour had long since engulfed Lenka. Graad scientists predict that within the next ten 
years, the Polyfactory Mirova will grow together with its suburbs to form the last of the 
human settlement’s developmental peaks, an uninhabitable part of the geosphere, an 
ecological disaster zone - a necropolis. It won’t, because, before that, the Pale will have 
swept over this bit of land. 


On the horizon, over the bay, a black swarm of Grad’s cruisers drifts northwestward, 


149 


swarms of fighters dropping from their bellies like seeds. These are reserve troops. 
Tonight, the Mesque navy raided Graad’s isola, the home isola. There is no good news 
coming from Katla or the Holodnaya Zemlya region. The vanguard is approaching across 
the boreal plateau. Thirty-five million people listen to war news through the radio, be- 
hind train windows at the Polyfactory. They are all slaves. Only one does not listen, he 
already knows what will happen. This man is a nihilist and Khan has come here for him. 


He steps out of the door at the station, zipping up his jacket. The platform is empty and 
quiet, the cool of late southern winter. Poplars rustle in the wind, and industrial ash 
falls from the trees. He descends the echoing stairs down to street level, walking be- 
tween partially collapsed huts. The landfill looms above them, an invincible monument, 
silver cylinders shining from five thousand-watt projectors. The street is poorly lit, with 
wooden houses squatting on either side of the road, the ice cracking beneath his feet in 
mud puddles. The road is not paved. 


Khan stops in front of a particularly dilapidated double-story apartment building. The 
wooden facade creaks in the wind, threatening to collapse on him at any moment. He 
checks the address written on the back of his hand with a pen, then goes upstairs through 
the dark, ammonia-smelling hallway. He lights a match and two flames dance in the 
lenses of Khan’s glasses as he searches for apartment number three. 


An old man in his underwear comes to the door, with his skin hanging over his chest and 
looking like he’s been embalmed. He used to be young and charming with his extreme 
worldview, mocking everyone and everything and calmly taking those little things that 
lead ordinary people astray. This clownery, along with the social conscience typical of 
northern women, earned this kojko the biggest win in his life - Zigi’s mother. However, 
the marriage turned out to be a farce for him. Besides, the woman did not allow herself 
to be disciplined by Zigi’s nihilistic father. Zigi’s father didn’t discipline Zigi, he cared 
about him, cared about him enough to leave the boy in Vaasa. The nihilist himself went 
back to Polyfactory, went to the gym there, and stayed healthy to live like a true nihilist 
until he was a hundred years old, nibbling on every vile hour, knowing that there were 
many more ahead. 


All of this is clear to Khan, and it’s in his backpack in a folder. He wants to know what 
happened when Zigi came to Graad to see his father three years after the girls disap- 
peared. What happened between Zigi and the girls, what he missed. The kojko leads 
him to the kitchen, in the middle of unwashed dishes. Khan slams the bottle of vodka 
with a hundred real on the table, and the kojko unscrews the cap, pouring a shot and 
holding the shot glass on the tips of his middle and index fingers. 


“Not that I’m going to cause him any trouble, don’t get me wrong,” Khan looks at the 
filled shot glass in front of him. “It’s all as I said on the phone, but...” He thinks for a 
moment, then slams the vodka down his throat. 


“The boy knows who I am. I’m a nihilist.” The old man slams the shot glass on the table: 
“Come and see the mighty nihilist face death, tonight at eight o’clock, at the community 
centre. Death is great and terrible, but... but the nihilist is not... what was he now?” He 
puts his finger to his mouth and tries to remember. But he can’t, his mood is ruined and 
his body slumps over his shoulders. “It’ll soon be over, what’s the difference.” The old 
man nods towards the door, “Everything is as he left it.” 


The notebooks rise like towers along the walls of the hut. Khan’s shadow stands in front 
of the door, between the stacks, the kitchen light shining in from behind. Then, as the 
man reaches for one of the notebooks, the rest of the stack begins to collapse on him. 
He looks to Zigi’s father for help, holding the swaying tower against the wall with his 


150 


shoulder. “Never mind,” he coughs, “it’s all the same. The same story.” 


“What do you mean?” Khan takes a step back, notebooks spilling onto the floor, each 
cover has the ages of the girls in Zigi’s sloppy handwriting. Five, twelve, thirteen, four- 
teen. 


“The same story!” Kojko turns his back on Khan and sits down at the kitchen table. 
“Strange story. Isn’t it a rather strange story for all of us, and whether it has a happy 
ending...” 


Khan starts packing the notebooks into his sports bag. Then, as he stands in front of 
the door, a bulging bag hanging over his shoulder, the kojko is still looking out of the 
small kitchen window. “They want to drown this world in the Pale, you know. Mesques. 
They’re on the radio saying they’ll take us to our cradle. That we’ll all be sitting there, 
mouths agape. And they’ll make sure we don’t choke on our tongues and they’ll feed 
us. Failure is not nihilism any more, it’s a farce, I’ve seen it, it’s the quarantine of the 
proteins of Lomonossov’s Land! The whole earth wants to become Lomonossov’s Land.” 


Khan taps on the doormat with his shoe tip. “Well then, I don’t know, I should go...” 


“He’s a disappointment, this Saint-Miro, but you know, boy?” The old man looks at Khan, 
his eyes glossy with vodka, black as a horse’s, “I think there’s more to come...” 


The carriages disappear in front of Khan, one by one, the tunnel swallowing the train. 
He sits by the window in dim silence, his ears blocked from the pressure change. Green 
lights mark the exits; otherwise, it is dark in the carriages, with only the sound of screech- 
ing metal. He takes out a flashlight, fills it with batteries, and the world appears from 
darkness on a square piece of paper in his lap. Khan sits with piles of notebooks to his 
right and reads. 


Page by page, it unfolds in front of him under the beam of his flashlight. Every detail is 
captured there with autistic attention to detail, every word and movement is recorded. 
It’s not so much a story as a technical drawing, a model of memory. Instructions for 
a future benevolent force to put Zygismunt Berg’s lost world back together. Cut, fold, 
and paste. The trajectory of a brick in the winter night, the coordinates of a living room 
window. A familiar address, the girls’ house in Vaasa, at the Fahlu stop. The maze of the 
suburbs is revealed on an unfolded map, a dotted line marking the boy’s escape. 


And meteorological details in the corner of the page. Air pressure and humidity. Eigh- 
teen degrees below zero. The next evening at Handsome Alexander’s: sofas against the 
wall, a six-phase battle of dancing steps on the floor. And then - darkness. A single voice 
ringing above him, above the boy, with locks jingling. “You’re Zigi - the worst boy in 
school.” Khan senses something bad, he wipes his glasses with a handkerchief, and acid 
swirls in his stomach. This is an impending jealousy attack. 


“And you, my darling Doom, are the most beautiful girl in school.” 


However, the girl’s name with the familiar “a” in the middle does not wait for him on the 
other side of the page. Its absence is what awaits him there. He and the world around 
him are no more, as the dates under the pages move forward from New Year’s, once 
or twice every week, less and less often. Until the twenty-eighth of August. But on the 
pages themselves just an empty grid. Khan grabs the next notebook and flips through 
it, then the next one, he pulls out the rest of the notebooks from his backpack, and they 
all have the same story. A strange story. 


The light from the platform shoots a sieve into the carriages. It radiates in through 
the rows of windows, one window at a time. Khan raises his head and his glasses light 


151 


up. Two bright illuminators, the final stop - he doesn’t understand. A fat idiot with a 
bright blue tie, somewhere there is Zygmunt Berg, who knows that only shells remain 
of his story. The magnetic tape hisses, and the heart alone rotates on a plastic disc. And 
the numbers, he has those too, inseparable from the world until the end. He catapults 
himself through the ultra-deep Pale, towards it in his steel apricot pit. But Khan’s own 
memory distorts in his mind. The backups have been extinguished, one after another, 
leaving him alone. He can’t bear it like this, but he can’t live without it. 


Tonight he falls asleep in the station toilet, in a cube with paper-thin walls. He has 
curled up against the wall, the door is locked. His body is covered with a tricolour 
shroud, ragged from time. Strands sweep the floor as the man tosses and turns. He 
can’t sleep, something is wrong. Something is very wrong. “Speak, you always have 
such cool presentations. In history and natural science...” The man opens his eyes and 
looks into a blank face, smooth blonde hair falling onto the tile floor. The child lies asleep 
in front of him. Doesn’t breathe, doesn’t smell. 


“Where are you?” A low vibration, the invisible companion doesn’t answer. Khan curls 
up as tightly as he can, but the cold doesn’t leave his bones. He repeats: “I’m at the end 
of the world. I’m at the end of the world.” 


Twenty-one years ago, small bare feet step down the stairs of a suburban house. It is 
the night of the winter solstice, and veins run under her translucent skin. Each nail is a 
raspberry-red gemstone, toes curling up on the cold stair steps. Dark green eyes. The 
hem of the nightgown flutters around her ankles in a draft. 


Thus Malin Lund steps onto the ground floor, on the carpet. In the dark room, a shattered 
window glows. The curtain swells like a sail, a brick lies on the floor, and the entrance 
door is open. She herself is a mirror, mirror! - a perfect copy of the world. But something 
is wrong. It always has been. Her surface is flawless, like that of an adolescent, radiantly 
pure. It is the light that is mistaken. It is the world itself. 


Two young girls step to the side of the third in the dark. The eldest is holding the hand 
of the little one, who points towards the window with a fairy godmother’s magic wand. 
The window hangs like a cracked smile in the frame. 


“Look!” she says, “It’s going wrong.” 


152 


20. EPILOGUE - LIGHT SHINES THROUGH EVERY- 
THING?! 


Revachol, 75 years ago, two years before the Turn-of-the-Century Revolution. 


From afar, applause can be heard from behind the stage of the symphony hall. The 
ovations for the premiere are meagre, and there won’t be a second encore. The clap- 
catchers organised the first one. The string section is already changing their evening 
dresses for street clothes on silver chaise lounges. The end-of-January sky is blue outside 
the window. And in front of it stands comte Emile de Pérouse-Mittrecie - in a black frock 
coat, with a dodecahedron in his hand and his hair tousled from waving his hands while 
conducting. 


Emile is a controversial figure. He is an aristocrat, the comte of the Pérouse and Mittre- 
cie counties, but his hatred for the bourgeoisie, who he believes has usurped the higher 
class, makes him a supporter of the proletariat and therefore the revolution. Living off 
his inheritance, Emile has come to consider himself a composer. He is feverishly thirsty 
for fame, but he has decided to win the people’s hearts with his dodecaphonic compo- 
sitions. The comte’s musical style is based on a dazzlingly modern geometric-symbolic 
system of harmonies, which has nothing to do with the music of the rest of the civilised 
world. To the human ear, it sounds like unbearable noise. Emile regards tonal, tradi- 
tional music as embryonic, mind-numbing lullabies, or music for amoebas. He conducts 
his own works - no one else can or wants to - using a cardboard dodecahedron instead of 
a conventional baton. His cheeks flush with excitement, and the dodecahedron trembles 
in his hand. “Shall I go back?” he shouts, “I’ll go back!” 


He rushes through the room like he’s driven by a fever. The symphony orchestra director 
stops the comte discreetly at the door: “I don’t know, perhaps it’s not necessary to go...” 


“Why not?” the man doesn’t understand. A whiny smile appears on his face. “They’re 
calling for me! It was enormous!” 


“Tt was enormous...” the director scratches his head. “Well, it was something, but you’ve 
already been there once and... it’s not good manners to put the audience’s politeness to 
the test.” The hall has gone quiet. The wind blows outside the window. 


“T don’t think there’s anything wrong with it,” says a fat colleague, patting the comte’s 
shoulder. “The idea was good. The execution needed a little polishing. But you know, 
in the end, everything fell nicely into place. And so what if it’s not played again? You'll 
polish the next one nicely, and it will come!” This is said by a man who writes mostly 
flute concertos and solo pieces for the flute. 


“Hmm... the next one,” the director still scratches his head. “Maybe it would be better if 
you didn’t write about it...” the comte hears him whisper to the critic gentleman. “The 
Pérouse-Mittrecies have been generous to our institution over the years...” 


The flushing of comte’s face turns into a malign tremor. The smile still lingers. Unno- 
ticed, he returns to the windowsill, passing by the bustling women. The sound of the 
director’s attempt to cover up can still be heard, and the critic talks too. Complicated... 
one cannot become famous with such a thing, it is disturbing to listen. Behind the glass, 
the branches of trees sway in the dark blue evening. 


21 This epilogue is not part of the original print of the book, instead it was written and posted by Robert 
Kurvitz on the now defunct blog “www.zaum.ee” in 2014, some time after the book was published. 


153 


“Disturbing to listen...” the comte whispers. A metronome stands on the windowsill. 
He lets the pointer tick. The tempo is grave, the slowest possible. “Cannot become 
famous...” 


“Well, come on!” the concertmaster exclaims. “In my opinion, every person has their 
own language of sound!” A plump lady looks towards the comte. “I sincerely hope there 
will be another time. Only perhaps not as complicated.” 


Laughter echoes. A sigh of relief passes through the dressing room. 


“At the end... everything came together nicely...” the man mumbles. He slowly turns 
around and looks at the roomful of people from under his bangs. “So, am I the only one 
who thought it was enormous, huh?” 


“Tick,” the metronome replies, the branches of trees swaying behind the man’s back. 


“T thought it was unconventional,” says the concertmaster. “And really, there were good 
moments.” 


“Good moments...” says the comte. 
“Tick,” says the metronome. 


A man is juggling a dodecahedron from hand to hand. “But... which moments did you 
like the most?” 


“Well, the beginning of the second part was beautiful...” the woman fiddles with her 
violin case. “And...” 


“Tick.” 
“Tick.” 
“Tick.” 
“Azimuth!” someone claps their hands in the silence. 
“Tick.” 


“Boreas! Sector!” With eyes shining like lightning, a tiny man enters the room. He claps 
his hands on every beat and says one word with each step. 


“Nadir!” the little man finishes and bows before the comte. “Every single part was abso- 
lute, mathematical perfection. Don’t even make the next one, don’t ruin it. Disappear, it 
doesn’t need any more.” The man clenches his tiny hands into fists, his velvet suit jacket 
has elbow patches. “I’m going back to Graad,” he turns to the room. “In two years, the 
Mirova revolution will start, sweeping over the earth like a thunderstorm. And its failure 
will usher in the entire next century. The century of the decline of human reason, where 
every following year is darker than the previous one.” 


He moves around the room like a ball of lightning, threatening to pounce on someone’s 
face at any moment. “From that end, through the polar night, comes that music. It 
plays on the carriers of the future. Magnets! Yet still - it doesn’t come from there. You 
will become famous, Monsieur Mittrecie and your music will reach us from the true end, 
even further where all matter is a memory. That’s how white light sounds, shining into 
every darkroom, reversing all revelations.” He rises on his toes, under the critic’s nose: 
“All revelations - I said - reversed!” 


“Tick.” 


154 


The little man turns his head back like an owl. His gaze searches for a lightning rod and 
finds it in the form of a comte. The latter’s face spreads into a smile. The man gasps, 
“So, do I become famous after all? Do you really think it’ll happen like this?” 


“Tam certain of it. Because beyond the light...” 


“Jon!” interrupts a child’s voice, “Ion, let’s go already...” A little boy stands at the door, 
dressed in festive attire. 


“You must excuse me,” the man presses the comte’s hand, “it was an honour to meet 
a person whose mind is receptive to such brilliant sounds that they reveal the world’s 
memorable essence in their light.” 


“Wait!” the author stammers. He searches his coat pocket for a pencil and signs the 
dodecahedron with it. He has been practising it for a long time. “To whom should I 
make it out?” 


“Ton Rodionov,” the man smiles. He is excited. 
“You're not, by any chance, a writer?” 


“Oh no, I’m a math teacher,” the man takes the polyhedron, his eyes sparkling with 
admiration. 


“Of course!” the bloated critic snaps next to the door. 


But the teacher walks past him, paying no attention. He takes the hand of the little 
student at the door. “Come, Ambrosius!” he says. “Isn’t it a beautiful polyhedron?” 


Figure 3: Dodecahedron (by Robert Kurvitz) 


A month later, eight hundred kilometres from Revachol, on the edge of the Great Blue, 
on the shores of Insulinde. 


155 


The sail of the yacht catches the wind fiercely. The canvas flaps and the wind howls 
deafeningly. It’s a night at the end of February and the last, dark blue hour before sun- 
rise. The ocean shimmers under the dark blue expanse, and a single yacht manoeuvres 
through the cracked ice crust. An iceberg passes by the railing, steaming in the dark- 
ness. On the deck stands comte Emile de Pérouse-Mittrecie. He is still in his black frock 
coat, which is tattered and unwashed. The man’s hair blows in the wind, his hands are 
red from the cold. They are frozen to the wheel. 


“Set yourself on fire, Revachol! Set yourself on fire!” he screams into the wind. “I know 
it’s huge, and the world knows it’s huge! Who are you, anyway?” 


The ship cracks against the ice edge. A deafening scraping against the wooden hull. With 
his teeth, the comte pulls the cork from a bottle of spirits. “Complicated?!” he screams 
and takes a sip. “I bring you the music of the spheres, and it’s too complicated?! You’re 
the complicated one, you cow!” 


Before him, the sun rises through the vast, frosty world. It is a vision. A pale grey light 
radiates as wreaths of hatred and cold. The sun rises from the Pale. The comte raises 
his hands to the sky, and the incomparable noise engulfs him. It’s louder than the wind, 
louder than the grinding ice masses. Spit sprays from the man’s mouth, and he howls his 
favourite cadence. It’s his own composition. And the Pale’s voice in front of him sounds 
like applause, standing ovations, tens of thousands of feet stamping and whistles, ear- 
splitting whistles like fireworks, an atom that will one day be detonated in Revachol. The 
only thing in this world that is more beautiful than his own music is applause. 


“T’m famous!” the comte screams. “I am the most famous musician of all time! All other 
musicians are nothing compared to me! Nobody - nobody! - knows them, bute very 
one knows me!” 


He sips the spirits drop by drop and smashes the bottle on the deck. “Millions love 
me!” he cries, delirious, and throws his hands in the air, towards the Pale. “Millions 
and billions, hundreds of thousands of billions of young, lovesick girls love me and my 
twelve-tone sound! Love is everything! Love is light! Light and beyond - nothing!” 


156 


BONUS - DELETED SCENE - KHAN’S MOTHER”, 


“Please,” big tears flow from Inayat Khan’s eyes. “Tell me who you are...” 


“You know who I am.” The vibration emits a child’s voice, saying terrible things. Khan 
begins to tremble and slumps into the corner of the hallway, the receiver in his hand. 


“Tt’s not you, it’s not you!” he cries. The man’s real body shakes with his mind. He 
wakes up and cries in his bed. His ear hums and the dream continues in wakefulness, 
only the airship model is back in the display case, Nadja no longer smiles, and Gon-Tzu 
holds the compass. 


Five minutes later, Aliyah Khan wakes up to the sound of clanging dishes in the kitchen. 
She fumbles for her bedpost, and the night light with fringes illuminates. The woman 
goes to the kitchen in her nightgown. There, in the dark, facing the door, stands her son 
in his thirties, sobbing. The hulking man washes his coffee cup, his back shaking. 


“Bad dream?” 
Khan doesn’t answer, drops the cup into the sink and the handle falls off. 


“Sit down now, let me do it.” The mother leads the man to the table. “Do you want me 
to make you some tea?” 


“Coffee,” the man wipes his cheeks, “make coffee.” 


The old woman turns on the lights in the kitchen, water gurgles in the sink, she washes 
her son’s favourite cup. There, Ramout Karzai’s last journey winds through the dunes. 
Then the woman puts water on the stove and sits down next to Khan. 


“T asked...” he pants, “for her to tell me where they are, but she didn’t.” 
“And she is...” 


“Malin.” Khan swallows. “She called, and the others were there too. They said I should 
leave them alone. That I’m torturing them.” 


It’s quiet, the kettle starts to whistle. Khan’s mother gets up from the table, and searches 
for powdered coffee in the cupboard. “You know what that means, don’t you?” 


Khan is no longer sobbing. He looks at his fingers on the table with a blank expression 
and says, “Everyone else would have gotten what they wanted. Only I wouldn't...” 


“No, darling,” Aliyah puts a cup of coffee in front of her son on top of a newspaper. “It’s 
you who gives yourself this kind of advice. You know what you need to do. You don’t 
have to chase after the Zigi guy, and you don’t have to go to the person who talks to the 
dead. You need to go to work.” 


“But I’m already working!” Khan takes a sip. “I’m a leading specialist in my field, I tell 


you. 


“Maybe so, but that’s not a normal field. I mean a real job. When you start taking care 
of yourself, women will come to you. I have an idea, listen! Go to the job market agency 
tomorrow morning...” 


“Mom, didn’t I just tell you?!” 


22This deleted scene was posted in 2013, after the book’s publication, on the now defunct blog at 
“www.zaum.ee”. It continues the end of chapter 11. 


157 


“Listen to me until I finish! Go there tomorrow morning and ask for retraining and take 
it! They offer it for free. You'll gain confidence, make a daily schedule for yourself...” 


“Sure,” Khan laughs hollowly, “a daily schedule.” 


“ 


. and on Friday, go out with that girl. Don’t resist, she’s very nice. Agne is a very 
pleasant woman, I don’t think her daughter will eat you up.” 


“What daughter?” 


“Why don’t you ever listen to me? I’ve been telling you for a month now that my col- 
league’s daughter is your age and also single. She really wants to meet you! Put ona 
nice suit and shirt and take her to a nice place to eat.” 


Khan lowers his head between his hands. “What place, Mum... to Abu-Babu’s kebab 
place so we can eat borek? Same place I’ll be taking that retraining?” 


“You know what we’ll do? I’ll give you some pocket money. An advance. You’ll reserve 
the table right after the job market agency and go to Telefunken!” Khan’s mother looks 
at him with a cunning expression. 


The man raises his head from his hands and wipes his nose with a handkerchief. “And 
how should I do that?” 


Mum opens the newspaper on the table: “Through contacts.” 


A young man in a t-shirt and a slim-fit suit poses next to an interview in the arts section. 
The shirt has the iconic album cover of a famous dance artist, and the interior design of 
the renovated panoramic floor shines in the background. 


158 


GLOSSARY 


Term Explanation 

Antecentennial Something that happened before the turn of the century. 
Antecentennial The Antecentennial Revolution, also known as the 
Revolution Turn-Of-The-Century Revolution or World Revolution, was 


Dolores Dei 


Elysium 


Entroponetics 


Entroponaut 


Franconegro 


The Innocences 


Isola 


a a conflict that spanned isolas started by the 
Communists on one side (also known as the Communards) 
and the Moralintern and royalty on the other. It started in 
Graad in ’02, partly due to an outbreak of a prion disease 
called “tzaraath” and a political leader named Kraz Mazov 
(a figure somewhat comparable to Karl Marx). 


An “innocence” (see The Innnocences) representing 
humanism and internationalism. She oversaw three 
scientific revolutions and put the basis of the welfare 
state. Parliamentary democracy and essential institutions 
such as Moralist International (known as the Moralintern) 
were also founded during her reign. 


The name of this parallel world we’re exploring. In the 
year ’51, around when the story first starts, the 
population is/was an estimated 4.6 billion. Elysium is 
special in that it is composed of two major geographic 
features: Isolas, acting as separate continents, and the 
Pale surrounding them. There are seven known isolas: 
Graad, lilmaraa, Insulinde, Katla, Mundi, Samara, Seol. 


This is the study of the Pale (see The Pale). The name 
comes from the scientific term of entropy, or chaos. 


A scientist/adventurer who studies the Pale. 


Innocence Franconegro is linked to a lineage of organised 
philosophical militarism in Elysium. He affirmed a notion 
of hereditary rule and conflict between the aristocrats 
and bourgeoisie. He reigned during what amounts to 
medieval times in our world. 


The known history of Elysium is largely focused around 
its innocences, who are entities similar to popes in 
Catholicism, but also archetypes representing entire 
ideas. There have been six elected innocences, although 
only four legitimate ones are currently known: Pius, the 
First Innocence; Franconegro, the innocence of 
militarism; Dolores Dei, the innocence of interisolary 
travel; and Sola, the anti-innocence. 


Generic term for Continent/Island (separated by water 
and Pale) 


159 


Term 


Explanation 


Moralintern 


The Pale 


Perikarnassis 


Tzaraath 


Moralintern combines the terms of “moralist” and 
“international,” an organisation going back to the days of 
Dolores Dei. Members of the organisation adhere to the 
principles of humanism and moralism. 


The world of Elysium is unique in that it’s not one 
continuous landmass, but rather an assortment of vast 
continents or isolas separated from each other by a 
barrier or “separative tissue” called the Pale. This tissue 
is the most prominent geographical feature of the world, 
accounting for 72% of its known surface area and 
outweighing reality 2:1, which makes it impossible to 
orbit around without special equipment. It can be seen as 
a grey haze stretching across the sky, with occasional 
flares and prominences arcing between the isolas. 
Scientific experiments have described it as a dark grey 
corona surrounding the globe (although it’s unclear if the 
planet still is a globe). If anything, the main characteristic 
of the Pale is that it’s the suspension of all properties - 
physical, epistemological, linguistic - which makes it hard 
to describe or to measure. It has been called “the 
transition state of being into nothingness”, and as one 
ventures deeper into the Pale, the degree of suspension 
becomes more pronounced until eventually even 
mathematics becomes unreliable. Nobody has been able 
to pass this point since the discovery of the Pale and it 
might just be impossible. 


Perikarnassis is considered the oldest known ancient 
civilisation in the world of Elysium, having been located 
on the “super-isola” of Perikarnassis. The fall of this 
civilisation took place 8,000 years in the past and it is 
called the Perikarnassis Incident. While nobody knows 
exactly what caused the incident, many believe that the 
Pale was somehow involved. 


An exceptionally virulent prion disease. 


160 


Country/Region in Elysium Correspondent in Our World 


Arda Arda is a sub-continent on the Katla isola 

Coalition of Nations Military and political alliance between the 
nations of Graad, Sur-la-Clef, Messina and 
Oranjerijk, established to fight against the 
Communists in Revachol. 

EPIS European Union, a NATO/EU-like coalition 


Graad Entire isola/continent, similar to Northern 
Asia; also, Russia/Poland blend, a country 


Gottwald 
Igaunija 


lilmaraa 
Insulinde 
Katla 


Kedra 
Mesque 
Messina 
Mundi 


Occident 


Oranjerijk 


Ozonne 


Revachol 


Samara 


Samara, People’s Republic of (SRV) 


on the isola with the same name 
Germany 


Estonia (it’s the name of the country in the 
Latvian language) 


Entire isola/continent, similar to South 
America 


Entire isola/continent, the bluest of them 
all (has an ocean), similar to Oceania 


Entire isola/continent, the coldest of them 
all, similar to Scandinavia 


Turkey 
Spain/Portugal and Mexico blend 
Italy 


Entire isola/continent, the largest and 
oldest of them all, similar to Europe 


Sub-continent on the Mundi isola, located 
to the south of Kedra; it is the home of 
EPIS countries, of which Sur-la-Clef is 
considered the “executive heart” 


Version Netherlands that is 
larger/stronger/militarised 


Luxembourg/rich small country 


A decayed Manhattan-like city on the 
Insulinde insola, founded 380 years in the 
past as a colony of what is modern 
Sur-la-Clef (then the Kingdom of Suresne); 
it rose to prominence during its heyday 
under the monarchy and became the 
“capital of the world”, only to be ravaged 
by the Antecentennial Revolution during 
the fight between Communists and the 
Coalition of Nations. 


Entire isola/continent 
China/India blend 


161 


Country/Region in Elysium 


Correspondent in Our World 


Semenese 
Seol 
Sur-la-Clef 


Suru 


Tien-en 
Vaasa 
Vesper 
Yugo 
Yekokataa 


Zsiemsk 


French Ivory Coast/Congo 
Japan/South Korea blend 


A France/Belgium blend and the seat for 
EPIS 


The Suru are an indigenous ethnic 
minority in Vaasa, on the Katla isola; 
similar to the Sami 


Vietnam 

Sweden/Finland blend 

Czech Republic 

The Balkans, former Yugoslavia 


Similar to Syberia, “Yekokataa” is an 
abbreviation of the Graadian term “Zone of 
Ecological Catastrophe,” an agricultural 
mega-project in the extreme south east of 
the Graad isola. It involved cutting-edge 
approaches to irrigation and a completely 
new type of fertiliser. 


Poland 


162 


